

I WILL set down a tale as it was told lo me by one who 
had it of bis father, whicb latter bad it of ///> fatber, tbis last 
having in like manner bad it of his fatber — and so on , back 
and still back, tbree bundred years and more, the fatbers 
transmitting it to tbe sons and so preserving it. It may be 
history, it may be only a legend, a tradition« It may bave 
happened, ii may not bave bappened: but it cou/ähaye bap- 
pened. It may be tbat tbe wise and tbe leamed believed it 
in the old days; it may be tbat only tbe unleamed and tbe 
simple loved it and credited it. 



 



\ 



 



CONTENTS 

OF VOLUMS I. 



CHAPTER I. p^g 

The Birthofthe Prince and the Pauper x 

CHAPTER IL 
Tom's Early Life . . . • 4 

CHAPTER HL 
Tom's Meeting with the Prince 15 

CHAPTER IV. 
The Prince's Troubles begin ...•••• «9 

CHAPTER V. 
Tom as a Patridan 39 

CHAPTER VI. 
Tom receiyes Instrnctions 55 

CHAPTER Vn. 
Tom's First Royal Dinner 7z 

CHAPTER Vin. 
The Questionof the Seal 8z 

CHAPTER IX. 
The River Pageant • 89 



 IC 



XII CONTENTS OF VOLUME I. 

CHAPTER X. Page 

The Prince in the Toils 97 

CHAPTER XI. 
At Guildhall 115 

CHAPTER XII. 

The Prince and his Deliverer 137 

CHAPTER XIII. 
The Disappearance of the Prince 149 

CHAPTER XIV. 
"LeRoiest mort— Vive le Roi" 159 

CHAPTER XV. 
Tom as King ....". I '. ... 181 

CHAPTER XVI. 
The State Dinner 203 

CHAPTER XVII. 
Foo-Foö the First •. •..'.'. 211 



 



The quality of mercy . . . 

is twice bless'd; 
It blesseth him that gives, and him that takes; 
'Tis mightiest in the mightiest: it becomes 
The thronM monarch better than his crown. 

Merchant of Venice. 



 



i 



 



THE BIRTH OF THE PRINCE 
AND THE PAUPER. 



Tht Princt and iht Pauptr, J. I 

 



KV'» 



 IC 



CHAPTER I. 
THE BIRTH OF THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

In the ancient city of London, on a certain 
autumn day in the second quarter of the six- 
te^nth Century, a boy was born to a poor family 
of the name of Canty, who did not want him. 
On the same day another English child was born 
to a rieh family of the name of Tudor, who did 
want him. All England wanted him too. Eng- 
land had so longed for him, and hoped for him, 
and prayed God for him, that, now that he was 
really come, the people went nearly mad for joy, 
Mere acquaintances hugged and kissed each other 
and cried. Everybody took a holiday, and high 
and low, rieh and poor, feasted and danced and 
sang, and got very mellow; and they kept this up 
for days and nights together. By day, London 
was a sight to see, with gay banners waving from 
every balcony and housetop, and splendid pageants 
marchin^ along, By night, it was again a sight 

 IC 




4 THE PRINCE AND THE PAÜPEjt 

to see, with its great bonfires at every comer, and 
its troops of revellers making merry around them. 
There was no talk in all England but of the new 
baby, Edward Tudor, Prince of Wales, who lay 
lapped in silks and satins, unconscious of all this 
füss^ and not knowing that great lords and ladies 
were tending him and watching over him — and 
not carhig, either. But there was no talk about 
the other baby, Tom Canty, lapped in his poor 
rags, except among the family of paupers whom 
he had just come to trouble with his presence. 



\ 



 



TOM'S EARLY LIFE. 



 



 



CHAPTER IL 
TOM's EARLY LIFE, 

Let US skip a number of years. 

London was fifteen hundred years old, and 
Was a great town — for that day. It had a hun- 
dred thousand inhabitants — some think double 
as many. The streets were very narrow, and 
crooked, and dirty, especially in the part where 
Tom Canty lived, which was not far from London 
Bridge. The houses were of wood, with the 
second story projecting over the first, and the 
third sticking its elbows out beyond the second. 
The higher the houses grew, the broader they 
grew. They were skeletons of strong criss-cross 
beams, with solid material between, coated with 
plaster. The beams were painted red or blue or 
black, according to the owner's taste, and this 
gave the houses a very picturesque look. The 
Windows were small, glazed with little diamond- 
shaped panes, and they opened outward, oq 
hinges, like doors, 

Digitized bvV_^OOQlC 



8 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

The house which Tom's father lived in was 
up -a foul little pocket called OfFal Court, out of 
Pudding Lane. It was small, decayed, and 
rickety, but it was packed füll of wretchedly poor 
families. Cant/s triljye occupied a room on the 
third floor. The mother and father had a sort 
of bedstead in the comer; but Tom, his grand- 
mother, and his twa sisters, Bet and Nan, were 
not restricted — they had all the floor to them- 
selves, and might sleep where they chose. There 
were the remains of a blanket or two, and some 
bundles of ancient and dirty straw, but these 
could not rightly be called beds, for they were 
not organised; they were kicked into a general 
pile, momings, and selections made from the 
mass at night, for Service. 

Bet and Nan were fifteen years old — twins. 
They were good-hearted girls, unclean, clothed in 
rags, and profoundly ignorant Their mother 
was like them. But the father and the grand- 
mother were a couple of fiends. They got drunk 
whenever they could; then they fought each other 
or anybody eise who came in the way; they 
cursed and swore always, drunk or sober; John 
Canty was a thief, and his mother a beggar, 
They made beggars of the children, but failed 



 



TOM*S EARLV LIFE. Q 

to make thieves of them. Among, but not of, the 
dreadful rabble that inhabited the house, was a 
good old priest whom the King had tumed out 
of house and home with a pension of • a few 
farthings, and he used to get the children aside 
and teach them right ways secretly. Father 
Andrew also taught Tom a little Latin, and how 
to read and write; and would have done the 
same with the girls, but they were afraid of the 
jeers of their friends, who could not have endured 
such a queer accomplishment in them. 

All Offal Court was just such another hive as 
Canty's house. Drunkenness, riot and brawling 
were the order, there, every night and nearly all 
night long. Broken heads were as common as 
hunger in that place. Yet little Tom was not 
unhappy. He had a hard time of it, but did not 
know it It was the sort of time that all the 
Ofial Court boys had, therefore he supposed it 
was the correct and comfortable thing. When he 
Game home empty-handed at night, he knew his 
father would curse him and thrash him first, and 
that when he was done the awful grandmother 
would do it all over again and improve on it; 
and that away in the night his starving mother 
would slip to him stealthily with any miserable 



 



lO THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER, 

scrap or crust she had been able to save for him 
by going hungry herseif, notwithstanding she was 
often caught in that sort of treason and soundly 
beaten for it by her husband. 

No, Tom's life went along well enough, 
especially in summen He only begged just 
enough to save himself, for the laws against 
mendicancy were stringent, and the penalties 
heavy; so he put in a good deal of his time 
listening to good Father Andrew's charming old 
tales and legends about giants and fairies, dwarfs 
and genii, and enchanted Castles, and gorgeous 
kings and princes. His head grew to be füll of 
these wonderful things, and many a night as he 
lay in the dark on his scant and offensive straw, 
tired, hungry, and smarting from a thrashing, he 
unleashed his imagination and soon forgot his 
aches and pains in delicious picturings to him- 
self of the charmed life of a petted prince in a 
regal palace. One desire came in time to haunt 
him day and night: it was to see a real prince, 
with his own eyes. He spoke of it once to some 
of his Offal Court comrades; but they jeered him 
and scoffed him so unmercifuUy that he was glad 
to keep his dream to himself after that. 

He often read the priesfs old books and got 



 



J 



TOMS EARLY LIFE. H 

him to explain and enlarge upon them. His 

dreamiügs and readings worked certain changes 

in him, by and by. His dream-people were so 

fine that he grew to lament his shabby clothing 

and his dirt, and to wish to be clean and better 

clad. He went on playing in the mud just the 

same, and enjoying it, too; but instead of splash- 

ing around in the Thames solely for the fun of it, 

he beg^n to find an added value in it because of 

the washings and cleansings it afforded. 

Tom could always find something going on 
around the Maypole in Cheapside, and at the 
fairs; and now and then he and the rest of 
London had a chance to see a military parade 
when some famous unfortunate was carried 
prisoner to the Tower, by land or boat. One 
summer's day he saw poor Anne Askew and three 
men bumed at the stake in Smithfield, and heard 
an ex-Bishop preach a sermon to them which did 
not interest him. Yes, Tom's life was varied and 
pleasant enough, on the whole. 

By and by Tom's reading and dreaming about 
princely life wrought such a strong effect upon 
him that he began to act the prince, unconsciously. 
His speech and manners became curiously cere- 
monious and courtly, to the vast admiration and 

 IC 



12 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

amusement of his intimates. But Tom's influence 
among these young people began to grow, now, 
day by day; and in time he came to be looked 
up to, by them, with a sort of wondering awe, as 
a superior being. He seemed to know so much! 
and he could do and say such marvellous things! 
and withal, he was so deep and wise! Tom's re- 
marks, and Tom's Performances, were reported by 
the boys to their eiders; and these, also, presently 
began to discuss Tom Canty, and to regard him 
as a most gifted and extraordinary creature. 
FuU-grown people brought their perplexities to 
Tom for Solution, and were often astonished at 
the wit and wisdom of his decisions. In fact he 
was become a hero to all who knew him except 
his own family — these, only, saw nothing in him. 
Privately, after a while, Tom organised a royal 
court! He was the prince; his special comrades 
were guards, chamberlains, equerries, lords and 
ladies in waiting, and the royal family. Daily 
the mock prince was received with elaborate cere- 
monials borrowed by Tom from his romantic read- 
ings; daily the great afFairs of the mimic kingdom 
were discussed in royal Council, and daily his 
mimic highness issued decrees to his imaginary 
armies, navies and viceroyalties. 



 



TOM*S EARLY LIFE. 13 

After which, he would go forth in his rags and 
beg a few farthings, eat his poor crust, take his 
customary cufTs and abuse, and then Stretch him- 
seif upon his handful of foul straw, and resume 
his empty grandeurs in his dreams. 

And still his desire to look just once upon a 
real prince, in the flesh, grew upon him, day by 
day, and week by week, until at last it absorbed 
all other desires, and became the one passion of 
his life. 

One January day, on his usual begging tour, 
he tramped despondently up and down the region 
round about Mincing Lane and Little East Cheap, 
hour after hour, bare-footed and cold, looking in 
at cook-shop Windows and longing for the dread- 
ful pork-pies and other deadly inventions displayed 
there — for to him these were dainties fit for the 
angels; that is, judging by the smell, they were — 
for it had never been his good luck to own and 
eat one. There was a cold drizzle of rain; the 
.atmosphere was murky; it was a melancholy day, 
At night Tom reached home so wet and tired and 
hungry that it was not possible for his father and 
grandmother to observe his forlom condition and 
not be moved — after their fashion; wherefore they 
gave him a brisk cuffing at once and sent him to 

 IC 



14 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

bed. For a long time his pain and hunger, and 
the swearing and fighting going on in the build- 
ing, kept him awake; but at last his thoughts 
drifted away to far, romantic lands; and he feil 
asleep in the Company of jewelled and gilded 
princelings who lived in vast palaces, and had 
servants salaaming before them or flying to execute 
their Orders. And then, as usual, he dreamed 
that he was a princeling himself. 

All night long the glories of his royal estate 
shone upon him; he moved among great lords 
and ladies, in a blaze of light, breathing per- 
fumes, drinking in delicious music, and answering 
the reverent obeisances of the glittering throng 
as it parted to make way for him, with here a 
smile, and there a nod of his princely head. 

And when he awoke in the morning and 
looked upon the wretchedness about him, his 
dream had had its usual effect — it had intensified 
the sordidness of his surroundings a thousandfold. 
Then came bitterness, and heart-break, and tears. 




ClIAPTER III. 
TOM'S MEETING WITH THE PRINCE, 

Tom got np hungry, and sauntered hungry 
away, but with his thoughts busy with the sha- 
dowy splendcmrs of his night's dreams. He wan- 
dered here and there in the city, hardly ^loticing 
where he was going, or what was happening 
around him. People jostled him, and some gave 
him rough speech; but it was all lost on the mus- 
ing boy. By and by he found himself at Temple 
Bar, the farthest from home he had ever tra- 
velled in that direction. He stopped and con- 
sidered a moment, then feil into his imaginings 
again, and passed on outside the walls of London. 
The Strand had ceased to be a country-road then, 
and regarded itself as a street, but by a strained 
constniction; for, though there was a tolerably 
compact row of houses on one side of it, there 
were only some scattering great buildings on the 
other, these being palaces of rieh nobles, with 


ample and beautiful grounds stretching to the 
river — grounds that are now closely packed with 
grim acres of brick and stone. 

Tom discovered Charing Village presently, 
and rested , himself at the beautiful cross built 
there by a bereaved king of earlier days; then 
idled down a quiet, lovely road, past the great 
cardinaPä stately palace, toward a far more mighty 
,and majestic palace beyond — Westminster. Tom 
stared in glad wonder at the vast pile of masonry, 
the wide-spreading wings, the frowning bastions 
and turrets, the huge stone gateway, with its 
gilded bars and its magnificent array of colossal 
granite lions, and other the signs and Symbols of 
Englisb royalty. Was the desire of his soul to 
be satisfied at last? Here, indeed, was a king's 
palace. Might he not hope to see a prince now 
— a prince of flesh and blood, if Heaven were 
willing? 

At each side of the gilded gate stood a liv- 
ing Statue — that is to say, ,an erect and stately 
and motionless man-at-arms, clad from head to 
heel in shining steel armour. At a xespectful 
distance were • many country folk, and people 
from the city, waiting for any chance glimpse 
of royalty that might offer. Splendid carriages, 

 IC 



TQM's üiEETINC WITH THE PRINCE. IQ 

wilh splendid people ia them and splendid ser- 
vants outside, were arriving and departing by 
sever^l other noble gateways that pierced Ihe 
royäl enclosure. 

.. Poorlittle .Tom, in bis rags, approached, and 
was moving slow and limidly past tbe senlinels, 
with a beating heart and a rising bope, wben all 
at once he caught sight through Ihe golden bars 
of a spectacle that almost made him shout for 
joy. Within was a comely boy, tanned and brown 
with sturdy out-door sports and exercises, whose 
clothing was all of lovely silks and satins, shin- 
iüg with jewels; at his hip a little jewelled sword 
and dagger; dainty bu^dna on his feet, with red 
heelsj and oa his head a jaunty crimson cap, 
with drooping plumes fastened with a great 
ßp^kllng gem. Several gorgeous gentlemen stood 
near — his servants, without a doubt Oh! he was 
aprince-*^a prince, a living prince, a real piince — 
with<>ut the shadow of a question; and the prayer 
of the paüpei-boy's heart was answered at last. 

, .Tom'ß breath came quick and short with ex-» 
citement, and his eyes grew big with wonder and 
delight Every thing gave way in his mind in- 
stantly to one desire: that was to get dose to the 
prince, and have a good, devouring look at him« 



 



20 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER, 

Before he knew what he was about, he had his 
face against the gate-bars. The next instant one 
of the soldiers snatched him rudely away, and 
sent him spinning among the gaping crowd of 
country gawks and London idlers. The soldier 
Said, — 

"Mind thy manners, thou young beggarl" 

The crowd jeered and laughed; but the young 
prince sprang to the gate with his face flushed, 
and his eyes flashing with indignation, and cried 
out, — 

**How dar'st thou use a poor lad like that! 
How dar'st thou use the King my father^s meanest 
subject so! Open the gates, and let him inl'* 

You should have seen that fickle crowd snatch 
off their hats then. You should have heard 
them cheer, and shout, "Long live the Prince of 
Wales!'' 

The soldiers presented arms with their hal- 
berds, opened the gates, and presented again as 
the little Prince of Poverty passed in, in his 
fluttering rags, to join hands with the Prince of 
Limitless Plenty. 

Edward Tudor said — 

"Thou lookest tired and hungry: thou'st been 
treated ilL Come with me." 



 



23 

TOM's MEETING WITH THE PRINCE. 2 1 



Half a dozen attendants sprang forward to — 
I don't know what; interfere, no doubt But they 
were waved aside with a right royal gesture, and 
they stopped stock still where they were, like so 
many statues. Edward took Tom to a rieh apart- 
ment in the palace, which he called his cabinet 
67 his command a repast was brought such as 
Tom had never encountered before except in 
books. The prince, with princely delicacy and 
breeding, sent away the servants, so that his 
humble guest might not be embarrassed by their 
critical presence; then he sat near by, and asked 
questions while Tom ate. 
"What is thy name, lad?*' 
"Tom Canty, an' it please thce, sir." 
"Tis an odd one. Where dost live?" 
"In the city, please thee, sir. Offal Court, 
out of Pudding Lane." 

"Offal Court 1 Truly 'tis another odd one. 
Hast parents?" 

"Parents have I, sir, and a grand-dam like- 
wise that is but indifferently precious to me, God 
forgive me if it be offence to say it — also twin 
sisters, Nan and Bet." 

"Then is thy grand-dam not over kind to thee, 
I take it" 



Digitized by VjOÖQIC 



20 
-.1 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 



"Neither to any othef is she, soplease your 
worship. She hath a wicked" heart, and wörketh 
evilall hier days." 

"Doth she mistreat thee?" 

^*There be times that she stayeth her hand, 
being asleep or overcome with drink; but' when 
she hath her judgment clear again, she maketh it 
up tö me with goodly beatings." 

A fierce look came into the little princie's eyes, 
aiid he cried out — 

"What! Beatings?" 

**0h, indeed, yes, please you, sir." 

^^Beatingsl — and thoa so frail and little. Hark- 
ye : before the night xome, she shall "hie her to 
the Tower." "The King my father" — • 

"In sooth, you forget, sir,.her low degree. The 
Tower is for the great alone." . ^ 

"True, indeed. I had not thought of that. I 
will cöhsider bf her ' punishmeni. Is thy father 
kind to thee?" 
- ''^Not möre than Gamnier Canty,' sit." 

"Fathers be alike, mayhap. Mine hath not a 
dölFs temper." He smiteth with ä heavy hand,'yet^ 
spareth me: he spareth me not always with his 
tpng'ue', thdugh, sooth tö say. How doth thy 
mother use thee?" . " 



 



TOM S MEETING WITH THE PRINCE. 2^ 

^She is good, sir, and giveth me neither sorrow 
nor pain of any sort. And Nan and Bet are like 
to her in this/' 

**How old be these?" 

"Fifteen, an' it please you, sir." 

"The Lady Elizabeth, my sister, is fourteen, 
and the Lady Jane Grey, my cousin, is of mine 
own age, and comely and gracious withal; but my 
sister the Lady Mary, with her gloomy mien and 
—Look you: do thy sisters forbid their servants 
to smile, lest the sin destroy their souls?" 

"They? Oh, dost think, sir, that tkey have 
servants?" 

The little prince contemplated the little pauper 
gravely a moment, then said — 

"And prithee, why not? \Vho helpeth them 
ündress at night? Who attireth them when they 
rise?" 

"None, sir. Wouldst have them take off their 
garment, and sleep without — like the beasts?" 

"Their garment! Have they but one?" 

"Äh, good your worship, what would they do 
with more? Tnily they have not two bodies 
each." 

"It is a quaint and marvellous thought! Thy 
pardon,'^ I ha<J not meant to laugh. But thy good 



 



24 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

Nan and thy Bet shall have raiment and lackeys 
enow, and that soon, too: my cofferer shall look 
to it. No, thank me not; 'tis nothing. Thou 
speakest well; thou hast an easy grace in it. 
Art leamed?" - 

"I know not if I am or not, sir. The good 
priest that is called Father Andrew taught me, of 
his kindness, from his books." 

"Know'st thou the Latin?" 

"But scantly, sir, I doubt." 

"Leam it, lad: 'tis hard only at first. The 
Greek is harder; but neither these nor any tongues 
eise, I think, are hard to the Lady Elizabeth and 
my cousin. Thou shouldst hear those damsels at 
it! But teil me of thy Offal Court. Hast thou a 
pleasant life there?" 

"In truth, yes, so please you, sir, save when 
one is hungry. There be Punch-and-Judy shows, 
and monkeys — oh such antic creatures! and so 
bravely dressed! — and there be plays wherein 
they that play do shout and fight tili all are 
slain, and 'tis so fine to see, and costeth but a 
farthing — albeit 'tis main hard to get the farthing, 
please your worship." 

"Teil me more." 

"We lads of Offal Court do strive against 



 



TOM's MEETING WITH THE PRINCE. 2$ 

each other with the cudgel, like to the fashion 
of the 'prentices, sometimes." 

The prince's eyes flashed. Said he — 

"Many, thdt would not I mislike. Teil me 
more/' 

"We strive in races, sir, to sce who of us shall 
be fleetest" 

"That would I like also. Speak on." 

"In summer, sir, we wade and swim in the 
canals and in the river, and each doth duck his 
neighbour, and splatter him with water, and dive 
and shout and tumble and '' 

"Twould be worth my father's kingdom but 
to enjoy it once! Prithee go on." 

"We dance and sing about the Maypole in 
Cheapside; we play in the sand, each covering 
his neighbour up; and times we make mud pastry 
—oh the lovely mud, it hath not its like for 
delightfulness in all the worldl — we do fairly 
wallow in the mud, sir, saving your worship's 
presence." 

"Oh, prithee, say no more, 'tis glorious! If 
that I could but clothe me in raiment like to 
thine, and strip my feet, and revel in the mud 
once, just once, with none to rebuke me or forbid, 
meseemeth I could forego the crownl" 

 IC 



26 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. ' 

**And if that I could clothe itne once, sweet 
sir, as thou art clad— just once — — " 

"Oho, wöuld'st like it? Then so shall it be. 
Doff thy rags, and don these splendours, lad ! It 
is a brief happiness, but will be not less keen for 
fhaf; We will have it while we niay, and change 
again before any come to molest." 

A few minutes'later the littlePrince of Wales 
was garlahded with" Tom's ffuttering odcjs and 
ends, and the little Prince of Pauperdom was 
tricked out in the gaudy plumage of röyalty. 
The two went and stood side by side before a 
great mirrör, änd lo, a miracle: there did not 
seem to have been any change madet They 
siared at each other, then at the glass, then at 
each other again, At last the puzzled princeling 
Said — 

"What .dost thou make ofthis?" 

"Ah,' good your worship, require me not to 
answer. It is not meet that one of my degrescr* 
should utter the thing." 

"Then will 7 utter it. Thou hast the same 
hair, the same eyes, the same voice and manner, 
the ^anie form and statüre, the same face and 
cbühtenance that I beär. Fared we forth riaked, 
there is norle could say which was you, and whidx 



 



TOM's MEETING WITH THE PKINCE. ft^ 

the Prince of Wales. And, now that I am dothed 
as thou wert clothed, it seemeth I should be able 
the more nearly to feel as thou didst when the 
brüte soldier — Hark ye, is not this a bruise upon 
your band?" 

"Yes; but it is a slight thing, and your wor- 
ship knoweth Ihat the poor man-ät-arms -** 

"Peace! It was a shameful thing and a 
cniel!" crie'd the little prince, stamping his bare 

foot. «If the King Stir not a Step tili I 

come again ! It is a command ! " 

In a moihent he had snätched up and put 
away an article of national importänce that lay 
upon a table, and was out at the door and flying 
through the jpatace gröunds in his bannered rags, 
with a hot face and glowing eyes. ' As soon as 
he reached the great gate, he seized the bars, 
and tried to shake them, shouting — 

"Open! Unbar the gates!" 
* The soldier that had maltreated Tom obeyed 
promptly; and as the prince burst through the 
portal, half-smothered with royal wrath, the soldier 
fetched him a sounding box on the ear that sent 
him whirling to the roadway, and said — 

"Take that, thou beggar's spawn, for what 
thou got'st me from his Highness!" 

' Digitizedby VjOOQIC 



28 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER, 

The crowd roared with laughter. The prince 
picked himself out of the mud, and made fiercely 
at the sentry, shouting — 

"I am the Prince of Wales, my person is 
sacred; and thou shalt hang for laying thy hand 
upon mel" 

The soldier brought his halberd to a present- 
arms and said mockingly — 

"I Salute your gracious Highness/' 

Then angrily — 

"Be off, thou crazy rubbish!" 

Here the jeering crowd closed around the 
poor little prince, and hustled him far down the 
road, hooting him, and shouting — 

"Way for his royal Highness! Way for the 
Prince of Wales!" 



 



THE PRINCE'S TROUBLES BEGIN. 



 IC 



 



CHAPTER IV. 
THE PRINCE'S TROUBLES BEGIN. 

After hours of persistent pursuit and persecu- 
tioii; the little prince was at last deserted by the 
rabble and left to himselC As long as he had 
been able to rage against the mob, and threaten 
it royally, and royally utter commands that were 
good stuflf to laugh at, he was very entertaining; 
but when weariness finally forced him . to be 
silent, he was no longer of use to his tormentors, 
and they sought amusement elsewhere. He looked 
about him,'now, but could not recognise the 
locality. He was within the city of London — that 
was all he knew. He moved on, aimlessly, and 
in a little while the houses thinned, and the 
passers-by were infrequent He bathed his bleed- 
ing feet in- the brook which flowed then where 
Farringdon Street now is; rested a few moments, 
then passed on, and presently came upon a great 
Space with only a few scattered houses in it, and 



 



iZ THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

a prodigious church. He recognised this churcli. 
ScafFoldings were about, everywhere, and swarms 
of workmen; for it was undergoing elaborate re- 
pairs. The prince took heart at once — he feit 
that his troubles were at an end, now. He said 
to himself, *'It is the ancient Grey Friars' Church, 
which the. king my father hath taken from the 
monks and given for a home for ever for poor 
and forsaken children, and new-named it Christas 
Church. Right gladly will they serve the son of 
him who hath done so generously by them — and 
the more that that son is himself as poor and as 
forlom as any that be sheltered here this da}^ 
or ever shall be." 

He was soon in the midst of a crowd of bbys 
who were running, jumping, plajdng at ball and 
leap-frog, and otherwise disporting themselves, 
and right noisily, too. They were all dressed 
alike, and in the fashion which in that day pre- 
vailed among serving-men and 'prentices* — that 
is to say, each had on the crown of his head a 
flat black cap about the size of a saucer, which 
was not useful as a covering, it being of such 
scanty dimensions, neither was it ornamental; 

♦ See Note i, at end öf volume II, 



 



THE PRINCE'S TROt-BLES BEGIN. 33 

from beneath it the hair feil, unparted, to the 
middle of the forehead, and was cropped straight 
around; a clerical band at the neck; a blue gown 
that ütted closely and hung as low as the knees 
or lower; füll sleeves; a broad red belt; bright 
yellow Stockmgs, gartered above the knees; low 
shoes with large metal buckles. It was a suf- 
ficiently ugly costume. 

The boys stopped their play and flocked 
about the prince, who said with native dignity — 

"Good lads, say to your master that Edward 
Prince of Wales desireth speech with him." 

A great shout went up, at this, and one rüde 
fellow Said — a 

"Marry, art thou bis grace's messenger, 
beggar?" 

The Prince's face flushed with anger, and bis 
ready band flew to bis hip, but there was nothing 
there. There was a storm of laughter, and one 
boy said — 

"Didst mark that? He fancied he had a 
sword — belike he is the prince himself." 

This sally brought more laughter. Poor 
Edward drew himself up proudly and said — 

**I am ^ the prince; and it ill beseemeth you 


34 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

that feed upon the king my father^s bounty to 
use me so." 

This was vastly enjoyed, as the laughter 
testified. The youth who had first spoken, 
shouted to his comrades — 

"Ho, swine, slaves, pensioners of his grace's 
princely father, where be your männers? Down 
on your marrow bones, all of. ye, and do reverence 
to his kingly port and royal ragsl" 

With boisterous mirth they dropped upon 
their knees in a body and did mock homage to 
their prey, The prince spurned the nearest boy 
with his foot, and said fiercely — 

"Take thou that, tili the morrow come and I 
build thee a gibbet!" 

Ah, but this was not a joke — this was going 
beyond fun. The laughter ceased on the instant, 
and fury took its place. A dozen shouted — 

"Haie him forth! To the - horse-pond, tö the 
horse-pond! Where be the dogs? Ho, there, Lion! 
ho, Fangs!" 

Then foUowed such a thing as England had 
never seen before — the sacred person of the heir 
to the throne rudely buffeted by plebeian hands, 
and set upon and torn by dogs. 

As night drew to a close that day, the prince 



 



ME PRINCE^S TROÜBLES BEGIN. 3^ 

found himself far down in the close-built portion 
of the city. His body was bruised, bis hands 
were bleeding, and his rags were all besmirched 
with mud. He wandered on and on, and grew 
more and more bewildered, and so tired and 
faint he could hardly drag one foot after the 
other. He had ceased to ask questions of anyone, 
since they brought him only insult instead of in- 
formation. He kept muttering to himself, "Offal 
Court — that is the name; if I can but find it 
before my strength is wholly spent and I drop, 
then am I saved — for his people will take me to 
the palace and prove that I am none of theirs, 
but the true prince, and I shall have mine own 
again." And now and then his mind reverted to 
his treatment by those rüde Christ's Hospital 
boys, and he said, "When I am king, they shall 
not have bread and shelter only, but also teach- 
ings out of books; for a füll belly is little worth 
where the mind is starved, and the heart. I will 
keep this diligently in my remembrance, that this 
day's lesson be not lost upon me, and my people 
suflfer thereby; for leaming softeneth the heart) 
and breedeth gentleness and charity." * 

• See Note 2, at end of volume II. 

3* 



 



ß6 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

The lights began to twinkle, it came on to 
rain, the wind rose, and a raw and gusty night 
set in. The houseless prince, the homeless heir 
to the throne of England, still moved on, drifting 
deeper into the maze of squalid alleys where the 
swarming hives of poverty and miseiy were 
massed together. 

Suddenly a great dninken ruffian coUared 
him and said — 

"Out to this time of night again, and hast not 
jbrought a farthing home, I Warrant me ! If it be 
so, an' I do not break all the bones in thy 
lean body, then am I not John Canty, but some 
other." 

The prince twisted himself loose, unconsciously 
brushed his profaned Shoulder, and eagerly said — 

"O, art his father, truly? Sweet heaven grant 
it be so — then wilt thou fetch him away and 
restore me!" 

^^His father? I know not what thou mean'st; 
I but know I am thy father, as thou shalt soon 
have cause to " 

"O,. jest not, palter not, delay not! — I am 
worn, I am wounded, I can bear no more. Take 
me to the king my father, and he will make thee 
rieh beyond thy wildest dreams. Believe me, 



 



THE prince's troubles begin. 37 

man, believe me! — I speak no lie, but only the 
truth! — put forth thy band and save me! I am 
indeed the Prince of Wales!" 

The man stared down, stupeiied, upon the 
lad, then shook bis head and muttered — 

"Gone stark mad as any Tom o' Bedlam!" — 
then coUared bim once more, and said with a 
coarse laugh and an oath, '^But mad or no mad, 
I and thy Gammer Canty will soon find where 
the soft places in thy bones lie, or Fm no true 
man!" 

With tbis he dragged the frantic and strug- 
gling prince away, and disappeared up a front 
court foUowed by a delighted and noisy swarm of 
human vermin. 



 



 



TOM AS A PATRICIAN, 



 



 



CHAPTER V. 
TOM AS A PATRICIAN. 

Tom Canty, left alone in the prince's cabinet, 
made good use of his opportunity. He turned 
himself this way and that before the great minor, 
admiring his finery; then walked away, imitating 
the prince's high-bred carriage, and still observing 
results in the glass. Next he drew the beautiful 
sword, and bowed, kissing the blade, and laying 
it across his breast, as he had seen a noble 
knight do, by way of salute to the lieutenant of 
the Tower, five or six weeks before, when deliver- 
ing the great lords of Norfolk and Surrey into his 
hands for captivity. Tom played with the jewelled 
dagger that hung upon his thigh; he examined 
the costly and exquisite Ornaments of the room; 
he tried each of the sumptuous chairs, and 
thought how proud he would be if the Offal Court 
herd could only peep in and see him in his 
grandeur. . He wondered if they would believfe 

 IC 



42 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

the marvellous tale he should teil when he got 
home, or if they would shake their heads, and 
say his overtaxed imagination had at last upset 
his reason. 

At the end of half an hour it suddenly oc- 
curred to him that the prince was gone a long 
time; then right away he began to feel lonely; 
very soon he feil to listening and longing, and 
ceased to toy with the pretty things about him; 
he grew uneasy, then restless, then distressed. 
Suppose some one should come, and catch him 
in the prince's clothes, and the prince not there 
to explain. Might they not hang him at once, 
and inquire into his case afterward? He had 
heard that the great were prompt about small 
matters. His fears rose higher and higher; and 
trembling he softly opened the door to the ante- 
chamber, resolved to fly and seek the prince, 
and, through him, protection and release. Six 
gorgeous gentlemen-servants and two young pages 
of high degree, clothed like butterflies, sprang 
to their feet and bowed low before him. He 
stqpped quickly back and shut the door. He 
said — 

"Oh, they mock at me! They will go and 
teil, Oh! why came I here to c^st away my life?" 



 



TOM AS A PATRICIAN. 43 

He walked up and down the floor, filled with 
;iameless fears, listening, starting at every trifling 
soiind Presently the door swung open, and a 
Silken page said — 

"The Lady Jane Grey." 

The door closed and a sweet young girl, richly 
dad, bounded toward hira. But she stopped 
suddenly, and said in a distressed voice — 

«Oh, what aileth thee, my lord?" 

Tom's breath was nearly failing hini; but he 
made shift to stammer out — 

**Ah, be merciful, thou! In sooth I am no 
lord, but only poor Tom Canty of Offal Court in 
the city. Prithee let me see the prince, and he 
will of his grace restore to me my rags, and let 
me hence unhurt. Oh, be thou merciful, and 
save me!" 

By this time the boy was on his knees, and 
supplicating with his eyes and uplifted hands as 
well as with his tongue. The young girl seemed 
horror-stricken. She cried out — 

"O my lord, on thy knees? — and to meP^ 

Then she fled away in fright; and Tom, 
smitten with despair, sank down, murmuring — 

<*There is no help, there is no hope. Now 
will they corae and take me," 

 IC 



44 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

Whilst he lay there benumbed with terror, 
dreadful tidings were speeding through the palace. 
The whispers — for it was whispered always — flew 
from menial to menial, from lord to lady, down 
all the long corridors, from story to story, from 
saloon to saloon, "The prince hath gone mad, 
the prince hath gone mad!" Soon every saloon; 
every marble hall, had its groups of glittering 
lords and ladies, and other groups of dazzling 
lesser folk, talking earnestly together in whispers, 
and every face had in it dismay. Presently a 
splendid official came marching by these groups, 
making solemn proclamation — 

"In the Name of the King! • 
Let none list to this false and foolish matter, 
upon pain of death, nor discuss the same, nor 
carry it abroad. In the name of the King!"" 

The whisperings ceased as suddenly as if the 
whisperers had been stricken dumb. 

Soon there was a general buzz along the cor- 
ridors, of "The prince! See, the prince comes!" 

Poor Tom came slowly Walking past the low- 
bowing groups, trying to bow in retum, and 
meekly gazing upon his stränge surroundings 
with bewildered and pathetic eyes. Great nobles 
walked upon each side of him, making him lean 

IC 



TOM AS A PATRICIAN. 45 

upon them, and so steady his Steps. Behind him 
followed the court-physicians and some servants. 

Presently Tom found himself in a noble apart- 
ment of the palace and heard the door close be- 
hind him. Around him stood those who had 
come with him. Before him, at a little distance, 
reclined a very large and very fat man, with a 
wide, pulpy face, and a stern expression. His 
large head was very grey; and his whiskcrs, 
which he wore only around his face, like a frame, 
were grey also. His clothing was of rieh stufT, 
but old, and slightly frayed in places. One of 
his swoUen legs had a pillow under it, and was 
wrapped in bandages. There was silence now; 
and there was no head there but was bent 
in reverence, except this man*s. This stern- 
countenanced invalid was the dread Henry VIII. 
He Said — and his face grew gentle as he began 
to speak — 

"How now, my lord Edward, my prince? 
Hast been minded to cozen me, the good King 
thy father, who loveth thee, and kindly useth 
thee, with a sorry jest?" 

Poor Tom was listening, as well as his dazed 

faculties would let him, to the beginning of this 

:} Speech; but when the words "me the good King" 

T. 

 IC 



46 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

feil upon his ear, his face blanched, and rie 
dropped as instantly upon his knees as if a shot 
had brought him there. Lifting up his hands, 
he exclaimed — 

"Thou the King? Then am I undone indeedT' 

This Speech seemed to stun the King. His 
eyes wandered from face to face aimlessly, theor 
rested, bewildered, upon the boy before him* 
Then he said in a tone of deep disappoint- 
ment — 

"Alack, I had believed the rumour dispro 
portioned to the truth; but I fear me 'tis not so." 
He breathed a heavy sigh, and said in a gentle 
voice, "Come to thy father, child: thou art not 
well." 

Tom was assisted to his feet, and approached 
the Majesty of England, humble and trembling. 
The King took the frightened face between his 
hands, and gazed earnestly and lovingly into it. 
awhile, as if seeking some grateful sign of return- 
ing reason there, then pressed the curly head 
against his breast, and patted it tenderly. Pre- 
sently he said — 

"Dost not know thy father, child? Break not 
mine old heart; say thou know'st me. Thou dost 
know me, dost thou not?" 



 



V TOM AS A PATRICIAS. 47 



./' 



"Yea: thou art my dread lord the King, 
fifhom God preserve!" 

"True, true — that is well — be comforted, 
tremble not so; there is none here would hurt 
thee; there is none here but loves thee. Thou 
art better now; thy ill dream passeth — is't not 
so? And thou knowest thyself now also — is*t not 
so? Thou wilt not miscall thyself again, as they 
say thou didst a little while agone?" 

"I pray thee of thy grace believe me, I did 
but speak the truth, most dread lord; for I am 
the meanest among thy subjects, being a pauper 
bom, and 'tis by a sore mischance and accident 
I am here, albeit I was therein nothing blame- 
ful. I am but young to die, and thou canst save 
me with one little word. Oh speak it, sir!" 

"Die? Talk not so, sweet prince — peace, 
peace, to thy troubled heart — thou shalt not die!" 

Tom dropped upon his knees with a glad 
cry — 

"God requite thy mercy, oh my King, and 
save thee long to bless thy land!" Then spring- 
ing up, he tumed a joyful face toward the two 
lords in waiting, and exclaimed, "Thou heard'st 
it! I am not to die: the King hath said it!" 
There was no movement, save that all bowed 

 IC 



/. 



4$ THE PRINCE AND THE PAIj 

with grave respect; but no one spoke. 

tated, a little confused, then turiied timidly iS 

ward the King, saying, "I may go now?" 

"Go? Surely, if thou desirest. But why not 
tarry yet a little? Whither wouldst go?" 

Tom dropped his eyes, and answered humbly — 

"Peradventure I mistook; but I did think me 
free, and so was I moved to seek again the kennel 
where I was born and bred to misery, yet which 
harboureth my mother and my sisters, and so is 
home to me; whereas these pomps and splendours 
whereunto I am not used — oh, please you, sir, to 
let me go!" 

The King was silent and thoughtful a while, 
and his face betrayed a growing distress and 
uneasiness. Presently he said, with something 
of hope in his voice — 

"Perchance he is but mad upon this one 
strain, and hath his wits unmarred as toucheth 
other matter. God send it may be so! We will 
make trial." 

Then he asked Tom a question in Latin, and 
Tom answered him lamely in the same tongue. 
The King was delighted, and showed it. The 
lords and doctors manifested their gratification 
also. The King said — » 



 



TOM AS A PATRICIAN. 49 

"'Twas not according to his schooling and 
ability, but sheweth that his mind is but diseased, 
not stricken fatally. How say you, sir?" 

The physician addressed bowed low, and 
replied — 

"It jumpeth with mine own conviction, sire, 
that thou hast divined aright." 

The King looked pleased with this encourage- 
ment, Coming as it did from so excellent authority, 
and continued with good heart — 

"Now mark ye all: we will try him further." 

He put a question to Tom in French. Tom 
stood silent a moment, embarrassed by having 
many eyes centred upon him, then said diffi- 
dently — 

"I have no knowledge of this tongue, so 
please your majesty." 

The King feil back upon his couch. The 
attendants flew to his assistance; but he put 
them aside, and said — 

"Trouble me not — it is nothing but a scurvy 
faintness. Raise mel There, 'tis sufficient. Come 
hither, child; there, rest thy poor troubled head 
upon thy father's heart, and be at peace. Thou'lt 
soon be well: 'tis but a passing fantasy. Fear 
thou not; thou'lt soon be well." Then he turned 

Tka Prince and the Pauper, I. 4 

 IC 



50 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

toward the Company: his gentle manner changed, 
and baleful lightnings began to play from his 
eyes. He said — 

"List ye all! This my son is mad; but it is 
not permanent. Over-study hath done this, and 
somewhat too much of confinement. Away with 
his books and teachersl see ye to it. Pleasure 
him with sports, beguile him in wholesome ways, 
so that his health come again." He raised him- 
self higher still, and went on with energy, "He 
is mad; but he is my son, and England's heir; 
and, mad or sane, still shall he reign! And hear 
ye further, and proclaim it: whoso speaketh of 
this his distemper worketh against the peace and 
Order of these realms, and shall to the gallows! 
. . , Give me to drink — I burn: this sorrow 
sappeth my strength. . . . There, take away the 
cup. . . . Support me. There, that is well. Mad, 
is he? Were he a thousand times mad, yet is 
he Prince of Wales, and I the King will confirm 
it. This very morrow shall he be installed in his 
princely dignity in due and ancient form. Take 
instant order for it, my lord Hertford." 

One of the, nobles knelt at the royal couch, 
and said — 

"The King's majesty knoweth that the Here- 



 



TOM AS A 1>ATRICIAN. 5I 

ditary Great Marshai of England lieth attainted 
in the Tower. It were not meet that one at- 
tainted " 

"Peacel Insult not mine ears with his hated 
name. Is this man to live for ever? Am I to 
be baulked of my will? Is the prince to tarry 
uninstalled, because, forsooth, the realm lacketh 
an Earl Marshai free of treasonable taint to in- 
vest him with his honours? No, by the splendour 
of God! Warn my Parliament to bring me Nor- 
folk's doom before the sun rise again, eise shall 
they answer for it grievously!"* 

Lord Hertford said — 

"The King's will is law;" and, rising, returned 
to his former place. 

Gradually the wrath faded out of the old 
King's face, and he said — 

"Kiss me, my prince. There . . . what fearest 
thou? Am I not thy loving father?" 

"Thou art good to me that am unworthy, O 
mighty and gracious lord: that in truth I know. 
But — but — it grieveth me to think of him that is 
to die, and " 

"Ah, 'tis like thee, 'tis like theet I know thy 

* See Note 3, at end of volume II. 

 IC 



52 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

heart is still the same, even though thy mind 
hath suffered hurt, for thou wert ever of a gentle 
spirit But this duke standeth between thee and 
thihe honours: I will have another in his stead 
that shall bring no taint to his great office. Com- 
fort thee, my prince: trouble not thy poor head 
with this matter." 

"But is it not I that speed him hence, my 
liege? How long might he not live, but for ncie?" 

"Take no thought of him, my prince: he is 
not worthy. Kiss me once again, and go to thy 
trifles and amusements; for my malady distresseth 
me. I am aweary, and would rest. Go with 
thine uncle Hertford and thy people, and come 
again when my body is refreshed." 

Tom, heavy-hearted, was conducted from the 
presence, for this last sentence was a death-blow 
to the hope he had cherished that now he would 
be set free. Once more he heard the buzz of 
low voices exclaiming, "The prince, the prince 
comes ! " 

His spirits sank lower and lower as he moved 
between the glittering files of bowing courtiers; 
for he recognised that he was indeed a captive 
now, and might remain for ever shut up in this 
gilded cage, a forlorn and friendless prince, ex- 

 IC 



TOM AS A PATRICIAN. 53 



cept God in his merqr take pity on him and set 
him free. 

And, turn where he would, he seemed to see 
floating in the air the severed head and the re- 
membered face of the great Duke of Norfolk, the 
eyes iixed on him reproachfuUy. 

His old dreams had been so pleasant; but 
this reality was so dreary! 



 



 



TOM RECEIVES INSTRUCTIONS. 



 



 



CHAPTER VI. 

TOM RECEIVES INSTRUCTIONS. 

Tom was conducted to the principal apart- 
ment of a noble suite, and made to sit down — a 
thing which he was loath to do, since there were 
elderly men and men of high degree about him. 
He begged them to be seated also, but they only 
bowed their thanks or murmured them, and re- 
mained standing. He would have insisted, but 
his "uncle" the Earl of Hertford whispered in 
his ear — 

"Prithee, insist not, my lord; it is not meet 
that they sit in thy presence." 

The Lord St John was announced, and after 
making obeisance to Tom, he said — 

"I come upon the king's errand, conceming a 
matter which requireth privacy. Will it please 
your royal highness to dismiss all that attend 
you here, save my lord the Earl of Hertford?" 

Observing that Tom did not seem to know 

 IC 



58 TEIE PRINCE AND TOE PAUPER. 

how to proceed, Hertford whispered him to make 
a sign with his hand, and not trouble himself to 
speak unless he chose. When the waiting gen- 
tlemen had retired, Lord St. John said — 

"His majesty commandeth, that for due and 
weighty reasons of State, the prince's grace shall 
hide his infirmity in all ways that be within his 
power, tili it be passed and he be as he was be 
fore. To wit, that he shall deny to none that he 
is the tnie prince, and heir to England's great- 
ness; that he shall uphold his princely dignity, 
and shall receive, without word or sign of protest, 
that reverence and observance which unto it do 
appertain of right and ancient usage; that he 
shall cease to speak to any of that lowly birth 
and life his malady hath conjured out of the un- 
wholesome imaginings of o'er-wrought fancy; that 
he shall strive with diligence to bring unto his 
memory again those faces which he was wont to 
know — and where he faileth he shall hold his 
peace, neither betraying by semblance of surprise 
or other sign that he hath forgot; that upon oc- 
casions of State, whensoever any matter shall 
perplex him as to the thing he should do or the 
utterance he should make, he shall show nought 
pf unre§t to the curious that look on, but take 



 



TOM RECEIVI-^ INSTRUCTIONS. 59 

advice in that matter of the Lord Hertford, or 
my humble seif, which are commauded of the 
king to be upon this Service and close at call, 
tili this commandment be dissolved. Thus saith 
the king's majesty, who sendeth greeting to your 
royal highness, and prayeth that God will of His 
raercy quickly heal you and have you now and 
ever in His holy keeping." 

The Lord St. John made reverence and stood 
aside. Tom replied, resignedly — 

"The king hath said it. None may palter 
with the king's command, or fit it to his ease, 
where it doth chafe, with deft evasions. The 
king shall be obeyed." 

Lord Hertford said — 

"Touching the king's majesty's ordainment 
concerning books and such like serious matters it 
may peradventure please your highness to ease 
your time with lightsome entertainment, lest you 
go wearied to the banquet and suffer härm thereby." 

Tom's face showed inquiring surprise; and a 
blush foUowed when he saw Lord St. John's eyes 
bent sorrowfully upon him. His lordship said — 

"Thy memory still wrongeth thee, and thou 
hast shown surprise — but suifer it not to trouble 
thee, for His a matter that will not bide, but 



 



60 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

depart with thy mending malady. My Lord of 
Hertford speaketh of the city's banquet which the 
king's majesty did promise, some two months 
flown, your highness should attend. Thou re- 
callest it now?" 

"It grieves me to confess it had indeed 
escaped me," said Tom, in a hesitating voice; 
and blushed again. 

At this moment the Lady Elizabeth and the 
Lady Jane Grey were announced. The two lords 
exchanged significant glances, and Hertford 
stepped quickly toward the door. As the young 
girls passed him, he said in a low voice — 

"I pray ye, ladies, seem not to observe his 
humours, nor show surprise when his memory 
doth lapse — it will grieve you to note how it doth 
stick at every trifle." 

Meantime Lord St. John was saying in Tom*s 
ear — 

"Please you, sir, keep diligently in mind his 
majest/s desire. Remember all thou canst — 
seem to remember all eise. Let them not per- 
ceive that thou art much changed from thy wont, 
for thou knowest how tenderly thy old play- 
fellows bear thee in their hearts and how 'twould 

 IC 



TOM RECEIVES INSTRUCTIONS. 6l 

grieve them. Art willing, sir, that I remain? — 
and thine uncle?" 

Tom signified assent with a gesture and a 
murmured word, for he was already leaming, 
and in his simple heart was resolved to acquit 
himself as best he might, according to the king's 
command. 

In spite of every precaution, the conversation 
among the young people became a little embar- 
rassing at times. More than once, in tnith, Tom 
was near to breaking down and confessing him- 
self unequal to his tremendous part; but the tact 
of the Princess Elizabeth saved him, or a word 
from one or the other of the vigilant lords, thrown 
in apparently by chance, had the same happy 
effect Once the little Lady Jane turned to Tom 
and dismayed him with this question, — 

"Hast paid thy duty to the queen's majesty 
to-day, my lord?" 

Tom hesitated, looked distressed, and was 
about to stammer out something at hazard, when 
Lord St: John took the word and answered for 
him with the easy grace of a courtier accustomed 
to encounter delicate difficulties and to be ready 
for them — 

"He hath indeed, madam, and she did greatly 

 IC 



62 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

hearten him, as touching his majesty's condition; 
is it not so, your highness?" 

Tom mumbled something that stood for assent, 
but feit that he was getting upon dangerous ground. 
Somewhät later it was mentioned that Tom was 
to study no more at present, whereupon her little 
ladyship exclaimed — 

"'Tis a pity, 'tis such a pity! Thou wert 
proceeding bravely. But bidethy time in patience: 
it will not be for long. Thou'lt yet be graced 
with learning like thy father, and make thy 
tongue master of as many languages as his, good 
my prince." 

"My father!" cried Tom, off his guard for 
the moment. "I trow he cannot speak his own 
so that any but the swine that kennel in the styes 
may teil his meaning; and as for learning of any 
sort soever " 

He looked up and encountered a solemn warn- 
ing in my Lord St. John's eyes. 

He stopped, blushed, then continued low and 
sadly: "Ah, my malady persecuteth me again, 
and my mind wandereth. I meant the king's 
grace no irreverence." 

"We know it, sir," said the Princess Elizabeth, 
taking her "brother's" band between her two 

 IC 



TOM RECEIVES INSTRUCTIONS. 63 

palms, respectfully but caressingly; "trouble not 
thyself as to that The fault is none of thine, 
but thy distemper's." 

"Thou'rt a gentle comforler, sweet lady," said 
Tom, gratefully, "and my heart raoveth me to 
thank thee for't, an' I may be so bold." 

Once the giddy little Lady Jane fired a simple 
Greek phrase at Tom. The Princess Elizabeth's 
quick eye saw by the serene blankness of the 
target's front that the shaft was overshot; so she 
tranquilly delivered a retum volley of sounding 
Greek on Tom's behalf, and then straightway 
changed the talk to other matters. 

Time wore on pleasantly, and likewise smoothly, 
on the whole. Snags and sandbars grew less and 
less frequent, and Tom grew more and more at 
his ease, seeing that all were so lovingly bent 
upon helping him and overlooking his mistakes, 
When it came out that the little ladies were to 
accompany him to the Lord Mayor's banquet in 
the evening, his heart gave a bound of relief 
and delight, for he feit that he should not be 
friendless, now, among that multitude of strangers; 
whereas, an hour earlier, the idea of their going 
with him would have been an insupportable terror 
to him. 



 



64 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

Tom's guardian angels, . the two lords, had 
had less comfort in the interview than the other 
parties to it. They feh much as if they were 
piloting a great ship through a dangerous Channel; 
they were on the alert constantly, and found their 
Office no child's play. Wherefore, at last, when 
the ladies' visit was drawing to a close and the 
Lord Guilford Dudley was announced, they not 
only feit that their charge had been sufficiently 
taxed for the present, but also that they them- 
selves were not in the best condition to t9,ke their 
ship back and make their anxious voyage all 
over again. So they respectfully advised Tom to 
excuse himself, which he was very glad to do, 
although a slight shade of disappointment might 
have been gbserved upon my Lady Jane's face 
when she heard the splendid stripling denied 
admittance. 

There was a pause now, a sort of waiting 
silence which Tom could not understand. He 
glanced at Lord Hertford, who gave him a sign 
— but he failed to understand that also. The 
ready Elizabeth came to the rescue with her 
usual easy grace. She made reverence and said — 

"Have we leave of the prince's grace my 
brother to go?" 



 



TOM RECEIVES INSTRUCTIONS. 65 

Tom Said — 

"Indeed your ladyships can have whatsoever 
of me they will, for the asking; yet would I rather 
give them any othei« thing that in my poor power 
lieth, than leave to take the light and blessing of 
their presence hence. Give ye good den, and 
God be with ye!" Then he smiled inwardly at 
the thought, " 'Tis not for nought I have dwelt 
but among princes in my reading, and taught my 
tongue some slight trick of their broidered and 
gracious speech withal!" 

When the illustrious maidens were gone, Tom 
turned wearily to his keepers and said — 

"May it please your lordships to grant me 
leave to go into some corner and rest me?" 

Lord Hertford said — 

"So please your highness, it is for you to 
command, it is for us to obey. That thou shouldst 
rest is indeed a need(ul thing, since thou must 
joumey to the city presently." 

He touched a bell, and a page appeared, 
who was ordered to desire the presence of Sir 
William Herbert. This gentleman came straight- 
way, and conducted Tom to an inner apartment. 
Tom's first movement there was to reach for a 
cup of water; but a silk-and-velvet servitor seized 

The Prince and ihe Pauper, /. 5 

 IC 



66 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

it, dropped upon one knee, and offered it to him 
on a golden salver. 

Next the tjred captive sat down and was 
going to take off his buskins, ^imidly asking leave 
with his eye, but another silk-and-velvet disGom- 
forter went down upon his knees and took the 
Office from him. He made two or three further 
efforts to help himself, but being promptly fore- 
stalled each time, he finally gave up, with a 
sigh of resignation and a murmured "Beshrew 
me, but I marvel they do not require to breathe 
for me also!" Slippered, and wrapped in a 
sumptuous robe, he laid himself down at last to 
rest, but not to sleep, for his head was too füll 
of thoughts and the room too füll of people. He 
could not dismiss the former, so they stayed; he 
did not know enough to dismiss the latter, so 
they stayed also, to his vast regret — and theirs. 

Tom's departure had left his two noble 
guardians alone. They mused a while, with much 
head-shaking and Walking the floor, then Lord 
St. John Said — 

"Plainly, what dost thou think?" 

"Plainly, then, this. The king is near his 
end; my nephew is mad — mad will mount the 



 



TOM RECEIVES INSTRUCTIONS. 67 

throne, and mad remain. God protect England, 
since she will need it!" 

"Verily it promiseth so, indeed. But . . , 
have you no misgivings as to . . . as to . . /' 

The Speaker hesitated, and finally stopped. 
He evidently feit that he was upon delicate 
ground. Lord Hertford stopped before him, looked 
into his face with a clear, frank eye, and said — 

"Speak on — there is none to hear but me. 
Misgivings as to what?" 

"I am füll loath to word the thing that is in 
my mind, and thou so near to him in blood, my 
lord. But craving pardon if I do offend, seemeth 
it not Strange that madness could so change his 
port and manner? — not but that his port and 
Speech are princely still, but that they differ^ in 
one unweighty trifte or another, from what his 
custom was aforetime. Seemeth it not stränge 
that madness should filch from his memory his 
father's very lineaments; the customs and ob- 
servances that are his due from such as be about 
him; and, leaving him his Latin, strip him of his 
Greek and French? My lord, be not offended, 
but ease my mind of its disquiet and receive my 
grateful thanks. It haunteth me, his saying he 

was not the prince, and so " 

5* 

 IC 



68 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

"Peace, my lord, thou utterest treason! Hast 
forgot the king's command? Remember I am 
party to thy crime if I but listen." ' 

St John paled, and hastened to say — 

"I was in fault, I do confess it. Betray me 
not, grant me this grace out of thy courtesy and 
I will neither think nor speak of this thing 
more. Deal not hardly with me, sir, eise am I 
ruined/* 

"I am Content, my lord. So thou ojßend not 
again, here or in the ears of others, it shall be 
as though thou hadst not spoken. But thou needst 
not have misgivings. He is my sister's son; are 
not his voice, his face, his form, familiär to me 
from his cradle? Madness can do all the odd 
conflicting things thou seest in him, and more. 
Dost not recall how that the old Baron Marley, 
being mad, forgot the favour of his own coun- 
tenance that he had known for sixty years, and 
held it was another's; nay, even claimed he was 
the son öf Mary Magdalene, and that his head 
was made of Spanish glass; and, sooliie.tosay, 
he sufFered none to touch it, lest by mischance 
9ome heedless hand might shiver it? Give thy 
misgivings easement, good my lord. - This is the 



 



TOM RECEIVES INSTRUCTIONS. 69 

veiy prince — I know him well — and soon will 
be thy king; it may advantage thee to bear 
this in mind, and more dwell upon it than the 

other." 

After some further talk, in which the Lord 
Sl John oovered up his mistake as well as he 
could by repeated protests that his faith was 
thoroughly gronnded now, and could not be as- 
sailed by doubts again, the Lord Hertford relieved 
his fellow-keeper, and sat down to keep watch 
and ward alone. He was soon deep in medita- 
tion, and evidently the longer he thought, the 
more he was bothered. By and by he began to 
pace the floor and mutter. 

"Tush, he musi be the prince! Will any he 
in all the land raaintain there can be two, not of 
one blood and birth, so inarvellously twinned? 
And even were it so,* 'twere yet a stranger miracle 
that Chance should cast the one into the other's 
place. Nay, 'tis folly, folly, folly!" 

Presently he said — 

"Now were he impostor and called himself 
prince, look you that would be natural; that would 
be reasonable. But lived ever an impostor yet, 
who, being called prince by the king, prince by ' 

 IC 



70 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

the court, prince by all, dented his dignity and 
pleaded against his exaltation? No! By the soul 
of St. Swithin, no! This is the true prince, gone 
mad!" 



 



TOM'S FIRST ROYAL DINNER. 



 



gtasdb 



CHAPTER VII. 
TOM'S FIRST ROYAL DINNER. 

SoMEWHAT after one in the aftemoon, Tom re- 
signedly underwent the ordeal of being dressed 
for dinner. He found himself as finely clothed 
as before, but everything different, everything 
changed, from bis ruff to bis stockings. He was 
presentiy conducted witb much State to a spacious 
and oraate apartment, wbere a table was already 
set for one. Its fumiture was all of massy gold, 
and beautified witb designs wbich well-nigb made 
it priceless, since they were tbe work of Benvenuto. 
The room was balf-fiUed witb noble servitors. A 
chaplain said grace, and Tom was about to fall 
to, for hunger bad long been constitutional witb 
him, but was interrupted by my lord tbe Earl of 
Berkeley, wbo fastened a napkin about bis neck; 
for the great post of Diaperers to tbe Princes of 
Wales was hereditary in tbis nobleman's family. 
Tom's cupbearer was present, and forestalied all 

 IC 



74 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

his attempts to belp himself to wine. The Taster 
to his highness the Prince of Wales was there 
also, prepared to taste any suspicious dish upon 
requirement, and run the risk of being poisoned. 
He was only an ornamental appendage at this 
time, and was seldom called upon to exercise his 
function; but there had been times, not many 
generations past, when the office of taster had 
its perils, and was not a grandeur to be desired. 
Why they did not use a dog or a plumber seems 
Strange; but all the ways of royalty are stränge. 
My Lord d'Arcy, First Groom of the Chamber, 
was there, to do goodness knows what; but. there 
he was — let that suffice. The Lord Chief Butler 
was there, and stood behind Tom's chair, over- 
seeing the solemnities, under command of the 
Lord Great Steward and the Lord Head Cook, 
who stood near. Tom had three hundred and 
eighty-four servants beside these; but they were 
not all in that room, of course, nor the quarter 
of them; neither was Tom aware yet that they 
existed. 

All those that were present had been well 
drilled within the hour to remember that the 
prince was temporarily out of his head, and to 
be careful to show no surprise at his Wgarie^, 

 IC 



TOM's FIRST ROYAL DINNER. 75 

These "vagaries" were soon on exhibition before 
them; but they only moved their compassion and 
their sorrow, not their mirth. It was a heavy 
affliction to them to see the beloved prince so 
stricken. 

Poor Tom ate with bis fingers mainly; but no 
one smiled at it, or even seemed to observe it 
He inspected bis napkin curiously, and with 
deep interest, for it was of a very dainty and 
beautiful fabric, then said with simplicity — 

"Prithee, take it away, lest in mine unheed- 
fulness it be soiled." 

The Hereditary Diaperer took it away with 
reverent manner, and without word or protest of 
any sort. 

Tom examined the turnips and the lettuce 
with interest, and asked what they were, and if 
they were to be eaten; for it was only recently 
that men had begmi to raise these things in 
England in place of importing them as luxuries 
from Holland.* His question was answered with 
grave respect, and no surprise manifested. When 
he had finished his dessert, he fiUed his pockets 

See Note 4, at end of volume II. 

 IC 



76 THE PRINCE AND TME PAUPER. 

with nuts; but nobody appeared to be aware of 
it, or disturbed by it. But the next moment he 
was himself disturbed by it, and showed discom- 
posure; for this was the only Service he had been 
permitted to do with his own hands during the 
meal, and he did not doubt that he had döne a 
most improper and unprincely thing. At that 
moment the muscles of his nose began to twitch, 
and the end of that organ to lift and wrinkle. 
This continued, and Tom began to evince a 
growing distress. He looked appealingly, first at 
one and then another of the lords about him, 
and tears came into his eyes. They 'sprang for- 
ward with dismay in their faces, and begged to 
know his trouble. Tom said with genuine an- 
guish — 

"I crave your indulgence: my nose itcheth 
cruelly. AVhat is the custom and usage in this 
emergence? Prithee, speed, for 'tis but a little 
time that I can bear it." 

None smiled; but all were sore perplexed, 
and looked one to the other in deep tribulation 
for counsel. But behold, here was a dead wall, 
and nothing in English history to teil how to get 
over it. The Master of Ceremonies was not pre- 
sent: there was no one who feit safe to venture 

 IC 



TOM'S FIRST ROYAL DINNER. ^^ 

upon this uncharted sea, or risk the attempt to 
solve this solemn problem. Alasl there was no 
Hereditary Scratcher. Meantime the tears had 
overfiowed their banks, and begun to trickle down 
Tom's cheeks. His twitching nose was pleading 
more urgently than ever for relief. At last nature 
broke down the barriers of etiquette: Tom lifted 
up an inward prayer for pardon if he was doing 
wrong, and brought relief to the burdened hearts 
of his court by scratching his nose himself. 

His meal being ended, a lord came and held 
before him a broad, shallow, golden dish with 
fragrant rose-water in it, to cleanse his mouth 
and fingers with; and my lord the Hereditary 
Diaperer stood by with a napkin for his use. 
Tom gazed at the dish a puzzled moment or two, 
then raised it to his lips, and gravely took a 
draught Then he returned it to the waiting lord, 
and Said — 

"Nay, it likes me not, my lord: it hath a 
pretty fiavour, but it wanteth strength." 

This new eccentricity of the prince's ruined 
mind made all the hearts about him ache; but 
the sad sight moved none to merriment. 

Tom's next unconscious blunder was to get up 



 



78 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

and leave the table just when the chaplain had 
taken his stand behind bis chair, and with up- 
lifted hands, and closed, uplifted eyes, was in 
the act of beginning the blessing. Still nobody 
seemed to perceive that the prince had done a 
thing unusuaL 

By his own request our small friend was now 
conducted to his private cabinet, and left there 
alone to his own devices. Hanging upon hooks 
in the oaken wainscotting were the several pieces 
of a suit of shining steel armour, covered all over 
with beautiful designs exquisitely inlaid in gold. 
This martial panoply belonged to the true prince 
— a recent present from Madam Parr the Queen. 
Tom put on the greaves, the gauntlets, the plumed 
helmet, and such other pieces as he could don 
without assistance, and for a while was minded 
to call for help and complete the matter, but 
bethought him of the nuts he had brought away 
from dinner, and the joy it would be to eat them 
with no crowd to eye him, and no Grand Here- 
ditaries to pester him with undesired Services; so 
he restored the pretty things to their several 
places, and soon was Cracking nuts, and feeling 
almost naturally happy for the iirst time since 
God for his sins had made him a prince. When 



 



TOM's FIRST ROYAL DINNER. 79 

the nuts were all gone, he stumbled upon some 
inviting books in a closet, among them one about 
the etiquette of the English court This was a 
prize. He lay down upon a sumptuous divan, 
and proceeded to instnict himself with honest 
zeal. Let us leave him there for the present. 



 



 IC 



THE QUESTION OF THE SEAL. 



TV P^^t^* ^^ *^ Pau^fr, /. 



 



V Google 



CHAPTER VIII. 
THE QXJESTION OF THE SEAL. 

About five o'clock Henry Vnj. awoke out of 
an unrefreshing nap, and muttered to himself, 
"Troublous dreams, troublous dr^ams! Mine end 
is now at hand: so say these wamings, and my 
failing pulses do confirm it." Presently a wicked 
light flamed up in his eye, and he muttered, 
"Yet will not I die tili he go before." 

His attendants perceiving that he was awake, 
one of them asked his pleasure concerning the 
Lord Chancellor, who was waiting without. 

"Admit him, admit him!" exclaimed the King 
eagerly. 

The Lord Chancellor entered, and knelt by 
the King's couch, saying — 

"I have given order, and, according to the 
King's command, the peers of the realm, in their 
robes, do now stand at the bar of the House, 
where, having confinned the Duke of Norfolk's 



 



84 THE PRINCE AND THE PAXJPER. 

doom, they humbly wait his majest/s fi 
pleasure in the jnatter/' 

The King's Tace lit up with a iierce joy. 
he— 

"Lift me up! In mine own person wil 
before my Parliament, and with mine own 
will I sejl the Warrant that rids me of 

His voice failed; an ashen pallor swej 
fiush from his^cheeks; and the attendants 
him back upon his pillows, and hurriedly as 
him with restoratives. Presently he said s< 
fully— 

"Alack, how have I longed for this 
honrl and lo, too late it cometh, and I am r 
of this so coveted chance. But speed ye, 
yel let others do this happy office sith 'tis c 
to me. I put my Great Seal in commi 
choose thou the lords that shall compose i1 
get ye to your work. Speed ye, man! 3 
the sun shall rise and set again, bring n 
head that I may see it." 

"According to the King's command, so 
it be. Wiirt please your majesty to orde; 
the Seal be now restored to me, so that 
forth upon the business?" 

"The Seal? Who keepeth the Seal but t 



 



THE QXJESTION OF THE SEAL. 85 

'^Please your majesty, you did take it from 
me two days since> saying it sh^ld no more do 
its Office tili your own royal band should use it 
upon the Duke of Norfolk's Warrant." 

" Why, so in sooth I did: I do remember it . . . . 
What did I with it? ... I am very feeble. ... So 
oft these da)rs doth my memory play the traitor 
with me. . . . 'Tis stränge, stränge " 

The King dropped into inarticulate mumblings, 
shaking his grey head weakly from time to time, 
and gropingly trybg to recollect what he had 
done with the Seal. At last my Lord Hertford 
ventured to kneel and offer Information — 

"Sire, if that I may be so bold, here be several 
that do reinember with me how that you gave the 
Great Seal into the hands of his highness the 
Prince of Wales to keep against the day that " 

"True, most true!" intemipted the King. 
"Fetch it! Go: time flieth!" 

Lord Hertford flew to Tom, but retumed to the 
King before very long, troubled and empty-handed. 
He delivered himself to this effect — 

"It grieveth me, my lord the King, to bear so 
heavy and unwelcome tidings; but it is the will 
of God that the prince's affliction abideth still, 
and he cannot recall to mind that he received 



 



86 



TSm PRECCE ÄND THE PAUPElL 



the Seal, So came I quickly lo report, thi 
it were waste af precioiis limej and little 
wilhal, that any sliould allempt to searc 
long array of Chambers and saloOQs that t 
uolü his royal high — — " 

A. groan from the King intemipted mj 
at this point After a little while his ni 
Said, with a deep sadness in his tone — 

"Trouble him no more, poor child, Tlie 
of God lieth heavy upon him, atid my 
goeth out in loving corapassion for him, an 
row that I may not bear his bürden on 
own old trouble-weighted Shoulders, and so 
him peace." 

He closed his eyes, feil to mumbling 
presently was silent. After a lime he openi 
6yes again, and gazed vacantly around un 
glance rested upon the kneeling Lord Chan 
Instantly his face flushed with wralh^ — 

"\Vhat, thou here yet! By the glory oj 
am' thou gettest not about that txaitor's bui 
thy mitre shall have holiday the morrow fo 
of a head to grace withal ! '' 

The trerabling Chancellor answered — • 

"Good your majesty, I cry you mercyl 
waited for the Seal" 



db 



THE QUESTION OF THE SEAL. 87 

"Man, hast lost thy wits? The small Seal 
which aforetime I was wont to take with me 
abroad lieth in my treasury. And, since the 
Great Seal hath flown away, shall not it suffice? 
Hast lost thy wits? Begone! And hark ye — 
come no more tili thou do bring his head." 

The poor Chancellor was not long in removing 
himself from this dangerous vicinity; nor did the 
commission waste time in giving the royal assent 
to the work of the slavish Parliament, and ap- 
pointing the morrow for the beheading of the 
Premier peer of England, the luckless Duke of 
Norfolk.* 

♦ See Note 5, at cnd of volume IL 



 



vGoogle 



THE RIVER PAGEANT. 



 



db 



CHAPTER IX. 

THE RIVER PAGEANT. 
I 

At nine in the evening the whole vast river- 
front of the palace was blazing with light. The 
river itself, as far as the eye could reach city- 
wards, was so thickly covered with watermen's 
boats and with pleasure-barges, all fringed with 
coloured lanterns, and gently agitated by the 
waves, that it resembled a glowing and limitless 
garden of flowers stirred to soft motion by summer 
winds. The grand terrace of stone Steps leading 
down to the water, spacious enough to mass the 
army of a German principality upon, was a 
picture to see, with its ranks of royal halberdiers 
in polished armour, and its troops of brilliantly 
costumed servitors flitting up and down, and to 
and fro, in the hurry of preparation. 

Presently a command was given, and im- 
mediately all living creatures vanished from the 
Steps. Now the air was heavy with the hush of 

 IC 



gz 



THE PRtNCE ANB THK PAUPER, 



suspense and expectancy, As far as one's 
could carry, he might see the myriads of ] 
in the boats rise up, and shade thcir eyes 
the glare of lanterns and torches^ and ga 
wards the palace. 

A iile of forty or fif^ State barges drew 
the Steps. They were richly gilt, and thei 
prows and Sterns were elaborately carved, 
of them were decorated with banners 
streamers; some with cloth-of-gold and 
embroidered with coats of-arms; others with 
flags that had numberless little silver 
fastened to them, which shook out tiny s] 
of joyous music whenever the breezes fli 
Ihemj others of yet higher pretensioas, sine 
belonged to nobles in the prince^s imm 
Service, had their sides picturesqviely fence 
shields gorgeously emblai^oned with armoria 
ings. Each State bärge was towed hy a 1 
Be sides the rowers, these tenders carried < 
niimber of men-at-arms in glossy helmc 
breaslplate, and a Company of musicians. 

The advance-guard of the expected pro* 
now appeared in the great gateway, a tr 
halberdiers* **They were dressed in stripe 
of black and tawny, velvet caps graced 



V Google 



THE RIVER PAGEANT. Q3 

sides with silver roses, and doubkts of murrey 
and blue doth, embroidered on the front and 
back with. the three feathers, the prince's blazoQ, 
woven in gold. Their halberd staves were covered 
with crimson velvet, fastened with gilt nails, and 
omamented with gold tasseis. Filing off on the 
right and left, they fonned two long lines, ex- 
tending from the gateway of the palace to the 
water's edge. A thick, rayed cloth or carpet was 
then unfoldedy and laid down between them by 
attendants in the gold-and-crimson liveries of the 
prince. This done, a flourish of trumpets re- 
sounded from within. A lively prelude arose 
from the musicians on the water; and two ushers 
with white wands marched with a slow and 
stately pace from the portal. They were foUowed 
by an ofiicer bearing the civic mace; after whom 
came another carrying the city's sword; then 
several sergeants of the city guard, in their füll 
accoutrements, and with badges on their sleeves; 
then the garter king-at-arms, in his tabard; then 
several knights of the bath, each with a white 
lace on his sleeve; then their esquires; then the 
judges, in their robes of scarlet and coifs; then 
the lord high chancellor of England, in a robe 
of scarlet, open before, and purfled with minever; 



 



94 



THE PRINCF, AND THE PAUPER, 



then a depulation of aldermen, in theii 
cloaks j and tlien the heads of ihe difTerc 
companies, in their robes of state. No 
iwelve French gentlemen, in splendid hab; 
cansisting of pourpoints of white damas1< 
with gold, Short mantks of crimson velv 
with violet taifeta, and camation-coloure* 
de-chausse^^ and took their way down th 
They were of the suite of the French. amb 
and were foUowed by twelve cavaliers of t 
of the Spanish ambassador, dothed ii 
velvet, unrelieved by any Ornament. Fi 
these came several great English nobl 
their attendants/' 

There was a fiourisli of trumpets with 
the prince's uiiclej the future great I 
Somerset, emerged from the gateway, an 
a "doublet of black cloth-of-gold, and a 
crimson salin flowered with gold, and r 
with nets of silver/^ He turned^ doffed bis 
cap, bent his body in a low reverence, ani 
to Step backwardj bowing at each step, 
longed tmmpet-lilast followed, and a procb 
**Way for the high and mighty, the Lord ] 
Prince of Wales T' High aloft on the 
walls a long line of red tongues of flame 



 



THE RIVER PAGEANT. 95 

forth with a thunder-crash; the massed world 
on the river burst into a mighty roar of welcome; 
and Tom Canty, the cause and hero of it all, 
stepped into view and slightly bowed his princely 
head. 

He was "magnificently habited in a doublet 
of white satin, with a front-piece of purple cloth- 
of-tissue, powdered with diamonds, and edged 
with ermine. Over this he wore a mantle of 
white cloth-of-gold, pounced with the triple- 
feather crest, lined with blue satin, set with 
pearls and precious stones, and fastened with a 
clasp of brilliants. About his neck hung the 
Order of the Carter, and several princely foreign 
Orders;" and wherever light feil upon him jewels 
responded with a blinding flash. O Tom Canty, 
bom in a hovel, bred in the gutters of London, 
familiär with rags and dirt and misery, what a 
spectacle is this! 



 




db 



THE PRINCE IN THE TOILS. 



The Prmce and Hu Pau^ir. J. 



 IC 




db 



CHAPTER X. 
TEIE PRINCE IH THE TOILS. 

We left John Canty dragging the rightful 
prince intoOffal Court, with a noisy and delighted 
mob at his heels. There was but one person in 
it who ofifered a pleading word for the captive 
and he was not heeded: he was hardly even 
heard, so great was the turmoil. The prince con- 
tinued to struggle for freedom, and to rage against 
the treatment he was suffering, until John Canty 
lost what little patience was left in him, and 
raised his oaken cudgel in a sudden fury over 
the prince's head. The single pleader for the 
lad sprang to stop the man's arm, and the blow 
descended upon his own wrisU Canty roared 
out, — 

"Thou'lt meddle, wilt thou? Then have thy 
reward." 

His cüdgel crashed down upon the meddler's 
head: there was a groan, a dim form sank to the 

 IC 



lOO 



THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 



ir 



ground among the feet of the crowd, a 
next moment it lay there in the dark aloc 
mob pressed on, their enjo)niient nothing di 
by this episode. 

Presently the prince found himself i 
Canty's abode, with the door closed agai 
Outsiders. By the vague light of a tallpw 
which was thnist into a bottle, he made 
main features of the loathsome den, and i 
occupants of it. Two frowzy girls and a : 
aged woman cowered against the wall 
corner, with the aspect of animals habitu 
harsh usage, and expecting and dreadiiig 
From another corner stole a withered hs 
Streaming grey hair and malignant eyes. 
Canty said to this one, — 

"Tarry! There's fine mummeries here 
them not tili thoü'st enjoyed them: then 
hand be heavy as thou wilt. — Stand fort 
Now say thy foolery again, an theu'st noi 
it. Name thy name. Who art thou?" 

The insulted blood mounted to th< 
prince's cheek once more, and he lifted a 
and indignant gaze to the man's face and 

"'Tis but ill-breeding in such as thou 
mand me to speak. I teil thee now, as 



1 



 



THE PRINCE IN THE TOILS. 40I 

thee before, I am Edward, Prince of Wales, and 
none other." 

The stunning surprise of this reply nailed the 
hag's feet to the floor where she stood, and almost 
took her breath. She stared at the prince in 
stupid amazement, which so amused her rufüanly 
soB, that he bnrst into a roar of laughter. But 
the efifect upon Tom Canty's mother and sisters 
wzs different Their dread of bodily injury gave 
way at once to distress of a different sort They 
ran forward with woe and dismay in their faces, 
e:xdaiming, — 

"Oh, poor Tom, poor lad!" 

The mother feil on her knees before the 
prince, put her hands upon his Shoulders, and 
gazed yeamingly into his face through her rising 
tears. Then she said, — 

"Oh, my poOT boy! thy foolish reading hath 
wrought its woeful work at last, and ta'en thy wit 
away. Ah! why didst thou cleave to it when I 
so wamed thee 'gainst it? Thou'st broke thy 
mothefs heart" 

The prince looked into her face, and said 
gently,— 

^Thy son is well, and hath not lost his witSj 
good dame« Comfort thee: let me to the palace 

 IC 



tOJ! 



TflE mmCB AND THE PAUPSIL 



where he is, and straiglitway will the Ki 
father restore him to thee." 

«The King thy father! Oh, my child! 
these words that be freighted with death fc 
and ruin for all thal be near to thee. Sh 
this gmesome dream. Call back thy 
wandering memory. Look upon me. Am 
thy mother that bore thee, and loveth thee 

The prince shook his head and relu 
saidj^ 

'*God knoweth I am loth to grieve thy 
but tnily have I never looked upon thy ü 
fore." 

The woman sank back to a sitting post 
the floor, and, covering her eyes with her 
gave way to heart-broken sobs and w^aÜing 

"T.et the show go on !'* shouted Canty, ' 
Nanl — what, Bet! mannerless w^enches! ^ 
stand in the prince*s presence? Upon yoiu- 
ye panper scum, and do hlm reverencel" 

He foUowed this with another horse 
The girls began to plead timidly for their b 
and Nan said, — 

"An thoti wilt but let him to bed, fath< 
and sleep will heal his madness: prithee, c 

**Dö^ father " said Bet? "he is more 



 



THE PRINCE IN THE TOILS. IO3 

than IS his wont To-morrow will he be himself 
again, and will beg with diligence, and come not 
empty home again." 

This remark sobered the father's joviality, and 
brought his mind to business. He tumed angrily 
upon the prince, and said, — 

"The morrow must we pay two pennies to 
him that owns this hole; two pennies, mark ye, — 
all this money for a half-year's rent, eise out of 
this we go. Show what thou'st gathered with thy 
lazy begging." 

The prince said, — 

"Offend me not with thy sordid matters. I 
teil thee again I am the King's son." 

A sounding blow upon the prince's Shoulder 
from Canty*s broad palm sent him staggering 
mto goodwife Cant/s arms, who clasped him to 
her breast, and sheltered him from a pelting rain 
of cuflfs and slaps by interposing her own person. 
The frightened girls retreated to their corner. 
but the grandmother stepped eagerly forward to 
assist her son. The prince sprang away from 
Mrs. Canty, exclaiming, — 

"Thou shalt not suffer for me, madam. Let 
these swine do their will upon me alone.*' 

This speech unfuriated the swine to such a 



 



104 mE PRIKCE ASÜ THE J^AUPER. 

degree thal they set about their work ^ 
waste of time. Belween them ihey bela 
the boy right soundly, and then gave tb 
and their mother ä basting for showing syi 
foT the victim. 

"Now/' Said Canty, **to bed^ all of ye 
entertairtment has tired ine," 

The light was put out, and the family 
Äs soon as the snorings of the head of the 
and his mother showed that they were 
the young girls crept to where th^ priti 
and covered him tenderly from the co! 
straw and ra^> and theif mother crept 
also, and stfoked his hair, and cried ove 
whispering broken words of conafort an* 
passion in his ear the while, She had s 
morsel for him to eat, also; but the hoy* 
had swept away all appetite, — at least fo 
and tasteless cnists. He was touched 
brave and costly defence of him, and 
commiseration^ and he thanked her in ver 
and princely words, and begged her to go 
sleep and try to forget her sörrows. A 
added that the King his fatJier would not 
loyal kindness and devotion go unrewardec 
return to his "madness" broke her heart 



vGoogle 



. THE PRINCE IN THE TOILS. IO5 

and she strained him to her breast again and 
again, and then went back, drowned in tears, to 
her bed 

^As she lay thinking and mouming, the sug- 
gesticm began to creep into her mind that there 
was an undefinable something about this boy that 
was lacking in Tom Canty, mad or sane. She 
coold not describe it, she could not teil just what 
it was, and yet her sharp mother-instinct seemed 
to detect it and perceive it What if the boy 
were really not her son, after all? Oh, absurd! 
She almost smiled at the idea, spite of her griefs 
and troubles. No matter, she found that it was 
an idea that would not "down," but persisted in 
haunting her. It pursued her, it harassed her, it 
clung to her, and refused to be put away or 
ignored.* At last she perceived that there was 
not going to be any peace for her until she should 
devise a test that should prove, clearly and with- 
out question, whether this lad was her son or not, 
and so banish these wearing and worrying doubts. 
Ah, yes, this was plainly the right way out of the 
difficulty; therefore she set her wits to work at 
once to contrive that test But it was an easier 
thing to propose than to accomplish. She tumed 
over in her mind one promising test after an- 



 



THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER, 

other, but was obliged to relinquish tln 
none of them were absolutely sure, absoh 
fectj and an imperfect one could not sa 
Evidently she was racking ber bead in 
seemed raanifest that sbe must give Ün 
up, While this depressing thought was 
through her mind, her ear caugbt the 
breathmg of the boy, aiid she knew he h 
asleep. And while she listened, the t 
breathing was broken by a soft, startled i 
as one utters in a troubled dream. Thii 
occurrence fumished her instantly with 
worth all her laboured tests combined 
once set herseif feverishly, but noiselessly 
to relight her candle, muttering to herse 
I but Seen him /Amt I should have know 
that day, when he was little, that the 
burst in bis face, he hath never been st 
a sudden out of his dreams or out of h 
ings, but he hath cast his band before 
even as he did that day; and not as othe 
do itj with the palm in ward, bot always 
palm tumed outward — I have seen it a 
times, and it hath never varied nor evc 
Yes, I shall soon know, now!" 

By this time she had crept to the sli 



 



THE PRIKCE IN THE TOILS. I07 

bo/s side, with the candle, shaded, in her band. 
She bent beedfully and warily over bim, scarcely 
breathing in her suppressed excitement, and 
suddenly flasbed tbe ligbt in bis face and Struck 
the floor by bis ear witb ber knuckles. The 
sleeper's eyes sprung wide open, and be cast a 
Startled stare about bim— but be made no special 
movement witb bis bands. 

The poor woman was smitten almost belpless 
with surprise and grief; but sbe contrived to bide 
her emotions, and to sootbe the boy to sleep 
again; then sbe crept apart and communed 
miserably witb berself upon tbe disastrous result 
of her experiment She tried to believe tbat ber 
Tom's madness bad banished tbis babitual gesture 
of his; })ut sbe could not do it "No/* she said, 
'^his hands are not mad, they could not unleam 
so old a babit in so brief a time. Ob, this is a 
heavy day for me!*' 

Still, hope was as stubbom now as doubt bad 
been before; sbe could not bring berself to accept 
the verdict of the test; she must try the thing 
again — ^the failure must bave been only an ac- 
cident; so sbe startled tbe boy out of bis sleep a 
second and a tbird time, at intervals — witb tbe 
same result which bad marked the first test; 

 IC 



io8 



THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 



ü 



n 



^ 

■J 



then she dragged herseif to bed, and feil sorr( 
fuUy asleep, saying, "But I cannot give him 
— oh no, I cannot, I cannot — he musi be 
boy!" 

The poor mother's intemiptions having ceas 
and the prince's pains having gradually lost th 
power to disturb him, utter weariness at ] 
sealed his eyes in a profound and restful sk 
Hour after hour slipped away, and still he sl 
like the dead. Thus four or five honrs pass 
Then his Stupor began to lighten. Presei 
while half asleep and half awake, he. n 
mured, — 

"Sir William!" 

After a moment — 

"Ho, Sir William Herbert! Hie thee hit] 
and list to the strängest dream that ever . . . 
William! dost hear? Man, I did think me chanj 
to a pauper, and . . . Ho there! Guards! 
William! What! is there no groom of 
Chamber in waiting? Alack! it shall go h 
with- " 

"What aileth thee?" asked a whisper n 
him. "Whom art thou c^Uing?" 

"Sir William Herbert. Who art thou?" 

"I? Who should I be, but thy sister N 



db 



' THE PRINCE IN THE tOILS. IO9 

Oh, Tom, I had forgotl Thou'rt mad yet — poor 
lad, thou'rt mad yet, would I had never woke to 
know it again! But prithee master thy tongue, 
lest we be all beaten tili we die!" 

The Startled prince sprang partly up, but a 
Sharp reminder from his stifTened bruises brought 
him to himself, and he sunk back among his 
foul straw with a moan and the ejaculation, — 

**Alas! it was no dream, thenl** 

In a moment all the heavy sorrow and misery 
which sleep had banished were upon him again, 
and he realised that he was no longer a petted 
prince in a palace, with the adoring eyes of a 
nation upon him, but a pauper, an outcast, clothed 
in rags, prisoner in a den fit only for beasts, and 
consorting with beggars and thieves. 

In the midst of his grief he began to be con- 
scious of hilarious noises and shoutings, apparently 
but a block or two away. The next moment 
there were several sharp raps at the door; John 
Canty ceased from snoring and said, — 

«Who knocketh? What wilt thou?" 

A voice answered, — 

**Know'st thou who it was thou laid thy 
cudgel on?" 

"No. Neither know I, nor care." 



 



HO 



THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 



"Belike thou'lt change thy note eftsoons. 
thou would save thy neck, nothing but flight 
stead thee. The man is this moment delive 
up the ghost Tis the priest, Father Andrew 

**God-a-mercy!" exdaimed Canty. He roi 
his family, and hoarsely commanded, "Up 
ye all and fly— or bide where ye are and perii 

Scarcely five minutes later the Canty hc 
hold were in the street and flying for their 1 
John Canty held the prince by the wrist, 
hurried him along the dark way, giving him 
caution in a low voice, — 

"Mind thy tongue, thou mad fool, and si 
not our name. I will choose me a new m 
speedily, to throw the law's dogs ofF the s( 
Mind thy tongue, I teil thee!" 

He growled these words to the rest of 
family, — 

"If it so Chance that we be separated, 
each make for London Bridge; whoso fim 
himself as far as the last linendraper's shoj 
the bridge, let him tarry there tili the other 
come, then will we flee into Southwark togetl 
. At this moment the party burst suddenly 
of darkness into light; and not only into 1 
but into the midst of a multitude of sinj 



db 



THE PRINCE IN THE TOILS. 1 1 1 

dandng, and shouting pecple, massed together on 
the river frontage. There was a line of bonfires 
stretching as far as one oould see, up and down 
the Thames; London Bridge was illuminated; 
Southwark Bridge likewise; the entire river was 
aglow with the flash and sheen of coloured lights; 
and constant explosions of fireworks fiUed the 
skies with an intricate commingling of shooting 
splendours and a thick rain of dazzling sparks 
that abnost tumed night into day; everywhere 
were crowds of revellers; all London seemed to 
be at large. 

John Canty delivered himself of a furious 
cuTse and commanded a retreat; but it was too 
late. He and his tribe were swallowed up in 
that swarming hive of humanity, and hopelessly 
separated from each other in an instant We are 
not Gonsidering that the prince was one of his 
tribe; Canty still kept his grip upon him. The 
prince's heart was beating high with hopes of 
escape, now. A burly waterman, considerably 
exalted with liquor, found himself rudely shoved, 
by Canty in his eflforts to plough through the 
aowd; he laid his great band on Canty's Shoulder 
and Said — 

*Nay, whither so fast, friend? Dost canker 



 



ii 



! 12 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

thy soul with sordid business when all tha 
leal men and trae make holiday?" 

"Mine afTairs are mine own, they cöncem 
not " answered Canty, roughly; "Uke awa] 
band and let me pass," 

"Sith that is thy humour, thoult nvi 
tili thoii'st drunk to the Prince of Wales, ] 
thee that/' said the waterman, barring the 
resolutely. 

"Give me the cup, then, and make sj 
tnake speed!" 

Üther reveilers were interested by this t 
l'hey cried out — 

"The loving-cup, the loving-cupt inake 
sour knave dxink the loving-cup, eise will we 
bim to the fish es/' 

So a huge ioving-cap was brought; the w, 
man, grasping it by one of its handles, and 
his other band bearing up the end of an imagi 
napkin, preseoted it in due and ancient fori 
Canty, who had to grasp the opposite ha 
with one of his hands and take oflf the lid 
the other, according to ancient custöm,* 
left the prince hand-free for a second, of coi 

• See Note 6, at end of volume II, 



V Google - 



THE PRINCE IN THE TOILS. 1 1 3 

He wasted no timCy but dived among the forest 
of legs about him and disappeared. In another 
moment he could not have been harder to find, 
under that tossing sea of life, if its biUows had 
been the Atlantic's and he a lost sixpence. 

He very soon realised this fact, and straight- 
way busied himself about his own afiairs without 
ftirfher thought of John Canty. He quickly 
realised another thing, too. To wit, that a 
spurious Prince of Wales was being feasted by 
the city in his stead. He easily concluded that 
the pauper lad, Tom Canty, had deliberately 
taken advantage of his stupendous opportunity 
ani become a usurper. 

Therefore there was but one course to pursue 
—find his way to the Guildhall, make himself 
known, and denounce the impostor. He also 
made up his mind that Tom should be allowed 
a reasonable time for spiritual preparation, and 
then be hanged, drawn and quartered, according 
to the law and usage of the day, in cases of high 
treason. 



Thi Prüicg and tkt Pauptr. /. S 

 IC 



I 



Ir 



 



AT GUILDHALL. 



 



db 



CHAPTEK XL 
AT ÖUILDHALU ... 

The royal bärge, ättended by its gorgeous 
fleet, took its stately way down the Thames 
tkough the wilderaess of illuminated boats. The 
air was laden with music; the river banks were 
berufied- with joy-flames; the distant city lay in 
a soft luminous glow from its countless invisible 
boniiresj above it rose many a siender spire into 
Üje sky, incrusted with sparkling lights, wherefore 
in their remoteness they seemed like jewelled 
laaoes tkrust aloft; as the üeet swept along, it 
was greeted from the banks with a continuous 
hoarse roar of cheers and the ceaseless flash and 
boom of artiUery. 

To Tom Canty, half buried in his silken 
cushions, these sounds and this spectacle were a 
wonder unspeakably sublime and astonishing. To 
biß Uule friends at his side, the Princess Eliza- 
beth aQd tl^e Lady Jane Grey, they were jiothijig. 



 



ii8 



THE PRINCE ANB THE PAUPER* 



Arrived at the Dowgate^ the fleet w; 
up the limpid Walbrook (whose Channel 
been for two centuries buried out of sig 
acres of buüdings,) to Bucklersbury, paj 
and under bridges populous with merr 
and brilliantly lighted, and at last cai 
halt in a basin where now is Bärge Yarc 
centre of the ancient city of London. " 
embarked, ajid he and his gallant pi 
crossed Cheapside and made a shoii 
through the Old Jewry and Basinghall J 
the GuildhalL 

Tom and his little ladies were recer 
due ceremony by the Lord Mayor and the 
of the City, in their gold chains and scar 
of State, and conducted to a rieh ca 
estate at the head of the great hall, prec 
heralds raaking proclamation, and by tl 
and the City Sword. The lords and lac 
were to attend upon Tom and his t^ 
friends took their places behind their chj 
At a lower table the court grandees a; 
güests of noble degree were seated, v 
nsagnates of the city; the commoners too 
at a multitude of tables on the main floc 
hall From their lofty vantage-groundt th 



db 



AT GUILDHALL. IIQ 

Gog and Magog, the ancient guardians of the 
dty, contemplated the spectacle below them with 
eyes grown familiär to it in forgotten generations. 
There was a bugle-blast and a prodamation, and 
a fat butler appeared in a high perch in the left- 
ward wall, foUowed by'his servitors bearing with 
impressive solenmity a royal Baron of Beef^ Smok- 
ing bot and ready for the knife. 

After grace, Tom (being instructed) rose — and 
the whole house with him — and drank from a 
portly golden lovingKnip with the Princess Eliza- 
beth; from her it passed to the Lady Jane, and 
then traversed the general assemblage. So the 
banquet began. 

By midnight the revelry was at its height. 
Now came one öf those picturesque spectacles so 
admired in that old day. A description of it is 
still extant in the quaint wording of a chronicler 
who witnessed it: 

''Space being made, presently entered a baron 
and an earl appareled after the Turkish fashion 
in long robes of bawdkin powdered with gold; 
hats on their heads of crimson velvet, with great 
rolls of gold, girded with two swords, called 
sdmitars, hanging by great bawdricks of gold. 



 



120 



THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 



Next came yet another baron and anoth< 
in two long gowns of yellow salin, travetsc 
white satin, and in every bend of white 
.bend of crimson satin, after the fashion of 
with furred hats of gray on their heads; ei 
them having an hatchet in their hands, an 
with pjkes" (points a foot long), "turned up 
after them came a knight, then the Lor< 
Admiral, and with him five nobles, in doul 
crimson velvet, voyded low on the back and 
to the cannell-bone, laced on the breas 
chains of silver; and, over that, short ch 
crimson satin, and on their heads hats ai 
dancers' fashion, with pheasants' feathers ii 
These were appareled after the fashion of] 
The torch-bearers, which were about an hi 
were appareled in crimson satin and gree 
Moors, their faces black. Next came in 
marye, Then the minstrels, ; which we 
guised, danced; and the lords and ladi 
wildly dance also, that it was a pleasure 
hold." 

And while Tom, in his high seat, was 
lipon this "wild" dancing, lost in admiri 
the dazzling commingling of kaleidoscopic 




db 



AT GUILDUALL. 121 

which the whirling turmoU of gau4y iigures below 
hinv presented, the ragged but real little Prinoe 
of Wales was proclaiming his rights and bis 
wTongSy denouncing tbe impostor, and clamooring 
for admission at tbe gates of Guildballl The 
crowd enjoyed this episode prodigiously, and 
pressed forward and craned their necks to see 
the smail rioter. lYesently they began to taunt 
him and mock at bim, puiposely to goad bim 
into a higher and still more entertaining fury. 
Tears of mortification sprang to bis eyes, but he 
stood his ground and defied the mob right rqyally. 
Other taunts fbllowed, added mockings stung bim, 
and he exclaimed — 

^I teil ye again, you pack of unmannerly curs, 
I am the Prince of Wales! And all forlom and 
friaidless as I be, with none to give me word 
of grace or help me in my need, yet will 
not I be driven from my ground, but will main- 
tain it!" 

"Though thou be prince or no prince, 'tis all 
one, thou be'st a gallant lad, and not friendless 
neitherl Here stand I by thy side to prove it; 
and mind I teil thee thöu might'st have a worser 
friend than Miles Hendon and yet not tire thy 
legs with seeking. Rest thy small jaw, my child; 



 



THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER* 

I talk the language of these base kennel-] 
to a very native." 

The Speaker was a sort of Don G; 
Bazan in dress, aspect, and bearing. He 
trim-buili, musculan His doublet and trui 
of rieh material, but faded and threadbi 
their gold-lace adomments were sadly ta 
his ruif was rurnpled and damagedj th 
in his sloudied hat was broken and hs 
draggled and disreputable look; at his 
wore a long rapier in a rusty iron she 
swaggering carriage marked him at on 
niffler of the camp. The speech of this 
figure was received witb an explosion 
and laughter. Some cried, "'Tis anotht 
in disguisel" "*Ware thy tongue, friend 
he is dangerousl" *'Marry, he looketh i 
his eye!*' "Pluck the lad from him — to tl 
pond wf the cubl'' 

Instantly a band was laid npon the 
under the impulse of this happy though 
stantly the stranger*s long sword was out 
meddler went to the earth under a i 
thump with the Hat of it The next m 
score of voices shouted "Kill the dog! 1 
kill himl" and the mot) closed in on the 



db 



At GUILDHALL. I23 

who backed himself against a wall and began to 
lay aboat him with his long weapon like a mad- 
maa His victims sprawled this way and that, 
but the mob-tide poured over their prostrate forms 
and dashed itself against the Champion with un- 
diminished fuiy. His moments seemed numbered, 
his destruction certain, when suddenly a trumpet- 
blast soimded, a voice shouted, "Way for the 
king's messenger 1" and a troop of horsemen came 
charging down upon the mob, who fled out of 
barm's reach as fast as their legs could carry 
them. The bold stranger caught up the prince 
in his arms, and was soon far away from danger 
and the multitude. 

Retum we within the Guildhall. Suddenly, 
high above the jubilant roar and thunder of the 
revel, broke the clear peal of a bugle-note. There 
was instant silence, — a deep hush; then a Single 
voice rose— that of the messenger from the palace 
and began to pipe forth a proclamation, the whole 
multitude standing, listening. 

The closing words, solemnly pronounced, 
were — 

"The king is deadl" 

The great assemblage bent their heads upon 



 IC 

\ 



124 '^^^^ PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

their breasts with one accord; remained so, 
profound silence, a few moments; tben all si 
üpon iheir knees in a body, stretched out tl 
hands toward Tom, and a mighty shout bi 
forth that seemed to shake the building--- - 

"Long Hve the king!" 

Poor Tom's dazed eyes wandered abroad c 
this siupefying spectacle, and finally res 
dreamüy upon the kneeling princesses bes 
him, a moment, then npon the Earl of Hertft 
A sudden puqiose dawned in his face. He si 
in a low tone, at Lord Hertford's ear — 

"Answer me tmly, on thy faith and hönc 
Uttered I here a command, the which none 
a king niight hold privilege and prerogative 
utter, would such comniandment be obeyed, i 
none rise up to say m€ nay?" 

"None, my liege ^ in all these realms. In 
person bides the majesty of England. Thou 
the king — thy word is law." 

Tom respondedj in a strong, eamest vo; 
and with great animation — 

"Then shall the king's law be law of mei 
from this day, and never more be law of blo 
Up from thy knees and away! To the Toi 



k 



/Google 



AT GÜILDHALL. I25 

and say the king decrees the Duke of Norfolk 
shallnot die!"* 

The words were caught up and carried eagerly 
from lip to lip far and wide over the hall, and as 
Hertford hurried from the presence, another pro- 
digious shout burst forth — 

"The reign of blood is ended! Long live 
Edward, King of England I" 

♦ See Note 7, at cnd of voIume II. 



 



r 



db 



THE PRINCE AND HIS DELIVERER. 



 



db 



CHAPTER XII. 
THE PRINCE AND HIS DELIVERER. 

As soon as Miles Hendon and the little prince 
were clear of the mob, they Struck down through 
back lanes and alleys toward the river. Their 
way was unobstructed until they approached 
London Bridge; then they ploughed into the mul- 
titude again, Hendon keeping a fast grip upon 
the prince's — no, the King's — wrist The tremen- 
dous news was abready abroad, and the boy 
learaed it from a thousand voices at once — "The 
King is dead!'* The tidings Struck a chill to the 
heart of the poor little waif, and sent a shudder 
through his frame. He realised the greatness of 
Ms loss, and was filled with a bitter grief; for the 
grim tyrant who had been such a terror to others 
had always been gentle with him. The tears 
Sprung to his eyes and blurred all objects. For 
^^ instant he feit himself the most forlorn, out- 
cast, and forsaken of God's creatures — then an- 

"^ht Prince and ihe Pauptr. I. 9 * 



 



I30 



THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 



other cry shook the night with its far-reac 
thunders: "Long live King Edward the Six 
and this made his eyes kindle, and thr 
him with pride to his fingers' ends. "Ah,' 
thought, "how grand and stränge it seems — 
King!" 

Out friends threaded their way slowly thr< 
the throngs upon the Bridge. This struc 
which had stood for six hundred years, and 
been a noisy and populous thoroughfare all 
time, was a curious affair, for a closely pa 
rank of stores and shops, with family qua 
overhead, stretched along both sides of it, 
one bank of the river to the other. The B; 
was a sort of town to itself; it had its inr 
beer-houses, its bakeries, its haberdasheries 
food markets, its manufacturing indüstries, 
even its church. It looked upon the two n 
bours which it linked together — London 
Southwark — as being well enough, äs sub 
but not otherwise particularly important. Il 
a close Corporation, so to speak; it was a m 
town, of a Single strieet a fifth of a mile loni 
population was but a village population, 
everybody in it knew all his fellow-town 
intimately, and had known their fathers 



1 



db 



\ 



TUE PRINCE AND HIS DELIVEKEK. I3I 

mothers beibie them — and all their little familf 
afiairs into the bargain« It had its aristooracy« 
of course — its fine old families of butchers» and 
bakers, and what-not, who had occupied the same 
old premises for five or six hundred years» and 
knew the great history of the Bridge fixim begin- 
Ding to end, and all its Strange legendi; and who 
always talked bridgy talk, and thought bridgy 
thoughtSy and lied in a long» level, direct» sub- 
stantial bridgy way. It was just the sort of popu- 
lation to be narrow and ignorant and self-con- 
ceited. Children wcrc bom on the Bridge, were 
reaied there, grew to old age and finally died 
without ever having set a foot upon any part of 
the w€rld but London Bridge alone. Such people 
would naturally imagine that the mighty and 
interminable procession which moved through its 
Street night and day, with its confiised roar of 
shouts and cries, its neighings and bellowings 
and bleatings and its muffled thunder-tramp, was 
the one great tUng in this world, and. themselves 
somehow the pr<^rietors of it And so they were» 
in effect — at least they could exhibit it from their 
Windows, and did — for a consideration — ^whenever 
a retuming king or hero gave it a fleeting spien- 
dour, for there was no place like it for afiofding 

 IC 



\ 



n^ 



THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 



a long, straight, uninterrupted view of man 
columns. 

Men bom and reared upon the Bridge f 
life unendurably duU and inane elsewhere. 
tory teils of one of these who left the Bridj 
the age of seventy-one and retired to the cou 
But he could only fret and toss in his bed 
could not go to sleep, the deep stillness w; 
painful, so awful, so oppressive. When he 
worn out with it, at last, he üed back to hii 
home, a lean and haggard spectre, and feil pi 
fuUy to rest and pleasant dreams under the 
ing music of the lashing waters and the 1 
and Crash and thunder of London Bridge. 

In the times of which we are writing, 
Bridge fumished "object lessons" in English 
tory, for its children — namely, the livid anc 
caying heads of renowned men impaled upon 
Spikes atop of its gateways. But we digress 

Hendon's lodgings were in the little im 
the Bridge. As he neared the door with 
small friend, a rough voice said — 

"So, thou'rt come at last! Thou'lt not es 
again, I Warrant thee; and if pounding thy l 
to a pudding can teach thee somewhat, th 
not keep us waiting another time, mayhaj 



db 



THE PRINCE AND BIS DEUVERER. I33 

and John Canty put out bis band to seize tbe 
boy. 

Miles Hendon stepped in tbe way and said — 

"Not too fast, friend. Thou art needlessly 
rough, methinks. Wbat is tbe lad to tbee?" 

^^If it be any business of tbine to make and 
meddle in otbers' affairs, be is my son." 

"Tis a lic!" cried tbe little King, botly. 

"Boldly Said, and I believe tbee, wbetber thy 
small head-piece be sound or cracked, my boy. 
But whetber tbis scurvy rufban-be tby fatber or 
no, 'tis all one, be sball not bave tbee to beat 
thee and abuse, according to bis threat, so t|^ou 
prefer to bide witb me." 

"I do, I do — ^I know bim not, I loatbe bim, 
and will die before I will go witb bim." 

"Then 'tis settled, and tbere is nougbt more 
to say." 

"We will see, as to tbat!" exdaimed John 
Canty, striding past Hendon to get at tbe boy; 
"by force sball be " 

"If thou do but touch bim, thou animated 
offal, I will spit tbee like a goose!" said Hendon, 
barring tbe way and laying bis band upon bis 
sword hilt Canty drew back. **Now mark ye," 
continued Hendon, ^'I took tbis lad under my 



 



»34 



THE PkmCE AND THE PAUPER. 



Protect ioQ when a mob of such as thou % 
have mishandled him, mayhap killed him; 
imagine I will desert him now to a worser 
— for whether thou art his father or no,— 
sooth to say, I think it is a lie — a decent 
death were better for such a lad than lii 
such brüte hands as thine. So go thy ways, 
set quick about it, for I like not much 
dying of words, being not over-patient in 
nature/' 

John Canty moved off, muttering threats 
cursesj and was swallowed from sight in 
croivd. Hendon ascended three fiights of s 
to his room, with his Charge, after orderii 
meal to be sent thither. It was a poor a 
ment, with a shabby bed and some odds 
ends of old fumiture in it, and was va§ 
lighted by a couple of sickly candles. The 
king dragged himself to the bed and lay c 
upon it, almost exhausted with banger and fat: 
He had been on his feet a good part of a 
and a night, for it was now two or three o'c 
in the moming, and had eaten nothing m 
time. He murmured drowsily— 

**Prithee call me when the table is sprc 
and sunk into a deep sleep immediately. 



db 



THE PRINCE AND HIS DELIVERER. I35 

A smile twinkled in Hendon's eye, and he 
Said to himself — 

"By the mass, the little beggar takes to one's 
quarters and usurps (me's bed with as natural 
and easy a grace as if he owned them — with 
never a by-your-leave or so-please-it-you, or any 
thing of the sort. In his diseased ravings he 
called himself the Prince of Wales, and bravely 
doth he keep up the character. Poor little friend- 
less rat, doubtless his mind has been disordered 
with ill-usage. Well, I will be his friend; I have 
saved him, and it draweth me strongly to him; 
already I love the bold-tongued little rascal. 
How soldier-like he faced the smutty rabble and 
iluDg back his high deüance! And what a comely, 
sweet and gentle face he hath, now that sleep 
hath conjured away its troubles and its griefs. I 
will teach him, I will eure his malady; yea, I will 
be his eider brother, and care for him and watch 
over him; and whoso would shame him or do 
him hurt, may Order his shroud, for though I be 
bumt for it he shall need it!*' 

He bent over the boy and contemplated him 
with kind and pitying interest, tapping the young 
cheek tenderly and smoothing back the tangled 
curls with his great brown band. A slight 



 



1 



ij6 



THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 



shiver passed over the boy's form. Hendon 
tered — 

"See, now, how like a man it was to let 
lie here uncovered and fill his body with de 
rheums. Now what shall I do? 'twill wake 
to take him up and put him within the bed, 
he sorely needeth sleep." 

He looked about for extra covering, but 
ing none, doffed his doublet and wrapped the 
in it, saying, "I am used to nipping air and s 
apparel, 'tiv> little I shall mind the cold" — 
walked up and down the room, to keep his t 
in motion, soliloquising, as before. 

"His injured mind persuades him he is Pi 
of Wales; 'twill be odd to have a Prince of V 
still with US, now that he that was the prin 
prince no more, but king, — for this poor mii 
set upon the one fantasy, and will not reasoi 
that now it should cast by the prince and 
itself the king. . , . If my father liveth still, 
these seven years that I have heard nought 
home in my foreign dungeon, he will weh 
the poor lad and give him generous shelte] 
my sake; so will my good eider brother, Arl 
my other brother, Hugh — but I will crack 
crown, an' he interfere, the fox-hearted, ill-c( 



db 



THE PRINCE AND HIS DELIVERER. I37 -^ 

tioned animal! Yes, thither will we fare — and 
straightway, too." 

A servant entered with a smoking meal, dis- 
posed it upon a small deal table, placed the 
chairs, and took his departure, leaving such cheap 
lodgers as these to wait upon themselves. The 
door slammed after him, and the noise woke the 
boy, who Sprung to a sitting posture, and shot a 
glad glance about him; then a grieved look came 
into his face and he murmured, to himself, with 
a deep sigh, "Alack, it was but a dr^am, woe is 
me." Next he noticed Miles Hendon's doublet 
— glanced from that to Hendon, comprehended 
the sacrifice that had been made for him, and 
Said, gently — 

"Thou art good to me, yes, thou art very 
good to me. Take it and put it on — I shall not 
need it more." 

Then he got up and walked to the washstand 
in the comer, and stood there, waiting. Hendon 
Said in a cheery voice — 

"We'U have a right hearty sup and bite, now, 
for every thing is savoury and smoking hot, and 
that and thy nap together will make thee a little 
man again, never fear!" 

The boy made no answer, but bent a steady 



 



\- 



138 



THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 



look, that was filled with grave surprise, 
also somewhat touched with impatience, upon 
talt knight of the sword. Hendon was puzz 
and Said — 

"Whafs amiss?" 

"Good sir, I would wash me." 

"Oh, is that all! Ask no peraiission oiVi 
Hendon for aught thou cravest Make th) 
perfectly free here, and welcome, with all 
are his belongings." 

Still the boy stood, and moved not; morCj 
tapped the floor once or twice with his si 
impatient foot. Hendon was wholly perple 
Said he — 

"Bless US, what is it?" 

"Prithee, pour the water, and make no 
many words!" 

Hendon, suppressing a horse-laugh, and 
ing to himself, "By all the saints, but this is 
mirable!" stepped briskly forward and did 
small insolent's bidding; then stood by, in a 
of stupefaction, until the command, "Come— 
towel!" woke him sharply up. He took u 
towel, from under the boy's nose, and hande 
to him without comment. He now proceede 
comfort his own face with a wash, and whik 



db 



THE PRINCE AND HIS DEUVEKER. IJQ 

was at it his adopted child seated himself at the 
Üble and prepared to fall to. Hendon despatched 
his ablutkms with alacrity, then drew back the 
other chair and was about to place himself at 
table, when the boy said, indignantly — 

"Forbear! Wouldst sit in the presence of the 
King?'' 

This blow staggered Hendon to his founda- 
tions. He muttered to himself, **Lo, the poor 
thing's madness is up with the time! it hath 
dianged with the great change that is come to the 
reakn, and now in fancy is he kingl Good lack, I 
must humour the conceit, too — there is no other way 
— faith, he would order me to the Tower, eise!" 

And pleased with this jest, he removed the 
chair £rom the table, took his stand behind the 
King, and proceeded to wait upon him in the 
coartliest way he was c^able of. 

While the King ate the rigour of his royal 
dignity relaxcd a little^ and with his growing 
contentment came a desire to talk. He said — ''I 
think thou callest thyself Miles Hendon, if I heard 
thee aright?" 

"Yes, Sire," Miles replied; then observed to 
himself, "If I must humour the poor lad's mad- 
ness, I must sire him, I must majesty him, I must 



 



140 



THE PRINCE AND THE PAXJPER. 



not go by halves, I must stick at nothing that 
longeth to the part I play, eise shall I play i 
and work evil to this charitable and kii 
cause." 

The King warmed his heart with a sec 
glass of wine, and said — "I would know the 
teil me thy story. Thou hast a gallant way ' 
thee, and a noble — art nobly bom?" 

"We are of the tail of the nobility, good ] 
IVIajesty. My father is a baronet — one of 
sraaller lords by knight service* — Sir Ricl 
Hendon, of Hendon Hall, by Monk's Holn 
Kent." 

"The name has escaped my memory. G< 
— teil me thy story." 

"Tis not much, your Majesty, yet perch; 
it may beguile a short half-hour for want 
better. My father, Sir Richard, is very rieh, 
of a most generous nature. My mother 
whilst I was yet a boy. I have two brotl 
Arthur, my eider, with a soul like to his fath 
aud Hugh, younger than I, a mean spirit, cove 
treacherous, vicious, underhanded — a reptile. i 

* He refers to the order of baronets, or baronettes 
barones minores, as distinct from the parliamentary bare 
not, it need hardly be Said, to the baronets of later eres 



\ 



db 



THE PRINCE AND HIS DELIVERER. I4I 

was he from the cradle; such was he ten years 
past, when I last saw him — a ripe rascal at nine- 
teen, I being twenty, then, and Arthur twenty-two. 
There is none other of us but the Lady Edith, 
my cousin — she was sixteen, then — beautiiiily 
gentle, good, the daughter of an earl, the last of 
her race, heiress of a great fortune and a lapsed 
title. My father was her guardian. I loved her 
and she loved me; but she was betrothed to 
Arthur from the cradle, and Sir Richard would 
not sufFer the contract to be broken. Arthur loved 
another maid, and bade us be of good cheer and 
hold fast to the hope that delay and luck together 
would some day give success to our several causes. 
Hugh loved the Lady Edith's fortune, though in 
truth he said it was herseif he loved — but then 
'twas his way, alway, to say the one thing and 
mean the other. But he lost his arts upon the 

.\ girl; he could deceive my father, but none eise. 
My father loved him best of us all, and trusted 
and believed him; for he was the youngest child, 
and others hated him — these qualities being in 
all ages sufficient to win a parent's dearest love; 
I and he had a smooth persuasive tongue, with an 
' admirable gift of lying — and these be qualities 

•; i which do mightily assist a blind affection to cozen 



 



14-' 



THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 



itself. I was wild — ^in troth I might go y 
and say very wild, though 'twas a wilds 
innocent sort, since it hurt none but me 
sLame to none, nor loss, nor had in it 
of crime or baseness, or what might no 
mine honourable degree. 

"Yet did my brother Hugh tum th( 
lo good account — he seeing that oui 
Arthur's health was but indifferent, an 
Ihe worst might work him profit were I 
of the path — so, — but 'twere a long tale, 
liege, and little worth the telling. Brie 
this brother did deftly magnify my i'< 
niake thera crimes; ending his base ti 
finding a silken ladder in mine apartme 
veyed thither by his own means — and 
vince my father by this, and subomed 
of servants and other lying knaves, tl 
minded to carry off my Edith and m 
her, in rank defiance of his will. 

"Thj-ee years of banishment from h 
England might make a soldier and a m^ 
my father said, and teach me some ( 
wisdom. I fought out my long probat« 
Continental wars, tasting sumptuously 
knocks,' privation, and ad venture; but ii 



U 



db 



THE PRINCE AND WS D£LIV£R£R. I43 

battle I was taken captive, and during the seven 
years that have waxed and waned since theo, a 
foreign dungeon hath harboured me. Througfa 
vit and courage I won to the free air at last, and 
fled hither straight; and am but just arrived, right 
poor in purse and raiment, and poorer still in 
knowledge of what these dull seven years have 
wroaght at Hendon Hall, its people and bekng- 
ings. So please you, sir, my meagre tale is 
told." 

"Thou hast been shamefully abused!" said 
the little King, with a flasbing eye. "But I will 
right thee — by the cross will I! The King hath 

Said it" 

Then, fired by the story of Miles's wrongs, he 
loosed his tongue and poured the history of his 
own recent misfortunes into the ears of his 
astonished listener. When he had finished, Mlles 
Said to himself — 

"Lo, what an imagination he hath! Verily, 
this is no common mind; eise, crazed or sane, it 
conld not weave so straight and gaudy a tale as 
this out of the airy nothings wherewith it hath 
wrought this curious romaunt Poor ruined little 
head, it shall not lack friend or shelter whilst I 



 



144 



TEIE PRÜfCE Am? TrtE MUlißR. 



bide with the living. He shall never J 
side; he shall be my pet, my little 
And he shall be cured! — ay, made w1 
sound — then will he make himself a na 
proud shall I be to say, *Yes, he is minc 
him, a homeless little ragamuffin, but I i 
was in him, and I said his name would 
some day— behold hira, observe him 
right?'" 

Tbe Kuig spoke-^in a thoughtfnl, i 
voice — 

"Tbou didst save me injury and sha 
chance my life, and so my crown. Sud 
demandeth rieh reward, Name thy de 
so it be witbin tbe compass of my royal 
is thine," 

Tbis fantastic Suggestion startled He 
of bis reverie. He was about to tbaiik i 
and put the matter aside with saying he 
done his duty and desired no reward, bui 
thought came into his he ad, and he ask 
to be silent a few moments and cons 
gracious offer — -an idea which the King 
approved, remarking that it was best t( 
too hasty with a thing of such great impi 



1^ 



db 



tHE PRINCE AND HIS DELIVERER. I45 

Miles refiected during some moments, then 
Said to himself, "Yes, that is thc thing to do — 
hy any other means it were impossible to get at 
it— and certes, this hour's experience has taught 
me ^twould be most wearing and inoonvenient to 
continue it as it is. Yes, I will propose it; 'twas 
a happy accident that I did not throw the chance 
away/' Then he dropped upon one knee and 
Said — 

"My poor Service went not beyond the limit 
of a subject's simple duty, and thcrefore hath no 
merit; but since your Majesty is pleased to hold 
itwarthy some reward, I take heart of grace to 
make petition to this effect. Near four hmidred 
years ago, as your grace knoweth, there being ill 
blood betwixt John, King of England, and the 
King of France, it was decreed that two Champions 
should fight together in the lists, and so settle 
the dispute by what is called the arbitrament of 
God. These two kings, and the Spanish king» 
being assembled to witness and judge the con- 
flict, the Frcnch Champion appeared; but so 
redoubtable was he, that our English knights 
refused to measure weapons with him. So the 
matter, which was a weighty one, was like to go 
against the English monarch by default Now in 

TAe Prince and ike Pauper, L lO 

 IC 



146 



THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 



the Tower lay the Lord de Courqr, the 
arm in England, stripped of his hon 
possessions, and wasting with long 
Appeal was made to him; he gave asi 
came forth arrayed for battle; but no s( 
the Frenchman glimpse his huge frame 
his famous name but he fled away, 
French king's cause was lost. King Johr 
De Courcy's titles and possessions, i 
'Name thy wish and thou shalt have it, 
cost me half my kingdom;' whereat D< 
kneeling, as I do now, made answer, *T 
I ask, my liege; that I and my succes 
have and hold the privilege of remaininj 
in the presence of the kings of Englan 
forth while the throne shall last' The 
granted, as your Majesty knoweth; and tl 
been no time, these four hundred years, 
line has failed of an heir; and so, even 
day, the head of that ancient house still 
his hat or heim before the king's majestj 
let or hindrance, and this none other i 
Invoking this precedent in aid of my 



♦ The lords of Kingsale, descendants of De C 
enjoy this curious privilege. 



I 



db 



THE FRINCE AND HIS DELIVERER. I47 

beseech the King to grant to me but this one 
grace and privilege — ^to my more than sufficient 
reward — and none other, to wit: that I and my 
heirs, for ever, may sit in the presence of the 
Majesty of England!" 

"Rise, Sir Miles Hendon, Knight," said the 
^gi gravely — giving the accolade with Hendon's 
sword — "rise, and seat thyself. Thy petition is 
granted. Whilst England remains, and the crown 
continues, the privilege shall not lapse.'' 

His Majesty walked apart, musing, andHendon 
dropped into a chair at table, observing to him- 
self, "Twas a brave thought, and hath wrought 
me a mighty deliverance; my legs are grievously 
wearied. An' I had not thought of that, I must 
have had to stand for weeks, tili my poor lad's 
wits are cured." After a little, he went on, "And 
so I am become a knight of the Kingdom of 
Dreams and Shadows! A most odd and stränge 
Position, truly, for one so matter-of-fact as L I 
will not laugh — no, God forbid, for this thing 
which is so substanceless to me is r€<d to him« 
And to me, also, in one way, it is not a falsity, 
for it reflects with truth the sweet and generous 
spirit that is in him." After a pause: "Ah, what 
if he should call me by my line title before folk! 



 



148 



THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 



—there'd be a merry contrast betwixt my 
and my raiment! But no matter, let hii 
nie what he will, so it please him; I sh 
content." 



db 



THE 
DISAPPEARANCE OF THE PRINCE. 



 




db 



CHAPTER XIII. 
THE DISAPPEARANCE OF THE PRINCE. 

A HEAVY drowsiness presently feil upon the 
two comrades. The King said — 

"Remove these rags" — meaning Ins clothing. 

Hendon disapparelled the boy wilhout dissent 
or remark, tucked him up in bed, then glanced 
about the room, saying to himself, ruefuUy, "He 
hath taken my bed again, as before — marry, what 
sball / do?'* The little King observed his per- 
plexity, and dissipated it with a word. . He said, 
sleepily — 

"Thou wilt sleep athwart the door, and guard 
it." In a moment more he was out of his 
troubles, in a deep slumber. 

"Dear heart, he should have been born a 
lüng!" muttered Hendon, admiringly; "he playeth 
the part to a marvel." 

Then he stretched himself across the door, 
on the floor, saying contentedly — 



 



152 



THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 



"I have lodged worse for seven years 
be but ill gratitude to Him above to f 
with this." 

He dropped asleep as the dawn z 
Toward noon he rose, uncovered bis un 
ward — a section at a time — and took bis 
witb a string. Tbe King awoke, just aj 
completed bis work, complained of tbe ( 
asked wbat be was doing. 

"Tis done, now, my liege," said He 
have a bit of business outside, but will 
retum; sleep thou again — thou needest i 
— ^let me cover thy head also — thou'lt 
the sooner." 

The King was back in dreamland b< 
Speech was ended. Miles slipped softly 
slipped as softly in again, in the course 
or forty minutes, with a complete seo 
suit of boy's clothing, of cheap matei 
showing signs of wear; but tidy, and 
the season of the year. He seated him 
began to overhaul his purchase, muir 
himself — 

"A longer purse would have got a b< 
but when one has not the long purse < 
be content with wbat a short one may c 



db 



THE D1SAPP£ARANCE OF IHE PRINCE. I53 

** *There was a woman in our town, 
In our town did dwell * 

"He stirred, methinks — I must sing in a 
less thunderous key; 'tis not good to mar his 
sleep, with this joumey before him and he so 
wearied out, poor chap. . . . This garment — 'tis 
well enough — a stitch here and another one there 
will set it aright. This other is better, albeit a 

stitch or two will not come amiss in it, likewise 

These be very good and sound, and will keep his 
small feet warm and dry — an odd new thing to 
him, belike, since he has doubtless been used to 
foot it bare, winters and summers the same. . . . 
Would thread were bread, seeing one getteth a 
year^s sufficiency for a farthing, and such a brave 
big needle without cost, for mere love. Now 
shall I have the demon's own time to thread it!" 

And so he had. He did as men have always 
done, and probably always will do, to the end of 
time — held the needle still, and tried to thrust 
the thread through the eye, which is the opposite 
of a woman's way. Time and time again the 
thread missed the mark, going sometimes on one 
side of the needle, sometimes on the other, some- 
times doubling up against the shaft; but he was 
patient, having been through these experiences 



 



154 



THE PRLVCE AND THE PAUPER. 



beforej when he was soldiering. He si 
at last, and took up the gannent that 
waiting, meantime, across bis lap, and t 
work. 

'*The mn is paid — the breakfast tl 
come, included — and there is wherewith 
buy a couple of donkeys and meet our li 
for the two or three days betwixt this 
plenty that awaits us at Hendon Hall — 

•' *S]ie loved her liüs ' 

"Body o' me! I have driven the nee< 
my naü! . . . Il raatters Utile — 'tis not ; 
— ^yet 'tis not a convenience, neither 
shall be merry there, little one, never 
Thy troubles will vanish, ihere, and lib 
sad disteniper — 

** 'She loved her husband dearilee, 
But anotber man— — * 

"These be noble large stitches!"- 
the gamient up and viewing it admiringl 
have a grandeur and a majesty that 
these small stingy ones of the tailor-ma] 
mightily paltry and plebeian^ 

* ' * She loved her husband dearilee, 
But atiother man he loved she * 



L 



 



THE DISAPPEARANCE OF THE PRINCE. I55 

"Many, 'tis done — a goodly piece of work, 
too, and wrought with expedition. Now will I 
wake him, apparel him, pour for him, feed him, 
and then will we hie us to the mart by the 
Tabard inn in Southwark and — be pleased to 
rise, my liege! — he answereth not — what ho, my 
liege! — of a truth must I profane his sacred person 
with a touch, sith his slumber is deaf to speech. 
What!" 

He threw back the covers — the boy was 
gonel 

He stared about him in speechless astonish- 
ment for a moment; noticed for the first time 
that his ward's ragged raiment was also missing, 
then he began to rage and storm, and shout for 
the innkeeper. — At that moment a servant entered 
with the breakfast. 

"Explain, thou limb of Satan, or thy time is 
come!" roared the man of war, and made so 
savage a spring toward the waiter that this 
latter could not find his tongue, for the instant 
for fright^and surprise. "Where is the boy?" 

In disjointed and trembling syllables the man 
gave the informtition desired. 

**You were hardly gone from the place, your 
worship, when a youth came running and said it 



 



THE PRINCE AND THE FAITPER. 

was youT worship's will that the boy con 
straight, at the bridge-end on the South\^ 
I brought him liither; and wheii he woki 
and gave his message, the lad did gruni 
littk for being disturbed *so early/ as 
it, but straightway trussed on his rags 
with the yoiith, only saying it had bei 
manners that your worship came youi 
sent a stranger — and so^ " 

**Aiid so lhou*rt a fooll^a fool, aj 
cozened— hang all thy breed' Yet m 
hurt is done. Fossibly no härm is meanl 
I will go fetch him. Make the table rea( 
the coverlngs of the bed were disposed 
lay beneath them — happened that by a 

"I know EOtj good your worship. ] 
youth med die with them — he that cara 
boy." 

"Thousand deathsl 'twas done to de 
-'^tis piain ^twas done to gain time. 
Was that youth alone?" 

"All alone, your worship," 

«Art sare?'' 

"Sure^ your worship." 

** Collect thy scattered wits — bethin 
take time, man.'' 



db 



1^ 



THE DISAPPEARANCE OF THE PRINCE. I57 

After a moment's thought, the servant said — 

"When he came, none came with him; but 
now I remember me that as the two stepped into 
the throng of the Bridge, a ruffian-looking man 
plunged out from some near place; and just as 
he was joining them " 

«What then ?—OMt with it!" thundered the 
impatient Hendon, intermpting. 

"Just then the crowd lapped them up and 
closed them in, and I saw no niore, being called 
by my master, who was in a rage because a Joint 
that the scrivener had ordered was forgot, though 
I take all the saints to witness that to blame me 
for that miscarriage were like holding the imbora 
habe to judgment for sins com " 

"Out of my sight, idiot! Thy prating drives 
me mad! Hold! whither art flying? Canst not 
bide still an instant? Went they toward South- 
wark?" 

"Even so, your worship — for, as I said before, 
as to that detestable Joint, the habe unbom is no 
whit more blameless than " 

"Art here yei/ And prating still? Vanish, 
lest I throttle thee!" The servitor vanished. 
Hendon foUowed after him, passed him, and 
plunged down the stairs two Steps at a stride, 



 



158 



THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER, 



muttering, "Tis that sciirvy villain thai 
he was his son, I have lost thee, my p 
mad master— it ts a bitter thought — an 
come to love thee so! No! by book and 
lost! Not lost, for I will ransack the h 
find thee again, Poor cbild, yonder is h 
fast — and mine* but I have no hunger 
let the rats have it — speed, speed! th< 
wordr' As he worraed his swift way thi 
noisy multitudes upon the Bridge, hc 
times Said to himself — clingirig to the tt 
if it were a particularly pleasing oi 
gmmbled, but he weni — lie went, yes, 
he thought Miks Hendon asked it, swe 
he would ne'er have done it for anothei 
it well/' 




L 



 



LE ROI EST MORT— VIVE LE ROI. 



 



d 



db 



CHAPTER XIV. 
"LE ROI EST MORT — VIVE LE ROI." 

i^ARD daylight of the same moming, Tom 
jtirred out of a heavy sleep and openecl 
is in the dark. He lay silent a few 
:s, trying to analyse his confused thoughts 
pressions, and get some sort of meaning 
them, then suddenly he burst out in a 
IS but guarded voice — 
ee it all, I see it all! Now God be thankedj 
deed awake at last! Come, joy! vanish, 
Ho, Nan! Bet! kick off your straw and 
lither to my side, tili I do pour into your 
ring ears the wildest madcap dream that 
i spirits of night did conjure up to astonish 
1 of man withal! . . . Ho, Nan, I say! 

im form appeared at his side, and a voice 

It deign to deliver thy commands?" 

tce oMd the Paupet. I, II 



Dlg, 



db 



-ü 



J62 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

"Comniands? , . . O, woe is me, I kno^ 
voice! Speak, thou — who am I?" 

"Thou? In sooth, yestemight wert tho 
Prince of Wales; to-day art thou my most gra 
liege, Edward, King of England." 

Tom buried his head among his pillows, 
muring plaintively— 

"Alack^ it was no dream! Go to thy 
su^eet sir^ — leave me to my sorrows." 

Tom slept again, and after a time he 
this pleasant dream. He thought it was sui 
and he was playiDg, all alone, in the fair me 
called Goodman's Fields, when a dwarf 01 
foot high, with long red whiskers and a hü 
back, appeared to him suddenly and said, 
by that stump," He did so, and found t 
bright new peunies — wonderful riches! Ye 
was not the best of it; for the dwarf said — 

"I know thee, Thou art a good lad, i 
deserv'ing; thy distresses shall end, for the c 
thy reward is come. Dig here every se 
iday, and thou shalt find always the same 
surcj twelve bright new pennies. Teil none— 
the secret" 

Then the dwarf vanished, and Tom fl< 
Offal Court with his prize, saying to hii 



db 




"LE ROI EST MORT — VIVE LE ROI." 



163 



night will I give my falher a penny; he 
nk I begged it, it will glad his heart, and 

no more be beaten. One penny every 
he good priest that teacheth me shall 
nother, Nan and Bet the other four. Wc 
e with hunger and rags, now, done wiili 
id frets and savage usage." 
US dream he reached his sordid home all 
)reath, but with eyes dancing with grateful 
ism; cast four of his pennies into bis 
s lap and eried out — 
ey are for thee! — all of them, every one! 
lee and Nan and Bet — and honestly come 
begged nor stolen!" 

happy and astonished mother strained 
her breast and exclaimed — 
waxeth late — may it please your Majesty 

that was not the answer he was expecting, 
lam had snapped asunder — he was awake* 
opened his eyes — the richly clad First 
f the Bedchamber was kneeling by his 

The gladness of the lying dream faded 
the poor boy recognised that he was still 
re and a king. The room was filled with 
s clothed in purple mantles — the mouming 



i 



db 



1 




104 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

coloiir— and with noble servants of the 
Tom sat up in bed and gazed out from 1 
Silken airtains upon this fine Company. 

The weighty business of dressing be 
one courtier after another knelt and 
coiirt and offered to the little King 
dolences upon his heavy loss, whilst the 
proceeded. In the beginning, a shirt 7 
up by the Chief Equerry in Waiting, wl: 
it to the First Lord of the Buckhounds, wl 
it to the Second Gentleman of the Bed 
who passed it to the Head Ranger of 
Forest^ who passed it to the Third Groo 
Stole, who passed it to the Chancellor 
the Duchy of Lancaster, who passed 
Master of the Wardrobe, who passed it 
King-at-ArmSj who passed it to the Cor 
the Tower, who passed it to the Chiei 
öf the Household, who passed it to the B 
Graad Diapercr^ who passed it to the L 
Admiral of England, who passed it to 1 
bishop of Cauterbury, who passed it to 
Lord of the Eedch amber, who took whal 
of it and pnt it on Tom. Poor little ¥ 
chap, it remindcd him of passing buckets 

Each garment in its turn had to gc 

 IC 




"LE ROI EST MORT — VIVE LE ROI." 



K^S 



V and solemn process; consequently Tom 
ry weary of the ceremony; so weary that 
an almost gushing grate fulness when he 
aw his long silken hose begin the joumey 
le line and knew that the end of the 
«vas drawing near. But he exuhed too 
rhe First Lord of the Bedchamber re* 
the hose and was about to encase Tom's 
them, when a sudden flush invaded his 
1 he hurriedly hustled the things back 
I hands of the Archbishop of Canterbury 
astounded look and a whispered, "See, 
!" pointing to a something connected with 
e. The Archbishop paled, then flushed, 
;sed the hose to the Lord High Admiral, 
ng, "See, my lord!" The Admiral passed 
5 to the Hereditary Grand Diaperer, and 
rdly breath enough in his body to eja- 
"See, my lord!" The hose drifted back- 
3ng the line, to the Chief Steward of the 
)ld, the Constable of the Tower, Norroy 
Arms, the Master of the Wardrobe, the 
lor Royal of the Duchy of Lancaster, the 
koom of the Stole, the Head Ranger of 
• Forest, the Second Gentleman of the 
nber, the First Lord of the Buckhounds, 



i 



db^ 



/ 



l66 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

— accompanied always wilh that amazed 
frightened "See! see!" — tili they finally re^ 
the hands of the Chief Equerry in Waiting, 
gazed a moment, with a pallid face, upon wha 
caused all this dismay, then hoarsely whisj 
'*Body of my life, a tag gone from a truss-] 
— to the Tower with the Head Keeper o 
King's Hose!" — after which he leaned upo 
Shoulder of the First Lord of the Buckhoun 
regather his vanished strength whilst fresh 
without any damaged strings to them, were brc 
But all things must have an end, and 
tirae Tom Canty was in a condition to get ( 
bed. The proper official poured water, the p 
official engineered the washing, the proper o: 
stood by with a towel, and by-and-by Tor 
safely through the purifying stage and was : 
for the Services of the Hairdresser-royal. ^ 
he at length emerged from this master's h 
he was a gracious figure and as pretty as a 
in his mantle and trunks of purple satin, 
purple-plumed cap. He now moved in stal 
ward his breakfast-room, through the mid 
ihe courtly assemblage; and as he passed, 
feil back, leaving his way free, and dropped 
their knee§, 



W 



db 



"LE ROI EST MORT — VIVE LE RÖI." 167 

T breaküatst he was conducted, with regal 
ly, attended by his great officers and his 
)f fifty Gentiemen Pensioners bearing gilt 
xes, to the throne-room, where he pro- 
to transact business of State. His "uncle," 
ertford, took his stand by the throne, to 
le royal mind with wise counsel. 

body of illustrious men named by the 

ng as his executors, appeared, to ask 

ipproval of certain acts of theirs — rather 

and yet not wholly a form, since there 

I Protector as yet. The Archbishop of 

mry made report of the decree of the 

of Executors concerning the obsequies of 

most illustrious Majesty, and finished by 

the signatures of the Executors, to wit: 

:hbishop of Canterbury; the Lord Chan- 

►f England; William Lord St. John; John 

Lussell; Edward Earl of Hertford; John 

Lt Lisle; Cuthbert Bishop of Durham 

a was not listening — an earlier clause of 
:ument was puzzling him. At this point 
ed and whispered to Lord Hertford — 
hat day did he say the burial hath been 
ed for?" 
le i6th of the coming month, my liege." 



db 



"Tis a Strange foUy. Will he keep?'' 

Poor chap, he was still uew to the ciistoi 
of royalty; he Avas used to seeiiig the forlo 
dead of Offal Court hustied out of the way wi 
a very different sort of expedition, Howev^ 
the Lord Herlford set liis miiid at rest with 
word or two. 

A secretary of State presented an Order of t 
Council appüiiiting the morrow at eleven for t 
reception of the foreign ambassadors, and desii 
the King's assent 

Tom tumed an inquiring look toward He 
ford, who whispered — 

"Vour Majesty will signify consent. Th 
come to testify their royal m asters' sense of t 
hea^y calamity which hath visited your grace a 
the realm of England." 

Tom did as he was bidden. Another secreti 
began to read a preamble conceming the i 
penses of the late King's household, whidi h 
amounted to 28,000/* during the preceding 
months — a sum so ?ast that it made Tom Cai 
gasp^ he gasped again when the fact appeai 
that 20,000/* of ihis money was stül owing a 
unpaid;* and onoe more when it appeared Ü 
• llume. 



db 



"LE UOl EST MORT — VIVE LE HOT," 



169 



mg's cüfters weru about cmply, and bis 
hundfed servants mucli embarrassed for 
f üie wages due tJicm. Tom siK>ke Oüt# 
\?ely appr€hension — 

e be going to ihe dogs, 'tis piain. *Tis 
ad necessaty that we take a smaller housc 
t the servanls at large, siUi Uiey be of 110 
but lo make delay, and Irouble one vnth 
ihat harass the spirit and shame ihe soul, 
lisbeconfiing any but a doU^ that halb nor 
nor bands to help itself withab I re- 
!r me of a small house ihat standetb over 

, the ßsh-market, by BiUingsgale " 

Sharp pressure lipon Tom*s arm stopped 
lish tongue and seat a blush to his face; 
countenance there betrayed any sign that 
ange speech had been remarked or given 

secrelary made report that forasmuch as 
e King had pro\4ded in his will for con- 
the ducal degree upon llie Earl of Hert- 
Ld raising his brother, Sir Thomas Seymour, 
peerage, and likewise Hertford*s son to an 
n, together witb simüar aggrandisemenls 
IT great servanis of the €rown, the Couücii 
?solved to hold a sitting on the i6lh of 




170 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

February for the delivering and confirmir 
these honours, and that meantime, the late 
not having granted, in writing, estates suitat 
the Support of these dignities, the Council, \ 
ing his private wishes in that regard, had th( 
proper to grant to Seymour "500/. lands," ai 
Hertford's son "800 pound lands, and 300 p 
of the next bishop's lands which should 
vacant," — his present Majesty being willingJ 

Tom was about to blurt out something 
the propriety of paying the late King's debts 
before squandering all this money; but a t 
touch upon his arm, from the thoughtful Her 
saved him his indiscretion; wherefore he 
the royal assent, without spoken comment 
with much inward discomfort. While he s; 
fiecting, a moment, over the ease with whic 
was doing stränge and glittering miracles, a 1: 
thought shot into his mind: why not mak 
mother Duchess of Offal Court, and give h 
estate? But a sorrowful thought swept it ins1 
away: he was only a king in name, these 
veterans and great nobles were his master 
them his mother was only the creature of a 
eased mindj they would simply listen t( 
♦ Hume. 



db 



**LE ROI EST MORT — VIVE LE ROL" I 7 1 

with unbelieving ears, then send for the 

e duU work went tediously on. Petit ions 
ead, and proclamations, patents, and all 
• of wordy, repetitious, and wearisoma 
relating to the public business: and at 
>m sighed pathetically and murmured to 
', "In what have I offended, that the gcx^td 
lould take me away from the fields and 
t air and the sunshine, to shut me up here 
ike me a king and aflfiict me so?" Then 
r muddled head nodded a while, and pre- 
irooped to his Shoulder; and the business 
empire came to a standstill for want of 
^ust factor, the ratifying power. Silence en- 
ound the slumbering child, and the sages 
realm ceased from their deliberations. 
ing the forenoon, Tom had an enjoyable 
y permission of his keepers Hertford and 
1, with the Lady Elizabeth and the liltle 
me Grey; though the spirits of the prin- 
ivere rather subdued by the mighty stroke 
id fallen upon the royal house; and at 
i of the Visit his "eider sister" — after- 
the "Bloody Mary" of history — chilled 
th a 3okmn interview which had but one 



db 



172 



THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 



merit in liis eyes, its brevily. He ha« 
moments to li im seif, and theo a slim 
about twelve years of age was admittec 
presence, whose dothing, except his sn 
and the laces about his wrists, was of 
doublet, hose and all. He bore no t 
mourning but a knot of purple ribbon 
Shoulder. He advanced hesitatingly, wi 
bowed and bare, and dropped upon one 
front of Tom, Tom sat still and conte 
bim soberly a moment. Then he said — 

^^Rlse, lad Wlio art thou? What 
have?" 

The boy rosCj and stood at graceful < 
with an aspect of conccrn in his face. H 

"Of a surety thou must remember 
lord* 1 am thy whippiiig-boy." 

"My whipping boy?" 

**The same, your grace, I am Hum 
Humphrey Mai low." 

Tom perceived that here was someon 
his kecpers ought to liave posted him abc 
Situation was delicate. Wliat should h( 
pretend he knew this lad, and then b< 
his every utterance, that he had never ] 
him before? No, that woukl not de. . 



L_ 



db 



"LE ROI EST MORT — VIVE LE ROL** 



m 



his relief: accidents like this might l^e 
;o happen with some frequency, now Ihat 
;s urgencies would often call Hertford and 
n from his side, they being members of 
mncil of Executors; therefore perhaps it 
be well to stxike out a plan himself to 
le requirements of such emergencies. Yes, 
mld be a wise course — he would practise 
; boy, and see what sort of success he 
achieve. So he stroked his brow, per- 
y, a moment or two, and presently said— 

>w I seem to remember thee somewhat — 
y wit is clogged and dim with sufler- 

ack, my poor masterl" ejaculated the 
ig-boy, with feeling; adding, to himself, 
th 'tis as they said — his mind is gone— 
loor soul! But misfoftune catch me, how 
)rgetting! they said one must not seem to 
) that aught is wrong with him." 

is Strange how my memory doth wantoii 
e these days," said Tom. "But mind it 
mend apace — a little clue doth often serve 
g me back again the things and names 
had escaped me. ^ [And not they, only, 



 



T74 



TWn PRtNCE AND THE PAUl>ER. 



forsooth, but e'en such aS I ne'er heard befc 
as this lad shall see.] Give thy business spe 

"Tis malter of small weight, my liege 
will I toiich lipon it an' it please your grace. 
days gone by, when your Majesty faulted t 
in your Greek— in the morning lessons,— 
reraember it?" 

"Y-e-s— meihinks I do. [It is not much 
lie — an' I liad meddled with the Greek at ^ 
had not faulted simply thrice, but forty ti 
YeSj I do recali it, now — go on." 

" — —The master, being wroth with whj 
termcd such slovenly and doltish work, did 
mise that he would soundly whip me for 
and' — -" 

"\¥hip thee!'' said Tom, astonished out o 
presence of mind. '^Why should he whip 
for faulls of mine?" 

**Ah, your grace forgetteth again. He al 
fe^ourgeth me, when thou dost fall in thy less 

"True, tme — T had forgot. Thou teaches 
in private— ihen if . I fail, he argueth that 
Office was lamely done, and-^ " 

"Oh, my liege, what words are these? I 
humblest of thy servants, presume to teach Ü 

"Then where is thy blame? What ridd 



 



"LE ROI EST MORT — VIVE LE ROI." 



175 



Am I in truth gone mad, or is it thou? 
in — speak out" 

►ut, good your Majesty, there's nought that 
th simplifying. — None may visit the sacred 
i of the Prince of Wales with blows; where- 
hen he faulteth, *tis I that take them; and 
it is and right, for that it is mine office and 
elihood."* 

)m stared at the tranquil boy, observing to 
If, "Lo, it is a wonderful thing, — a most 
e and curious trade; I marvel they have not 
a boy to take my combings and my dress- 
for me — would heaven they wouldl — an' 
vill do this thing, I will take my lashings 
le own person, giving God thanks for the 
e." Then he said aloud — 
Lnd hast thou been beaten, poor friend, 
ling to the promise?" 

^0, good your Majesty, my punishment was 
ited for this day, and peradventure it may 
nulled, as unbefitting the season öf mourn- 
lat is come upon us; I know not, and so 
made bold to come hither and remind your 

about your gracious promise to intercedö 

r behalf " 

• See Note 8, at end of volume II. 



 



176 



THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 



"With the master? To save thee 1 
ping?" 

"Ah, thou dost remember!" 

**My memory mendeth, thou seest. 
mind at ease — thy back shall go unsc 
will see to it," 

"Oh, thanks, my good lordl" cried 
dropping upon bis knee again. "Mayhi 
ventured far enow; and yet" . . . 

Seeing Master Humphrey hesitate, 
couraged bim to go on, saying he was 
granting mood." 

'*Theii will I speak it out, for it 1 
jny heart. Sith thou art no more Prince 
but King, thou canst order matters as 
with none to say thee nay; wherefore it 
reason that thou wilt longer vex thy 
dreary studies, but ivilt bum thy books 
thy mind to things less irksome. Th 
riiined, and mine orphan sisters with m( 

"Kuitied? Prilhee how?" 

'^My back is my bread, O my gracic 
if it go idle, I starve. An' thou cease frc 
mine Office is gone, thouFt need no whip 
Do not tum me away!" 

Tom was touched with this path 



 



"LE ROI EST MORT — VIVE LE ROI.*' 177 

He Said, with a right royal burst of gene- 

iscomfort thyself no fimher, lad. Thine 
shall be permanent in thee and thy line, 
;r." Then he Struck liie boy a light blow 

Shoulder with the flai of his sword» ex- 
lg, "Rise, Humphrcy Marlow, Hereditary 
Whipping-Boy to the Royal House of Eng- 

Banish sorrow — I will bctake me to my 
again, and study so ill that they must m 

treble thy wage, so mightily shall the 
>s of thine office be augmented/' 
e grateful Humphrey responded fervidly — 
hanks, O most noble maäter, thts princely 
less doth far surpass my most distempered 
5 of fortune. Now shall I be happy all my 
ind all the house of Marlow after me " 
m had wit enough to perceive that here 

lad who could be useful to htm. He 
aged Humphrey to talk, and he was 
g loath. He was delightcd to belicvc that 
s helping in Tom's "eure;'' for always, as 
is he had finished calling back to Tom's 
ed mind the various particvilars of bis ex- 
ces and adventures in the royal school- 
and elsewhere about the palace, he noticed 

'rince and the Pauper, I, I* 



 



tyS THE FRmCE AtiB TBE PAUPER* 

that Tom was tlien able to "recall" ihc cir 
stances quile clearly. At Uie end of an 
Tom fotmd h im seif well freighted with 
valuable Information coücerning pcrsonages 
matters pertaining to the Court; so he resi 
to draw instniction from this source daily; ai 
this ^nd iie wonld give order to adrnit Humj 
to the roya.1 doset wheiiever he might come, 
vided the majesty of England was not eng 
with other people. Hiiraphrey had hardly 
dismissed when ray Lord Hertford arrived 
more trouble for Tom. 

He &aid that the Lords of the Council ^ 
ing that some over-wrotigbt report of the E 
damaged health might have leaked out an< 
abroad, they deemed it wise and best tha 
Majesty should begin to dine in public af 
day or two — bis wholesome complexion 
vigorons step, assisted by a carefiilly gui 
repose of mann er and ease and grace o1 
meanour, w^ould more surely qiüet the ge 
pulse- — in case auy evil rumoiirs ^ad gone ab< 
than any other scheme that coüld be de\ise< 

Then the Earl proceeded, very delicatel 
instruct Tom as to the observances proper t 
Etately occasion, under the rather thin dis 



 



"LE ROI EST MORT — VIVE LE ROI.' 



'79 



[xiinding" him conceming things already 

to him; but to his vast gratification it 
out that Tom needed very little help in 
e — he had been making use of Humphrey 

direction, for Humphrey had mentioned 
thin a few days he was to begin to dine 
lic; having gathered it from the swift- 

gossip of the Court. Tom kept these 

himself, however. 

ing the royal memory so improved, the 
jntured to apply a few tests to it, in an 
itly casual way, to find out how far its 
nent had progressed. The results were 

here and there, in spots — spots where 
rey's tracks remained — and on the whole 
i was greatly pleased and encouraged, 
►uraged was he, indeed, that he spokc up 
d in a quite hopeful voice — 
>w am I persuaded that if your Majesty 
t tax your memory yet a little further, it 
lOlve the puzzle of the Great Seal — a ioss 
was of moment yesterday, althougli of 
-day, since its term of Service ended wiih 
) lord's life. May it please your Grace to 
le trial?" 
1 was at sea — a Great Seal was a some- 

12» 



db 



i8o 



TUE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 



tkixig which he was totaliy unacquainted 
After a momeiit's hesitation he looked up 
cently and asked — 

**What was it Uke, my lord?" 

The Earl started, almost imperceptiblyj 
tering to himself, *'Älack, his wits are 
again! — it was ill wisdom to lead him 
strain them" — then he defily tunied the t 
other matters, with the purpose of sweepir 
unkicky Seal out of Tom's thoughts — a pv 
which eastly succeeded 



db 



TOM AS K I \ (•, 




 IC 



V Google 



CHAPTER XV. 

TOM AS KING. 

IE next day the foreign ambassadors camc^ 
heir gorgeous trains; and Tom, throned in 
State, received them. The splendours of 
ene delighted his eye and fired his imagina- 
at first, but the audience was long and 
, and so were most of the addresses — 
bre, what began as a pleasure, grew into 
less and homesickness by-and-by. Tom said 
ords which Hertford put into his mouth 
ime to time, and tried hard to acquit him- 
itisfactorily, but he was too new to such 
, and too ill at ease to accomplish more 
i tolerable success. He looked sufficiently 
king, but he was ill able to feel like one. 
IS cordially glad when the cereraony was 

le larger part of his day was 'fwasted"^as 
med it, in his own mind — in labours per- 



^ 



db 



184 THE PRINCE AND THE PAirPER. 

taining to his royal Office* Even the two 1 
devote d to certain priacely pastimes and rei 
tfons were rather a bürden to him, thaa 
Tiise, they were so fette red by restrictions 
ceremonious obsen^ances, However, he h; 
private hour with his whipping-boy T^'hicl 
counted clear gain, since he got both entei 
Ttient and JieedfuI information out of it, 

The third day of Tom Caiity's kingship 1 
and wem rauch as the others had done, 
there was a Uftitig of lijs doud in one way 
feit less un com fortab le than al firsl; he was gi 
a little used to liis circumstances and surn 
IngS] his chains still galled^ but not all the 
he foimd that the presence and homage 
great afflicted and embarrassed him less an< 
sharply with eveiy lionr that drifted ove 
head< 

But for one Single dread, he could have 
the fourth day approadi wilhout serious di 
— the dining in public; it was to heg in thal 
There were greater matters in the program 
for on that day he would haye to preside 
Council which would take his view^s and 
mands conceming the policy to be pursut 
ward various foreign nations scattered far 



vGoogle 



TOM AS KING. 



185 



/er the great globe; on that day, too, 
i would be formally chosen to the grand 
f Lord Protector; other things of note were 
£d for that fourth day, also; but to Tom 
*re all insigirificant compared with tlie 
Df dining all by himself with a multitude 
►US eyes fastened upon him and a miilti- 

mouths whispering comments upon his 
ance, — and upon his mistakes, if he shoiild 
nlucky as to make any. 
, nothing could stop that fourlh day, and 
:ame. It found poor Tom low-spirlted 
;ent-minded, and this mood continued; he 
not shake it off. The ordinary duties 
morning dragged upon his hands, and 

him. Once more he feit the sense of 
y heavy upon him. 

5 in the forenoon he was in a large 
e Chamber, conversing with the Earl of 
i and duUy awaiting the striking of the 
ppointed for a visit of ceremony from 
iderable number of great officials and 
s. 

tr a little while, Tom, who had wandered 
indow and become interested in the life 
)vement of the great highway beyond ihe 



Mti2 




i86 



THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER* 



palace gates — and not idly interested, but Ic 
with all his tieart to take part in persoa 
stir and freedom^ — saw the van of a liootin 
shoutmg mob of disorderly men, women 
diUdren of the lowest and poorest degr« 
proachiug from up the road* 

"I would I knew what *tis aboutt^' 1 
claimed, with all a boy^s cüriosity m 
happeiiiugs. 

"Thou art the King" solemnly respondi 
Earl, with a reverence* **Have I your C 
leave to act?" 

"0 blilhely, yes! O glaäly» yesV* excl 
Tomj excLtedly, adding to himself with a 
sense of satisfaction, "In tnith, being a 1 
not all dreariness^it hath its corapcnsatioi 
conveniences/^ 

The Earl called a page, and sent him 
captain of the guard with the order — 

"Let the mob be halted, and inquiry 
conceming the occasion of its niovement. 
King's command!" 

A few seconds later a long rank of th( 
guards, cased in flashing steel^ filed otit 
gates and forraed across the highway in f 
the multitude. A messenger returned, to 



 



TOM AS lUNG. 



187 



the crowd were following a man^ a woman, 
a young girl to execulion for crimes com* 
d again&t the peace and dignity of the realm, 
^eath — and a violent death— for these poor 
timates! The ihought wning Tom's heart- 
;s, The spirit of compassion look conirol of 
to the exclusion of all other considerations; 
?ver thought of the offended laws, or of the 
or loss which these three criminals had in- 
i upoE their vidi ms, he could thitik of no- 
but the scaffold and the grisly faie hanglng 
the heads of the condemiied. His concem 
him even forget^ for the moment, thal he 
>ut the false shadow of a king, not the sub- 
e; and before he knew il he had blurted 
IG command — 
Bring them herel'* 

hen he bhished scarlet, and a sort of apology 
g to his lips; but observing that his order 
wrought no sort of surprise in the Earl or 
vaiting page, he suppressed the words he 
about to utter. The page» in the most 
!r-of-course way, made a profound obeisance 
reüred backwards out of the room to dcliver 
ommand» Tom experienced a glow of pride 
a rencwed sense of the compensaling ad- 




4I 



u 



l88 THE PRINCE AND THE PALl^EE. 

vantages of the kingly office. He Said lo hin 
"Truly it is like what I was iised to fcel wl 
read the old priesl's tales, and did imagine 
own seif a prince, giving law and comraan 
all, saying 'Do this, do that/ whilst none i 
ofler let or hltidrance to my will." 

Now the doors swung open; one high-sour 
lille after another was announced, the persoi 
owning them followed, and the place was qu 
half fiUed witli noble folk and finery, But 
was hardly conscious of the presence of 1 
people, so wrought up w^as he and so intei 
absorbed in that other and more intere 
matter. He seated bimself, absentlj, iti bis < 
of statCj and turned bis eyes npon the door 
manifcstations of impatient expectancy; st 
which, the Company forbore to trouble him, 
feil to chatting a mixtnre of public bnsiness 
coiirt gossip one with another* 

In a little while the measured Ire ad of mil 
men was heard approaching, and the cul 
entered the presence in charge of an ui 
sheriff and escorted by a detail of tbe k 
guard. The civil ofjEcer knelt before Tom, 
stood aside; the three doomed persons l 
also, and remained so; the guard took poE 



db 



TOM AS KING. 



iSg 



Tora's chair. Tom scanned the prisoners 
ly. Something about the dress or appear- 
f the man had stirred a vague memory in 
"Methinks I have seen this man ere now 
t the when or the where fail me" — such 
)ra's thought. Just then the man glanccd 
' up and quickly dropped his face again, 
ng able to endure the awful port of sover- 

but the one füll glimpse of the face, 
Tom got, was sufficient. He said to hira- 
Sfow is the matter clear; this is the strangur 
iucked Giles Witt out of the Thames, and 
his life, that windy, bitter, first day of the 
aar — a brave good deed — pity he hath been 
baser ones and got himself in this sad 
. . I have not forgot the day, neither the 
by reason that an hour after, upon the 
of eleven, I did get a hiding by the hand 
amer Canty which was of so goodly and 
d severity that all that went before or 
d after it were but fondlings and caresKos 
iparisoii.". 

m now ordered that the woman and the 
i removed from the presence for a litile 
hen addressed himself to the under-sheri ff j 



 



1 




igo THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

"Good sir, what is this man's offence?'' 

The officer knelt, and answered — 

"So please your Majesty, he hath tab 
life of a s^ubject by poison." 

Tom's compassion for the prisoner, ar 
miration of him as the daring rescuer 
drowning boy, experienced a most dan 
shock, 

"The thing was proven upon him?" he 

"Most clearly, sire." 

Tom sighed, and said — 

"Take hira away — he hath earned his 
'Tis a pity, for he was a brave heart — na- 
mean hc hath the look of it!" 

The prisoner clasped his hands togethe 
^Südden eiiergy, and wrung them despairin^ 
Ihe satne time appealing imploringly t( 
"King" in broken and terrified phrases — 

"O ray lord the King, an' thou canst pi 
lost, have pity upon nie! I am innocent — n 
hath that wherewith I am charged been 
tJiaii biit lainely proved — yet I speak not of 
the judgment is gone forth against me anc 
not suffer alteration; yet in mine extremity 
a boon, for my doom is more than I xan 
A grace, a grace, my lord the King! in thy 



db 



TOM AS KING. 



191 



ion grant my prayer — give command- 
it I be hanged!" 

was amazed. This was not the oul- 

had looked for. 

ds my life, a stränge boon! Was it not 
intended thee?" 

'ood my liege, not so! It is ordered that 
W aliver 

hideous surprise of these words almosi 
om spring from his chair. As soon as he 
Cover his wits he cried out — 
^e thy wish, poor soul! an' thou had 
l a hundred men thou shouldst not suifer 
able a death." 

prisoner bowed his face to the ground 
st into passionate expressions of gratitudc 
writh — 

ever thou shouldst know misfortune — 
jod forefend! — may thy goodness to me 

be remembered and requited!" 
i turned to the Earl of Hertford, and 

lord, is it believable that there was 
for this man's ferocious doom?" 
is te }aw, your Grace — for poisoners. In 
y coiners be boiled to death m oil — not 



 



192 



IHE PRINCE AND llIE PAUPEI 



cast in of a sudden» but by a rope k 
tlie oil by degreesj and slowly; first xl 
the legs, then " 

**0 prithee no more, my lord, I 
itl" cried Tom, covering his eyes wil 
to shut out the picture, '*I beseect 
lordship that order be taken to chai 
— oh, let no more poor creatures be 
its tortures/' 

Tfee EarVs face showed profour 
lion, for he was a maa of merciful ai 
Impulses — a thing not veiy comm( 
class in that iierce age. He said — 

"These yoiir Grace*s noble words 
its doom. Hfstory will remember It to 
of your royal bouse." 

The nnder-sheriff was abont to 
prisoner; Tom gave bim a sign to w; 
said — 

"Good sir, I would look into 
further, The man bas said his de 
lamely proved. Teil me what ihou l 

**If the King's grace please, it 
lipon the trial, that this man entered i 
in the hamkt of Islingtoa where one 
three witnesses say it was at tcn of 



 



TOM AS KING. 



I« 



)rning, and two say it was some mimites 

the sick man being alone at the time, and 

g — and presently the man came forth 

and went his way. The sick man died 

the hour, being torn with spasms and 

gs." 

id any see the poison given? Was poisoii 



arry, no, my liege." 

len how doth one know there was poison 

X all?" 

ease your Majesty, the doctors testified 

ne die with such Symptoms but by poison." 

ighty evidence, this — in that simple age. 

cognised its formidable nature, and said — 

le doctor knoweth his trade — belike they 

ght. The matter hath an ill look for this 

an." 

it was not this all, your Majesty; there is 

Lnd worse. Many testified that a witch, 

one from the village, none know whither, 

etell, and speak it privately in their ears, 

e sick man would die by poison — and more, 

stranger would give it — a stranger with 

hair and clothed in a worn and common 

nd surely this pr isoner doth ans wer wouhdily 



•iftct and the Paußer, J. 



n 



db 



194 



THE PRIHCE AND THE PAUPER. 



to the bin. Please your Majesty to give t 
jcumstance that soleiiui weight which is i 
seeing it wäs /orefoiä'' 

This was an argumeiit of tremendous 
in thaj. süperstUious day. Tom feit that tb 
was scUled; if evIdeDce ivas worth any thii 
poor fcliow^s guilt was proved. Still he 
the prisonür a chaiice, saying — 

^'If thou caiist say aught in thy behalf, i 
"Noiight that will avail, my King. I 
notent, yet caniiot I make it appear. I h 
friends, eise might I show that I was 
Islington üiat day; so also might I show 
that hour they iiame I was above a leaguc 
seeing I was at Wappiiig Old Stairs; yea 
my King, for I could show, that whilst tl 
I was taking life, I was saving it. A dr 

boy -" 

"Peacel Sheriff, name the day the de 
donel" 

**At teil in the moming, or some r 
later, the first day of the New Year, 
iUustriüüs " 

"Let the prisoner go free — it is the 
Willi" 

Another blush followed this unregal oi 



 



TOM AS KING. 



«95^ 



t covered his indeconim as well as lie 
)y adding — 

enrageth me that a man should be hanged 
lieh idle, hare-brained evidence!" 
ow buzz of admiration swept through thc 
lage. It was not admiration of the decree 
d been delivered by Tom, for the propriety 
idiency of pardgning a cx)nvicted poisoner 
thing which few there would have feU 
i in either admitting or admiring — no, the 
tion was for the intelligence and spirit 
Tom had displayed. Some of the low- 
remarks were to this effect — 
iiis is no mad king — he hath his wiis 

7 

OW sanely he put his questions — how like 

mer natural seif was this abrupt imperious 

il of the matter 1" 

od be thanked, his infirmity is spentl This 

ireakling, but a king. He hath borne him- 

:e to his own father." 

e air being filled with applause, Tom's ear 

arily caught a little of it. The effect which 

id upon him was to put him greatly at his 

and also to charge his System with very 

ing sensations. 

13» 



 



iQÖ 



IHE PRINCE ANB THE PAUPER. 



However, liis juvenile curiosity sooi 
siiperior to these pleasant thoughts and fei 
Iie was eager to know what sort of deadl 
Chief the woraaa and the little girl coulc 
been about; so, by liis command the two t^ 
and sobbing creatures were brought before 

"What is it that these have done?^' 
quired of the sheriiT. 

'*Please yourMajesty, a black crinae is d 
upon them, and clearly provenj wherefo 
judges have decreed, according to the law 
they be hanged. They sold themselves 
devil — ^such is their crime»" 

Tom shu ddered. He had been taught 
hör people who did tliis wicked thing. St 
was not going lo deny himself the pleas 
feeding bis coriosity, for all that; so he as 

*-Where was this donc? — and when?" 

"On a midnight, in December — in a 
church, your Majesty," 

Tom shuddered again* 

"Who was there present?" 

" Only these two, your grace — and that 

*'Have these confessed?" 

"Nay, not so, sire^ — they do deny it" 

"Then prithee, how was it known?" 



db 



TOM AS KING. 



197 



ertain witnesses did see them wending 
, good your Majesty; this bred the sus- 
and dire effects have since confirmed and 
i it In particular, it is in evidence that 
i the wicked power so obtained, they did 
and bring about a storm that wasted all 
[ion round about Above forty witnesses 
•oved the storm; and sooth one might have 
thousand, for all had reason to remember 
all had suffered by it." 
jrtes this is a serious matter." Tom turned 
rk piece of scoundrelism over in his mind 
, then asked — 

ffered the woman, also, by the storm?" 
eral old heads among the assemblage 
their recognition of the wisdom of this 
Q. The sheriff, however, saw nothing coi\- 
tial in the inquiry; he answered, willi 
directness — 

deed did she, your Majesty, and most 
usly, as all aver. Her habitation was swept 
md herseif and child left shelterless." 
ethinks the power to do herseif so ill a 
is dearly bought. She had been cheated, 
e paid but a farthing for it; that she paid 
al, and her child's, argueth that she is 



 



iqS 



THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER, 



mad; if she !s mad she knoweth not wh 
doth, therefore sinnetli not" 

The elderly heads nodded recognit 
Tom's wisdom once more, and one ind 
murmured^ "An' ihe King be mad hhnself, 
ing 10 report, then is it a niadness of a sc 
would improve the sanity of some I wot o 
the gentle providence of God they co;j 
catch it." 

"WTiat age hath the child?" asked To 
"Nine years, please your Majesty." 
"By the law of England may a c!iil( 
into covenant and seil itself, my lord?" 
Tom, turning to a leamed judge. 

"The law doth not permit a child t( 
or meddle in arty weighty matter, good m 
holding that its callow wit unfitteih ii 1 
witii the riper "v^dt and evil schemings o 
that are its eiders, The devü 113 ay buy : 
if he so chooscj and the child agree ther« 
not an Englishman^ — in this latter case t 
tract would he null and void." 

"It seemeth a rüde unchristiati thing» 
contrived, that English law denieth privil 
Englishmen^ to waste theni on the devilT 
Tom, with honest heat, 






Diqitizedb 



TOM AS KING. 



I9<5 



is novel view of the matter excited many 
, and was stored away in many heads to 
eated about the Court as evidence of Tonics 
ility as well as progress toward mental 

e eider culprit had ceased from sobbing, 
as hanging upon Tom's words with an ex- 
nterest and a growing hope. Tom noiiced 
nd it strongly inclined bis sympathies lo- 
[ler in her perilous and unfriended situa- 
Presently he asked — 
[ow wrought they, to bring the storm?" 
*y puUing off ihetr siocktngs, sire." 
is astonished Tom, and also fired his 
ty to fever heat. He said, eagerly — 
is wonderful! Hath it always this dread 

IW^ys, my liege — at least if the woman 

it, and utter the needful words, eithcr in 

ind or with her tongue." 

m tumed to the woman, and said with im- 

is zeal — 

Ixert thy power — I would see a storm F' 

lere was a sudden paling of cheeks in the 

titious assemblage, and a general, though 

ressed, desire to get out of the place— all 



Diailizi 



 



200 THE PRITTCE AND THE PAUPER. 

of will ch was lost upon Tom, who wa 
ever)'t]iing but the proposed catadysn 
a puzzled and astonislied look in th< 
face, he added, excltedly^ 

**Never fear — thou shalt be blainel< 
— thou shalt go free^none shall tc 
Exert thy power/^ 

*'0h, my lord the King, I have it nc 
been falsely accused." 

**Thy fears stay thee. Be of good l 
shalt sufler no härm. Make a stonn — it 
not how small a one — I require nough 
harmfnl, but indeed prefer the opposit« 
and thy life is spared— thou shalt go 
with thy child, bearing the King's pa 
safe from hurt or malice from any in t] 

The woman prostrated herseif, and 
Yäth tears, that she had no power 
miracle, eise she would gladly win h 
life, alone, and be content to lose her ( 
obedience to the King's command so ] 
grace might be acquired. 

Tom urged — the woman still adhei 
declarations. Finally he said — 

"I think the woman hath said true, 
mother were in lier place and gifted 



V Google 



TOM AS KING. 



2D1 



functions, she had not stayed a moment 
1 her storms and lay the whole land in 
if the saving of my forfeit life were thc 
;he got! It is argument that other mothers 
ade in like mould. Thou art free, good 
thou and thy child — for I do think thee 
nt Nervo thou'st nought to fear, being par- 
— pull off thy stockings! — an' thou canst 
me a storm, thou shalt be rieh!" 
e redeemed creature was loud in her grati- 
and proceeded to obey, whilst Tom looked 
h eager expectanqr, a little marred by ap- 
ision; the courtiers at the same time maiii- 
: decided discomfort and uneasiness. The 
1 stripped her own feet and her little girl's 
and plainly did her best to reward the 

generosity with an earthquake, but it was 
ailure and a disappointment. Tom sighed, 
Lid— 

'here, good soul, trouble thyself no further, 
wer is departed out of thee. Go thy way 
ice; and if it retum to thee at any time, 
me not, but fetch me a storm."* 

See Notes to Chapter XV. at end of volume II. 



Digitized by 



Google 



1 



db 



THE STATE DINNER. 



 IC 



google 



CHAPTER XIV. 
THE STATE DINNER. 

EE dinner hour drew near — yet strangely 
[i, the thought brought but slight discomfort 
n, and hardly any terror. The morning's 
ences had wonderfully built up bis con- 
t; the poor little ash-cat was already more 
i to bis Strange garret, after four days' 
than a mature person could have become 
ill month. A child's facility in accommo- 
. itself to circumstances was never more 
gly illustrated. 

t US privileged ones hurry to the great 
eting-room and have a glance at matters 
whilst Tom is being made ready for the 
Hg occasion. It is a spacious apartment, 
jilded pillars and pilasters, and pictured 
and ceilings. At the door stand tall guards, 
d as statues, dressed in rieh and picturesque 
les, and bearing halberds. In a high gal- 



Digifeed by VjOOQ IC 



2o6 



IHE PRINCE AND THE EAUPER. 



lery which nms all around the place Is ; 
of musicians and a packe d Company of t 
of both sexes, in briUiant attire. In the 
of the room, tipon a ralsed platform, is 
table, New let the ancient chronicler spe; 

"A gentleman enter & the room bearing 
and along with him another bearing a tabL 
which, after they have botb Imeeled three 
with the utmost veneratioo, he spreads u[ 
table, aad after kiieeling agaia they both 
then come two others, one with Ihe rod 
the other with a sah- cell ar, a plate, and 
when they have kneeled as the others hat 
and placed what was brought upon the 
they too r et Ire with the same ceremom« 
formed by the first; at last conie two 
richly clothed, one bearing a tasting-knift 
after prostrating thenxselves Ihree times 
most graceful manner p approacb and ri 
table with bread and sait, with as much 
if the King had been present," * 

So end the solenin preüminaries. Nc 
down the echoing corridors we hear a 
blast, and the indistinct cry, «Place for the 

• Leigh Huties "The Towti," p. 408, quotatii 
an early lourist* 



db 



THE STATE DINNER. 



207 



or the King's most excellent majesty!" 
sounds arc momently repeated — they grow 

and nearer — and presently, almost in our 
the martial note peals and the cry rings 
Way for the King!'' At this instant the 
r pageant appears, and files in at the door, 
i measured march. Let the chronicler 
again : — 

irst come Gentlemen, Barons, Earls, Knights 
Carter, all richly dressed and bareheaded; 
omes the Chancellor, between two, one of 

carries the royal sceptre, the other the 

of State in a red scabbard, studded with 
fleurs-de-lis, the point upwards; next 

the King himself — whom, upon his ap- 
g, twelve trumpets and many drums salute 
, great burst of welcome whilst all in the 
es rise in their places, crying *God save 
ing!' After him come nobles attached to 
rson, and on his right and left march his 

of honour, his fifty Gentlemen Pensioners, 
ilt battle-axes." 

ds was all fine and pleasant. Tom's pulse 
ligh and a glad light was in his eye. He 
limself right gracefully, and all the more so 
56 he was not thinking of how he was doing 



 



it, bis mind beiiig charmed and occupi 
ihe blithe sights aiid sounds about him — 
sides, nobody can be very iingraceful iu 
fitting beautiful clothes after he has g 
little used to them — especially if he is 
momeut unconscious of them. Tom remc 
his instructioos, and acknowledged his j 
with a slight incltnatioii of bis plumed he 
a courteous "I thank ye, my good people. 

He seated himself at table, without rt 
his cap; and did it without the least em 
mentj for to eat wilh one*s cap on was 
soHtary royal custom upon which the kir 
the Catitys met upon common ground, 
party having any advantage over the othe 
matter of old familiarity with it. The ] 
broke up and grouped itself picturesque 
remained bareheaded. 

Now, to the sound of gay music, the ^ 
of the Guard eniered,— "the tallest and m 
men in England, they being carefuliy sek 
this regard" — but we will let the chroni« 
about it^^ 

"The Yeomeii of the Guard entered 
headed, clothed in scarlet, with golden ros 



db 



THE STATE DINNER. 



209 



acks; and these went and came, bringing 
1 tum a course of dishes, served in plate. 
dishes were received by a gentleman in 
[ne Order they were brought, and placed 
:he table, while the taster gave to each 
a mouthful to eat of the particular dish he 
ought, for fear of any poison." 

m made a good dinner, notwithstanding he 
)nscious that hundreds of eyes followed 
lorsel to his mouth and watched him eat 
i an interest which could not have beeu 
ntense if it had been a deadly explosive 
as expected to blow him up and scatter 
il about the place. He was careful not to 

and equally careful not to do anything 
'er for himself, but wait tili the proper 

knelt down and did it for him. He got 
h without a mistake — flawless and precious 
h. 

len the meal was over at last and he 
ed away in the midst of his bright pageant, 
he happy noises in his ears of blaring 
, rolling drums and thundering acclama- 
he feit that if he had seen the worst of 
in public it was an ordeal which he would 

rinct anä ihe Pauker, /. I4 



 IC 

4 




be gl ad to endure several times a day if by 
means he could but buy himself free from 
of the more formidable requirements of bis 
Office. 



db 



FOO-FOO THE FIRST. 



H' 



 IC 



CHAPTER XVII. 
FOO-FOO THE FIRST. 

[lesHendon hurried along toward the South- 
end of the bridge, keeping a sharp look- 
r the persons he sought, and hoping and 
ting to overtake them presently. He was 
lointed in this, however. By asking questions, 
IS enabled to track them part of the way 
h Southwark; then all traces ceased, and 
LS perplexed as to how to proceed. Still, 
itinued his eflforts as best he could during 
ist of the day. Nightfall found him kg- 
half famished, and his desire as far froni 
plishment as ever: so he supped at the 
d inn and went to bed, resolved to make 
ly Start in the morning, and give the town 
haustive seärch. As he lay thinking and 
ng, he presently began to reason thus: The 
^ould escape from the ruffian, his reputed 
, if possible; wöuld he go back to London 



db 



214 



THE PiONCE ANB TOE PAOTEE* 



and seek his former haunts? No, he woi 
do that, he would avoid recapture* Wha 
wouid he do? Never having had a fr 
the World, or a protector, until he me 
Hendon^ he would naturally try to fin 
friend again, provided the efibrt did not 
bim to go toward London and dangen H< 
strike for Hendon Hall^ that is what hc 
do, for he knew Hendon was homeward 
and there he might expect to find hin: 
the ca&e was piain to Hendon^ — he must 
raore time in Southwark, hut move a 
thron gh Kent, toward Monk's Holm, se 
the wood and inquiring as he went Lei 
turn to the vanished little King, now^ 

The ruffian whom the waiter at the 
the hridge saw "about to join" the yow 
the King, did not exactiy join them, but 
dose behind them and followed their ste| 
Said nothing, His left arm was in a slir 
he wore a large green patch over his left ^ 
limped slightly^ and used an oaken staj 
Support. The youth led the King a t 
course through Southwark, and by-and-by 
into the high road beyond. The King 
Titatedj now^ and said he would stop h 



db 



FOO-FOO THE FIRST. 2t^ 

[endon's place to come to him, not his to 

Hendon. He would not endure such in- 

e; he would stop where he was. The youth 

üiou'lt tarry here, and thy friend lying 
led in the wood yonder? So be it, then." 

le King's manner changed at once. He 

out — 

S^ounded? And who hath dared to do it? 
hat is apart; lead on, lead on! Faster, 
! art shod with lead? Wounded, is he? 
though the doer of it be a duke's son, he 
rue it!" 

was some distance to the wood, but the 
was speedily traversed. The youth looked 

him, discovered a bough sticking in the 
d, with a small bit of rag tied to it, then 
le way into the forest, watching for similar 
LS and finding them at intervals; they were 
itly guides to the point he was aiming at, 
d-by an open place was reached, where 
the charred remains of a farm house, and 
them a b^Jrn which was falling to min and 
\ There was no sign of life anywhere, and 
silence prevailed. The youth entered the 



db 



TRE PRINCE AKB THE PAi 



.upm. 



bam, the King followuig eagerly upon liis 
No one there! The King shot a sitrpris( 
suspicious glance at the youth, and asked- 

*'Where is he?" 

A mocking laugh was his answen Th 
was in a rage in a moment; he seized a l 
Avood and was in üie act of charging up 
yonth wKen another mocking laugh feil u] 
ear, It was from the lame ruffian who ha 
following at a distance. The King türm 
Said angriiy — 

"Who art thou? What is thy business 

"Leave thy foolery/' said the manj 
qniet thyself. My disgnise is none so go 
thou canst pretend thou knowest not thy 
through it," 

"Thou art not my father. X know th 
I am the King. If thou hast hid my ! 
find him for me, or thou shalt sup son 
what thou hast done." 

John Canty replied, in a stem and mi 
voice — 

"It h piain thou art niad, and I am 1 
pnnish thee; but if thou provoke me, 
Thy prating doth no härm here, where th 



db 



FOO-FOO THE FIRST. 



217 



Lrs that need to mind thy follies; yet it is 
to practise thy tongue to wary speech, that 
y do no hurt when our quarters change. I 
done a murder, and may not tarry at home 
ther shalt thou, seeing I need thy Service, 
lame is changed, for wise reasons; it is 
s — John Hobbs; thine is Jack — charge thy 
)ry accordingly. Now, then, speak. Where 
' mother? where are thy sisters? They came 
) the place appointed — knowest thou whither 
went?'' 

he King answered, suUenly — 

Irouble me not with these riddles. My 
er is dead; my sisters are in the palace." 
he youth near by burst into a derisive laugh, 
the King would have assaulted him, but 
Y — or Hobbs, as he now called himself-^pre- 
d him, and said — 

Peace, Hugo, vex him not; his mind is 
y, and thy ways fret him. Sit thee down, 
and quiet thyself; thou shalt have a morsel 
i, anon." 

lobbs and Hugo feil to talking together, in 



db 



"«^ 



218 THE FRINCE AND THK PAUPER. 

low voices, and the King removed himseli 
as he could from their disagreeable co 
He withdrew inlo ihe twiliglit of the fartl 
of the barn, where he found the earthe 
bedded a foot deep with straw. He ia} 
here, drew straw over h im seif in Heu of bl 
and was soon absorbed in thinkings, Jr 
many griefs, but the minor ones were s^ 
most into forgetfiilness by the supreme 01 
ioss of bis father. To the rest of the wc 
name of Henry VlII. brought a shiver, ai 
gested an ogre wliose nostrils breathed ( 
tion and whose band de alt scourgings and 
but to this boy the name brought only sei 
of pleasure, the figure it invoked wore ; 
tenance tliat was all gentkness and a 
He caUed to raind a long succession of 
passages between his father and bimse 
dwelt fondly upon them, his unstinted t 
testing how deep and real was the gri 
possessed his heart, As the aftemoon 
away, the lad, wearied with his trouble 
gradually into a Ixanquil and healiiig slui 
After a considerable timo — he could 



db 



FOO-FOO THE FIRST. 



2tq 



long — ^his senses struggled to a half-con- 
tiess, and as he lay with closed eyes vaguely 
ring where he was and what had been 
ning, he noted a murmurous sound, the 

beating of rain upon the roof. A snug 
of comfort stole over him, which was nidely 
1, the next moment, by a chorus of piping 
s and coarse laughter. It startled him dis- 
ibly, and he unmuffled his head to see 
e this intemiption proceeded. A grim and 
Ltly picture n\et his eye. A bright fire was 
lg in the middle of the floor, at the other 
■ the barn; and around it, and lit weirdly 

the red glare, lolled and sprawled the 
st Company of tattered gutter-scum and 
is, of both sexes, he had ever read or 
ed of. There were huge, stalwart men, 
with exposure, long-haired, and clothed in 
tic rags; there were middle-sized youths, of 
2nt countenance, and similarly clad; there 
blind mendicants, with patched or ban- 

eyes; crippled ones, with wooden legs and 
es; diseased ones, with running sores peep- 
m ineffectual wrappings; there was a villain- 



dbv Google 



220 



THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 



looking peddkr with his pack; a khife-gr 
tinker^ and a barber-surgeon, with the imp 
of their trades; some of the females were 
grown girlsi some were at prime, some v 
and wrinkled hags, and all were loud, 
foul-mouthed; and all soiled and slatternl 
were three sore-faced babies; there were i 
of starvelling curs, with strings about thei 
whose Office was to lead the blind. 

The night was come, the gang h 
finished feasting, an orgy was beginn ing; 
of liquor was passing from mouth to moi 
general cry broke forth — 

**A songl a song from the Bat and D 
Dat-and-go-One!" 

One of the blind men got up, and 
ready by casting aside the patches that sl 
his excelleiit eyes, and the pathetic placan 
recited the cause of his calamity. Dot- 
One disencumbered himself of his timi 
and took his place, upon sound and 
limbs, beside his fellow-rascal; then they 
out a roUicking ditty, and were re-enfor 
the whole crew, at the end of each stanz; 




db 



FOO-FOO THE FIRST. 



221 



Chorus. By the time the last stanza was 
, the half-drunken enthusiasm had risen 
a pitch, that everybody joined in and 
clear through from the beginnmg, pro- 
a volume of villanous sound that made 
lers quake. These were the inspiring 



Bien Darkman*s then, Bouse Mort and Ken, 

The bien Coves bings awast, 

On Chatcs to trine by Rome Coves dine 

For his long lib at last. 

Bing'd out bien Morts and toure, and toure, 

Bing out of the Rome vile bine, 

And toure the Cove that cloy*d your duds, 

lipon the Chates to trine." ♦ 

iversation foUowed; not in the thieves' 
of the song, for that was only used in 
len unfriendly ears might be listening. In 
irse of it it appeared that "John Hobbs" 
t altogether a new recniit, but had trained 
gang at some former time. His later 
was called for, and when he said he had 
mtally" killed a man, considerable satis- 

From **The ]English Rogue." London, 1665. 



tb 



212 



THE PRINCE ÄND THE PAUPER, 



faction was expressed; wheii he added 
man was a priest, he was round ly ap 
and had to take a drink with everybody, 
quaintances welcomed him gushingly^ £ 
ones were proud to shake him by the ha 
was askcd why he had "tarried away 
months." He answered — 

"London is better than the counlry, a 
these late years, the laws be so bitter 
diligently enforced. An' I had not had 
cident, I had staid there, I had resolved 
and never more venture country-wards— 
accident has ended that" 

He uiquired how many persons tl 
nuinbered now* The "Ruffler/* or ch 
swered^ — 

"Five and twenty sturdy bndges, hu] 
clapperdogeons and maunders, counting 1 
and doxies and other morts,* Most 3 
the rest are wandering eastwaid, along tl 
lay* We foUow at dawn/' 



• Canling terms for vajioas kinds of thieves, be 
vagabonds, and their female compoiiions. 



V Google 



FOO-FOO THE FIRST. 22^ 

\ 

do not See the Wen among the honest I 

)out me. Where may he be?" i 

Dor lad, his diet is brimstone, now, and over „ 

r a delicate taste. He was killed in a 

somewhere about midsummer." 
sorrow to hear that; the Wen was a capable 
and brave." 

'hat was he, truly. Black Bess, his dell, is 
yet, but absent on the eastward tramp; a 
SS, of nice ways and orderly conduct, none 

»eeing her drunk above four days in the 

ff 

;he was ever strict — I remember it well — a 
r wench and worthy all commendation» 
lother was more free and less particular^ a 
esome and ugly tempered beldame, but 
bed with a wit above the common." 
Ve lost her through it Her gift of palmistry 
ther sorts of fortune-telling begot for her at 
witch's name and fame. The law roasted 
3 death at a slow fire. It did touch me to 
t of tendemess to see the gallant way slie 
iier lot — cursing and reviling all the crowd 
gaped and gazed around her, whilst the 



 



H 



tz^ 



THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPf 



flames licked upward toward her face 

her thin locks aiid crackled about J 

head — cursmg ihem, said I?— cursinj 

an' thou shouldst live a thousand y. 

never hear so masterful a cursing, 

art died with her. There be base a 

imitalions left, but no true blasphem^ 

The Rumer sighed^ the listener 

sympalhy; a general depression fe 

Company for a moment, for even ha 

casts like these are not wholly dead t 

but are able to feel a fleeting sense 

affliction at wide intervals and tinde 

favouriug circürastances— as in cases 

for instance^ when genius and culuire 

leave no heir. However, a deep drin 

soon restored the spirits of the moum 

''Have any others of our friends far 

asked Hobbs. 

"Some— yes. Particulärly new coi 
as small husbandmen tumed shiftless 
lipon the World because their farms 
from them to be changed to sheep ran 
begged, aod were whipped at the cart's 



db 



FOO-FOO THE FIRST. 225 

the girdle up, tili the blood ran; then set 
e Stocks to be pelted; they begged again, 
whipped again, and deprived of an ear; 
begged a third time — poor devils, what eise 
they do? — and were branded on the cheek 
a red-hot iron, then sold for slaves; they 
way, were hunted down, and hanged. 'Tis 
if tale, and quickly told. Others of us have 
less hardly. Stand forth, Yokel, Bums, and 
e — show your adomments!" 
hese stood up and stripped away some of 
rags, exposing their backs, criss-crossed with 
old w41ts ieft by the lash; one tumed up 
air and showed the place where a Ieft ear 
}nce been; another showed a brand upon 
loulder — the letter V — and a mutilated ear; 
lird Said — 

[ am Yokel, once a farmer and prosperous, 
loving wife and kids — now am I somewhat 
ent in estate and calling; and the wife and 
are gone; mayhap they are in heaven, may- 
n — in the other place — but the kindly God 
anked, they bide no more in England! My 
old blameless mother strove to earn bread 

Prince and the Pauper. J. 15 



Digiti^d by VjOOQ IC 

i 



% 



226 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPEl 

by mirsiög ihe sick; one of ihese died 
knew nol how, so my mother was 
witch, whüst my babcs looked on 
EngUsh law! — np, all, with your cuj 
together and with a cheer l^drink ta 
English law that delivered her from 
heUl Thank you, mates, one and all 
from house to house— I and the w 
witli US the hungry kids— ^but it was 
hungry in England— so they stripj 
lashed ns through three towns. E 
again to the merciful English lawl— 
drank deep of my Mary's blood anc 
deliverance came quick. She lies t 
potter's field, safe £rora all harms. A 
— well, whüst the law lashed nie fi 
town, they starved. Drink, lads — on 
a diop to the poor kids, that never d 
tuje härm. T begged again^ — b^gged 
and got the Stocks and lost an ear 
bides the stnmp; I begged again, anc 
stump of the other to keep me mi 
And still I begged again ^ and was 
slave — 'here on my cheek nnder this 



b 




roo*Foo TUE rmsT, 227 

cd It off, ye might see thc red S ihe branding- 
left theret A slave! Do yc understand 
wordl An English slave! — that is he tliat 
Is before y^, I bave run from niy masteri 
when I am found — the heavy curse of heaven 
m the law of the land that hath commanded 
[ shall hang!" * 
i ringing voice came through the niurky 

ThoTi shalt mH — and this day the end of 

law is come!" 

Jl turned, and saw the f anlast ic figure of 

little King approachmg hurriedlyj as it 

ged mto tlie light and was clcarly revealed, 

leral exploston of inquiries broke out — 

\Vho is it? Wkai is it? Who are thou, 

kin?" 

'he boy stood unconfused in the midst of all 

! surprised and questioning eyes, and an- 

:d with princely dignity — 

T am Edward, King of England " 

t wild bnrst of laughter followed^ partly of 

' Sea Note 10, ai eiid of volume IL 

IS* 



^CE ANU TEE PAI 



Urai^^ 



derision and partly of delight in the ex 
of the joke. The King was stiing. I 
sharply^ — 

"Ye mannerless vagrants, is this your 
tion of the royal boon I have protnised?" 

He Said more, with angry voice and 
gesture, but it was lost in a whirlwind of \ 
and mocking exclamations. "John Hobbs 
several attempts to tnake himself hear< 
the din, and at last sncceeded — saying — 

*^MateSy he is my son, a dreamer, a f 
stark mad — -mind him not— he thinket] 
Ihe King." 

"I am the King/' said Edward, tun 
ward him, **as thou shalt know to thy 
good time* Thou hast confessed a muxde 
shalt Swing for it.'* 

''ThonHi betray m<tl—ihm? An' I 
hands npon thee— — '* 

"TuMut!" said the burly Rufflcr, int* 
in time to save the King^ and emphasis 
Service by knocking Hobbs dowTi with 
"hast respect for ncither Kings nor R^ffl* 
thou insult my presence so agam, 111 ha 



db 



FOO-FOO THE FIKST. 22g 

lyself." Then he said to his Majesty, "Thou 

make no threats against thy mates, lad; 
thou must guard thy tongue from saying 
of them elsewhere. Be King, if it please 
tiad humour, but be not harmful in it Sitik 
:itle thou hast uttered — 'tis treason; we be 
men in some few trifling ways, but none 
lg US is so base as to be traitor to his King; 
►e loving and loyal hearts, in that regard. 

if I speak truth. Now — all together: *Long 
Edward, King of England!'" 
Long live Edward, King of England!" 
'he response came with such a thundergust 

the motley crew that the crazy building 
ted to the sound. The little King's face 
sd with pleasure for an instant, and he 
tly inclined his head, and said with grave 
licity — 

I thank you, my good people." 
liis unexpected result threw the Company 
convulsions of merriment. When something 
quiet was presently come again, the Ruffler 

firmly, but with an accent of good nature^ 
'Drop it, boy, 'tis not wise, nor well. Humour 



Digitizedb ^H^H 



thy faiicy, if thou miisl, but choost: son 

A tinker shrieked out a Suggestion — 

^Foo-foo th€ First, King of the Moor 

The title "took," at once, every tl: 
sponded, and a roaring shoiit went up^ o 

"Long live Foo-foo the First, King 
MooncalvesI" followed by hootings, cat-c 
peals of laughter* 

**Hale him forth, and crown himJ" 

«Robe himl" 

"Sceptre hira!" 

"Throne him!" 

These and twenty other cries brok» 
once! and almost before the poor littl 
could draw a breath he was crowned w: 
basin, robed in a tattered blanket, Üiror 
a barrel, and sceptred with the tinker's & 
iron, Then all üung theraselves upon th( 
abont him and sent up a chorus of ironi 
ings, and mocking supplications, whi 
swabbed their eyes with their soiled am 
sleeves and aprons — 

"Be gracious to us, O sweet Kingl" 



db 



FOO-FOü THE FIRST. 3J| 

rrample not upon thy beseeching worms, O 
Majesty!" 

Hty thy slaves, and com fort them with a 
kick!" 

^heer us and warm us with thy gracious 
3 flaming sun of sovereignty!" 
»anctify the ground with the touch of ihy 
hat we may eat the dirt and be ennobled!'* 
)eign to spit upon us, O Sire, that our chü- 
children may teil of thy princely coii- 
ision, and be proud and happy forever!" 
it the humorous tinker made the "hit" of 
ening and carried off the honours. Kneel- 
le pretended to kiss the King's foot, and 
ndignantly spurned; whereupon he weiit 
begging for a rag to paste over the place 
his face which had been touched by the 
saying it must be preserved from contact 
he vulgär air, and that he should make his 
e by going on the highway and exposing it 
w at the rate of a hundred Shillings a sighL 
ade himself so killingly funny that he was 
Qvy and admiration of the whole mangy 



 



1 



2^2 



iTTK rrtisrcr ant> the paitper. 



Tears of shame and indignaüon stoo< 
little monarch's eyes; and tlie tbought 
heart was, ^*Had I offered them a deej 
they could not be more crud^yei have 
fered nought but to do them a kiadness- 
is thus they iise me for it!'* 



END (W VOL. L 



db 



THE PRINCE 

D THE PAUPER 

A TALE FOR YüUNG PEOPLE 
OF ALL AGES 

BY 

MARK TWAIN 

(SAMUEL L. CLEMENS) 

R OF " A TRAMP ABROAD," " THB INNOCBNTS ABROAD/' ITC. 

AUTHORIZED EDITION. 
IN TWO VOLUMES.— VOL. IL 



LEIPZIG 
BERNHARD TAUCHNITZ 

1881. 



Digitized by CjOOQ IC 

Ä 



>- 



 



CONTENTS 

OF VOLUME Jl- 



CHAFTER XVIII. 
*riiicc whh the Tramps i 

CHAPTER XIX, 
'rince wilh thc Feasann . 17 

CHAPTER XX: 
*riiice and the Heimiit *,,...* 31 

CHAPTER XXL 

ort to ihe Rescüc ...,.*., ^1 

CHAPTER XXII. 
riiiji of Treachery ..,.,.., 55 

CHAPTER XXllL 
PHnct 9. Prisoner ........ ^ ß^ 

CHAFTER XXIV. 
K^dstpc j^ 

CHAPTER XXV, 
don Hall , . . 8;^ 



Digitized bv V-jO' 



VJ CONTEN'IS OF VOLUME U. 

CHAPTER XXVL 
Dtsowncid ........ 

CHAPTER XXVn. 
Tn PriBoa _,...... 

CHAFTER XXVm. 
TheSadrifice ....... 

CHAPTER XXtX. 
Tu London ^ 

CHAPTER XXX. 
Tütii'^ Progress . 

CHAFl'ER XXXL 

The Eecogtution Proceaäon . , ^ . 

CHAPTER XXXn, 
Coronation Day ....*.. 

CHAPTER XXXm. 
Edwturdas King ,,.**.* 

CONCLUSION. 
Jusdcc änd RetHbudoti 

NOTES 



db 



HE PRINCE WITH THE TRAMPS. 



itf ß'f^c^ snd tlu Pan/t€t\ iL 



yCOä 



 



CHAPTER XVIII. 
THE PRINCE WnH THE TRAMPS. 

The trcx)p of vagabonds turned out at early 
n, and set forward on their march. There 
a lowering sky overhead, sloppy ground under 
, and a winter chill in the air. All gaiety 
gone from the Company; some were sullen 
silent, some were irritable and petulant, none 
* gentle-humoured, all were thirsty. 
rhe Ruffler put "Jack" in Hugo's charge, with 
e brief instructions, and commanded John 
ty to keep away from him and let him alone; 
also warned Hugo not to be too rough with 
lad. 

Aufter a while the weather grew milder, and 
clouds lifted somewhat. The troop ceased to 
er, and their spirits began to improve. They 
V more and more cheerful, and finally began 
:h.aff each other and insult passengers along 
highway. This showed that they were awak- 



db 



4 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER^ 

ing to an appreciation of life and its joys once 
more. The dread in which their sort was held 
was apparent in the fact that everybody gave 
them the road, and took their ribald insolences 
meekly, without venturing to talk back. They 
snatched linen from the hedges, occasionally in 
füll view of the owners, who made no protest, but 
only seemed grateful that they did not take the 
hedges, too. 

By and by they invaded a small farm-house 
and made themselves at home while the trembling 
farmer and his people swept the larder clean to 
fumish a breakfast for them. They chucked the 
housewife and her daughters under the chin 
whilst receiving the food from their hands, and 
made coarse jests about them, accompanied with 
insulting epithets and bursts of horse-laughter. 
They threw bones and vegetables at the farmer 
and his sons, kept them dodging all the time, 
and applauded uproariously when a good hit was 
made. They ended by buttering the head of one 
of the daughters who resented some of their 
familiarities. When they took their leave they 
threatened to come back and bum the house 
over the heads of the family if any report of 
their doings got to the ears of the authorities. 



 



THE PRINCE WITH THE TRAMPS. 5 

bout noon, after a long and weary tramp» 
ang came to a halt behind a hedge on the 
rts of a considerable village. An hour was 
td for rest, then the crew scattered theni- 

abroad to enter the village at different 
> to ply their various trades. — "Jack" was 
with Hugo. They wandered hither and 
:r for some time, Hugo watching for op- 
lities to do a stroke of business, but finding 
—so he finally said — 

[ see nought to steal; it is a paltry place, 
efore we will beg." 
We, forsooth! FoUow thy trade — it befits 

But / will not beg." 
rhou'lt not beg!" exclaimed Hugo, eyeing 
Cing with surprise. "Prithee, since when 
thou reformed?" 
Wliat dost thou mean?" 
Mean? Hast thou not begged the streets of 
on all thy life?" 
I? Thou idiot?" 

Spare thy compliments — thy stock will last 
onger. Thy father says thou hast begged 
tiy days. Mayhap he lied. Peradventure 
svill even make so bold as to sqy he lied," 
;d Hugo. 



 



1 



6 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

"Him^ö« call my father? Yes, he lied." 

"Come, play not thy merry game of madman 
so far, mate; use it for thy amusement, not thy 
hurt An' I teil him this, he will scorch thee 
finely for it" 

"Save thyself the trouble. I will teil him." 

"I like thy spirit, I do in truth; but I do not 
admire thy judgment. Bone-rackings and bast- 
ings be plenty enow in this life, without going 
out of one's way to invite them. But a truce to 
these matters; / believe your father. I doubt not 
he can lie; I doubt not he doth lie, upon occasion, 
for the best of us do that; but there is no occasion 
here. A wise man does not waste so good a 
commodity as lying for nought. But come; sith 
it is thy humour to give over begging, where- 
withal shall we busy ourselves? With robbing 
kitchens?" 

The King said, impatiently — 

"Have done with this foUy — you weary me!" 

Hugo replied, with temper — 

"Now harkee, mate; you will not beg, you will 
not rob; so be it But I will teil you what you 
will do. You will play decoy whilst / beg. 
Refuse, an' you think you may venture!" 



 



THE miNCE WITH THE TRAÄrPS* 7 

Phe King was about lo reply contemptuously, 
i Hugo Said, interruptiiig — 
Peace! Here comes one with a kindly face, 
will I fall down in a fit, VVhen thc stranger 
tD roe, set you up a wai(, and fall upon your 
Sp sectning to weep; then cry out as all the 
s of misery were in your belly^ and say, 
SIT, it is my poor afflicted broiher^ and we 
riendless; o' God*s name cast through.your 
ifui eyes one piliful look upon a sick, for- 
a, and mosl miserable wrelch; bestow one 
penny out of thy riclies upon one smitten of 
and ready to perishl^— and mind you, keep 
Qn wailing, and abate not tili we buk him of 
yenny, eise shall you rüe it." 
rhen immediately Hugo began to moan, and 
□, and roll his eyes, and reel and totter 
t; and when tlie stranger was close at band, 
i he sprawled before Mm, witb a shriek^ and 
n to writhe and wallow in the dirt, in seem- 
igony, 

O dear^ O dear!" cried the benevolent 
igerp "O poor soül, poor soul, how he doth 
rl There^-let rae help thee up/' 
^Oh^ noble sir, forbear, and God love yon for 
incely genüeraan — but it giveth me cniel 




8 THE PRINCE AND TlIE PAUPER. 

pain to touch me when I am taken so. My 
brother there will teil your worship how I am 
racked with anguish when these fits be upon me. 
A penny, dear sir, a penny, to buy a little food; 
then leave me to my sorrows." 

"A penny! thou shalthave three, thou hapless 
creature" — and he fumbled in his pocket with 
nervous haste and got them out. "There, poor 
lad, take them and most welcome. Now come 
hither, my boy, and help me carry thy stricken 
brother to yon house, where " 

"I am not his brother," said the King, inter- 
rupting. 

"What! not his brother?" 

"O hear him!" groaned Hugo, then privately 
ground his teeth. "He denies his own brother— 
and he with one foot in the grave!" 

"Boy, thou art indeed hard of heart, if this 
is thy brother. For shame! — and he scarce able 
to move band or foot. If he is not thy brother, 
who is he, then?" 

"A beggar and a thief! He has got your 
money and has picked your pocket likewise. An' 
thou wouldst do a healing miracle, lay thy stafF 
over his Shoulders and trust Providence for the 
rest." 



Digitized by V^OOQ IC 



THE PRINCE WITH THE TRAMPS. 9 

lut Hugo did not tarry for the mirade. In 
ment he was up and off like the wind, the 
eman following after and raising the hiie 
:ry lustily as he went. The King, breathing 
gratitude to Heaven for his own release, fted 
e opposite direction, and did not slacken his 
until he was out of harm's reach. He took 
[irst road that offered, and soon put the 
je behind him. He hurried along, as hriskly 
e could, during several hours, keeping a ^ 
)us watch over his Shoulder for pursuil; 5iit 
äars left him at last, and a grateful sense of 
ity took their place. He recognised, now, 
he was hungry; and also very tired. So he 
d at a farm-house; but when he was abovit 
)eak, he was cut short and driven rudely 
. His clothes were against him. 
le wandered on, wounded and indignatit, 
was resolved to put himself in the way of 
treatment no more. But hunger is pride's 
er; so, as the evening drew near, he made 
ttempt at another farm-house; but here he 
l worse than before; for he was called hard 
£s and was promised arrest as a vagrant ex- 
he moved on promptly. 
rhe night came on, chilly and overcast; and 



db 



lO THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

Still the footsore monarch laboured slowly on. He 
was obliged to keep moving, for every time he 
sat down to rest he was soon penetrated to the 
bone with the cold. All his sensations and ex- 
periences, as he moved through the solemn gloom 
and the empty vastness of the night, were new 
and Strange to him. At intervals he heard voices 
approach, pass by, and fade into silence; and as 
he saw nothing more of the bodies they belonged 
to than a sort of formless drifting blur, there was 
something spectral and uncanny about it all that 
made him shudder. Occasionally he caught the 
twinkle of a light — always far away, apparently— 
almost in another world; if he heard the tinkle 
of a sheep's bell, it was vague, distant, indistinct; 
the muffled lowing of the herds floated to him on 
the night wind in vanishing cadences, a mournful 
sound; now and then came the complaining howl 
of a dog over viewless expanses of field and 
forest; all sounds were remote; they made the 
little King feel that all life and activity were far 
removed from him, and that he stood solitary, 
companionless, in the centre of a measureless 
solitude. 

He stumbled along, through the gruesome 
fascinations of this new experience, startled 



 



THE PRINCE WITH THE TR^^MPS. 1 l 

ionally by the soft rustling of the dry leaves 
ead, so like human whispers they seemed 
ind; and by and by he came suddenly upoii 
reckled light of a tin lantem near at hand. 
tepped back into the shadows and waited, 
lantem stood by the open door of a barn. 
King waited some time — there was no soundj 
nobody stirring. He got so cold, standing 

and the hospitable barn looked so enticing, 
at last he resolved to risk everything and 
. He Started swiftly and stealthily, and just 
j was Crossing the threshold he heard voices 
id him. He darted behind a cask, within 
»am, and stooped down. Two farm labourers 

in, bringing the lantem with them, and feil 
nk, talking meanwhile. Whilst they moved 
: with the light, the King made good use oi 
yes and took the bearings of what seemed 

a good sized stall at the further end of the 
, purposing to grope his way to it when he 
d be left to himself. He also noted the 
Lon of a pile of horse blankets, midway oi 
oute, with the intent to levy upon them for 
seii^ce of the crown of England for one 

ty and by the men finished and went away. 



12 THE PKL\C;E and THE PAUPER. 

fastening the door behind them and taking the 
lantern with them. The shivering King made 
for the blankets, with as good speed as the dark- 
ness would allow; gathered them up and then 
groped his way safely to thie stall. Of two of 
the blankets he made a bed, then covered him- 
self with the remaining two. He was a glad 
monarch, now, though the blankets were old and 
thin, and not quite warm enoügh; and besides 
gave out a pungent horsy odour that was almost 
sufFocatingly powerful. 

Although the King was hungry and chilly, he 
was also so tired and so drowsy that these latter 
influences soon began to get the advantage of 
the former, and he presently dozed ofF into a 
State of semi-consciousness. Then, just as he was 
on the point of losing himself whoUy, he distinctly 
feit something touch him! He was broad awake 
in a moment, and gasping for breath. The cold 
horror of that mysterious touch in the dark almost 
made his heart stand still. He lay motionless, 
and listened, scarcely breathing. But nothing 
stirred, and there was no sound. He continued 
to listen, and wait, during what seemed a long 
time, but still nothing stirred, and there was no 
sound. So he began to drop into a drowse once 



 



THE PRINCE WITH THE TRAMPS. 



13 



at last; and all at once he feit that mys- 
LS touch again ! It was a ^risly thing, this 
touch from this noiseless and invisible pre- 
; it made the boy sick with ghostly fears. 

should he do? That was the question; but 
id not know how to answer it. Should he 

these reasonably comfortable quarters and 
Dm this inscrutable horror? But fly whither? 
Duld not get out of the barn; and the idea 
urrying blindly hither and thither in the 

within the captivity of the four walls, with 
)hantom gliding after him, and visiting him 

that soft hideous touch upon cheek or 
der at every turn, was intolerable. But tp 
ivhere he was, and endure this living death 
ight? — was that better? No. What, then, 
there left to do? Ah, there was but one 
e; he knew it well — he must put out his 

and find that thing! 

was easy to think this; but it was hard to 
: himself up to try it. Three times he 
hed his hand a little way out into the dark, 
Tly; and snatched it suddenly back, with a 
—not because it had encountered anything, 
)ecause he had feit so sure it was just going 
But the fourtli time, he groped a little 



~i 



oogle 



14» THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

further, and his band lightly swept agaiiist some- 
thing soft and warm. This petrified him, nearly, 
with fright — his mind was in such a State that 
he. could imagine the thing to be nothing eise 
than a corpse, newly dead and still warm. He 
thought he would rather die than touch it again. 
But he thought this false thought because he did 
not know the immortal strength of human curio- 
sity. In no long time his band was tremblingly 
groping again — against his judgment, and with- 
out his consent — but groping persistently on, just 
the same. It encountered a bunch of long hair; 
he shuddered, but followed up the hair and found 
what seemed to be a warm rope; followed up the 
rope and found an innocent calf! — for the rope 
was not a rope at all, but the calf s tail. 

The King was cordially ashamed of h' iself 
for having gotten all that fright and misefy out 
of so paltry a matter as a slumbering calf/ but 
he need not have feit so about it, for it was not 
the calf that frightened him, but a dreadful lon- 
existent something which the calf stood for; and 
any other boy, in those old superstitious times, 
would have acted and suffered just as he had 
done. 

The King was not only delighted to find that 



 



THE PRINCE WnH THE TRAMPS. 



15 



tature was only a calf, but delighted to 
le calf's Company; for he had been feeling 
some and friendless that the Company and 
eship of even this humble animal was wel- 

And he had been so buffeted, so nidely 
ed by his own kind, that it was a real 
; to him to feel that he was at last in the 

of a fellow creature that had at least a 
!art and a gentle spirit, whatever loftier 
:es might be lacking. So he resolved to 
•ank and make friends with the calf. 
ile stroking its sleek warm back — for it 
LT him and within easy reach — it occurred 

that this calf might be utilised in more 
lian one. Whereupon he re-arranged his 
>reading it down close to the calf; then he 
d himself up to the calf s back, drew the 
up over himself and his friend, and in a 

or two was as warm and comfortable as 
i ever been in the downy couches of the 
)alace of Westminster. 
asant thoughts came, at once; life took on 
rfuller seeming. He was free of the bonds 
ntude and crime, free of the companion- 
f base and brutal outlaws; he was warm, 
> sheltered; in a word, he was happy. The 



-V 



 IC 



l6 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

night wind was rising; it swept by in fitful gusts 
that made the old bam quake and rattle, then 
its forces died down« at intervals, and went moan- 
ing and wailing around comers and projections— 
but it was all music to the King, now that he 
was snug and comfortable: let it blow and rage, 
let it batter and bang, let it moan and wail, he 
minded it not, he only enjoyed it. He merely 
snuggled the closer to his friend, in a luxury of 
warm contentment, and drifted blissfuUy out of 
consciousness into a deep and dreamless sleep 
that was füll of serenity and peace. The distant 
dogs howled, the melancholy kine complained, 
and the winds went on raging, whilst furious 
sheets of rain drove along the roof; but the Ma- 
jesty of England slept on, undisturbed, and the 
calf did the same, it being a simple creature, 
and not easily troubled by storms or embarrassed 
by sleeping with a King. 



 



THE 
INCE WITH THE PEASANTS. 



PTtnce and ihe Pauper. II, 



^Google 



 



'' I 



CHAPTER XIX. 
THE PRINCE WITH THE PEASANTS. 

i^HEN the King awoke in the early moming, 

»und that a wet but thoughtfiil rat had crept 

Lhe place during the night and made a cosy 

for itself in his bosom. Being disturbed, 

it scampered away. The boy smiled, and 

"Poor fool, why so fearful? I am as forlom 

ou. 'Twould be a shame in me to hurt the 

ess, who am myself so helpless. Moreover, 

2 you thanks for a good omen; for when a 

has fallen so low that the very rats do 

» a bed of him, it surely meaneth that his 

aes be upon the tum, since it is piain he 

ao lower go." 

le got up and stepped out of the stall, and 

tlien he heard the sound of children's voices. 

bam door opened and a couple of little 

came in. As soon as they saw him their 

ng and laughing ceased, and they stopped 



db 



20 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

and stood still, gazing at him with strong 
curiosity; they presently began to whisper to- 
gether, then they approached nearer, and stopped 
again to gaze and whisper. By and by they 
gathered courage and began to discuss him 
aloud. One said — 

"He hath a comely face." 

The other added — 

"And pretty hair." 

"But is ill clothed enow." 

"And how starved he looketh." 

They came still nearer, sidling shyly around 
and about him, examining him itainutely from all 
points, as if he were some stränge new kind of 
animal; but warily and watchfuUy, the while, as 
if they half feared he might be a sort of animal 
that would bite, upon occasion. Finally they 
halted before him, holding each other's hands, 
for protection, and took a good satisfying stare 
with their innocent eyes; then one of them plucked 
up all her courage and inquired with honest 
directness — 

"Who art thou, boy?'' 

"I am the King," was the grave answer. 



 



THE PRINCE WITH THE PEASANTS. 



21 



LC children gave a little Start, and their 
pread themselves wide open and remained 
ing a speechless half minute. Then curiosity 
the silence — 

'he King? What King?" 

'he King of England." 

le children looked at each other — then at 
then at each other again — wonderingly, 
xedly — then one said — 

)idst hear him, Margery? — he saith he is 
ing. Can that be true?" 

low can it be eise but true, Prissy? Would 
y a lie? For look you, Prissy, an* it were 
•ue, it would be a lie. It surely would 
Now think on't For all things that be 
ue, be lies — thou canst make nought eise 
^it" 

was a good tight argument, without a leak 
anywhere; and it left Prissy's half-doubts 
leg to stand on. She considered a moment, 
put the King upon his honour with the 
e remark — 

[f thou art truly the King, then I believe 



i| 



db 



22 TEffi PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

"I am truly the King." 

This settled the matter. His Majest/s royalty 
was accepted without further question or dis- 
cussion, and the two little girls began at once to 
inquire into how he came to be where he was, 
and how he came to be so unroyally clad, and 
whither he was bound, and all about his affairs. 
It was a mighty relief to him to pour out his 
troubles where they would not be scoffed at or 
doubted; so he told his tale with feeling, for- 
getting even his hunger for the time; and it was 
received with the deepest and tenderest sympathj 
by the gentle little maids. But when he got | 
down to his latest experiences and they learned 
how long he had been without food, they cut him j 
Short and hurried him away to the farm-house to 
find a breakfast for him. j 

The King was cheerful and happy now, and 
said to himself, "When I am come to mine own | 
again, I will always honour little children, re- 
membering how that these trusted me and be- i 
lieved in me in my time of trouble; whilst they 
that were older, and thought themselves wiser, i 
mocked at me and held me for a liar." 

The children's mother received the King 



 



THE PRINCE WITH THE PEASANTS. 2^ 

y, and was füll of pity; for his forlom con- 
1 and apparently crazed intellect touchcd 
womanly heart She was a widow, and 
r poor; consequently she had seen trouble 
5h to enable her to feel for the unfortunate, 
imagined that the demented boy had 
ered away from his friends or keepers; so 
tried to find out whence he had come, in 
• that she might take measures to retun^ 
but all her references to neighbouring towns 
villages, and all her inquiries in the samc 
went for nothing — the boy's face, and his 
ers, too, showed that the things she was 
ag of were not familiär to him. He spoke 
istly and simply about court matters; and 
t down, more than once, when speaking of 
late King "his father;" but whenever the 
ärsation changed to baser topics, he lost 
est and became silent. 

'he woman was mightily puzzled; but she 
not give up. As she proceeded with her 
ing, she set herseif to contriving devices to 
ise the boy into betraying his real secrei, 
talked about cattle — he showed no concern; 
about sheep — the same result — so her guess 
he had been a shepherd boy was an error; 



 



24 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

she talked about mills; and about weavers, 
tinkers, smiths, trades and tradesmen of all sorts; 
and about Bedlam, and jaüs, and charitable 
retreats; but no matter, she was baffled at all 
points. Not altogether, either; for she argued 
that she had narrowed the thing down to domestic 
Service. Yes, she was sure she was on the right 
track, nöw — he must have been a house servant. 
So she led up to that. But the result was dis- 
cQuraging. The subject of sweeping appeared to 
weary him; fire-building failed to stir him; 
scrubbing and scouring awoke no enthusiasm. 
Then the goodwife touched, with a perishing 
hope, and rather as a matter of form, upon the 
subject of cooking. To her surprise, and her 
vast delight, the King's face lighted at once! 
Ah, she had hunted him down at last, she 
thought; and she was right proud, too, of the 
devious shrewdness and tact which had ac- 
complished it. 

Her tired tongue got a chance to rest, now; 
for the King's, inspired by gnawing hunger and 
the fragrant smells that came from the sputter- 
ing pots and pans, tumed itself loose and de- 
livered itself up to such an eloquent dissertation 
upon certain toothsome dishes, that within three 



 



THE PRINCE WITH THE PEASANTS. 



25 



ites the woman said to herseif, "Of a tnith 
IS right — he hath holpen in a kitchen!" 
i he broadened his bill of fare, and dis- 
;d it with such appreciation and animatior^, 
the goodwife said to herseif, "Good lackt 
can he know so many dishes, and so fine 

withal? For these belong only upon the 
s of the rieh and great. Ah, now I see! 
td outcast as he is, he must have served in 
)alace before his reason went astray; yes, he 

have helped in the very kitchen of the 
; himself ! I will test him." 

'uU of eagerness to prove her sagacity, she 
the King to mind the cooking a moment — 
ng that he might manufacture and add a 
or two, if he chose — then she .went out of 
com and gave her children a sign to follow 
. The King muttered — 

Another English king had a commission like 
lis, in a bygone time — it is nothing against 
dignity to undertake an office which the 
t Alfred stooped to assurae. But I will try 
itter serve my trust than he; for he let the 
s bum." 

rhe intent was good, but the Performance 



 



26 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

was not answerable to it; for this King, like the 
other one, soon feil into deep thinkings concem- 
ing his vast affairs, and the same calamity resulted 
— the cookery got bumed. The woman retumed 
in time to save the breakfast frora entire de- 
struction; and she promptly brought the King 
out of his dreams with a brisk and cordial tongue- 
lashing. Then, seeing how troubled he was, over 
his violated trust, she softened at once, and was 
all goodness and gentleness toward him. 

The boy made a hearty and satisfying meal, 
and was greatly refreshed and gladdened by it. 
It was a meal which was distinguished by this 
curious feature, that rank was waived on both 
sides; yet neither recipient of the favour was 
aware that it had been extended. The goodwife 
had intended to feed this young tramp with 
broken victuals in a coraer, like any other tramp, 
or like a dog; but she was so remorseful for the 
scolding she had given him, that she did what 
she could to atone for it by allowing him to sit 
at the family table and eat with his betters, on 
ostensible terms of equality with thftm; and the 
King, on his side, was so remorseful for having 
broken his trust, after the family had been so 
kind to him, that he forced himself to atone for 



 



THE PRINCE WITH THE PEASANTS. 



27 



)y humbling himself to the family level, in- 
id of requiring the woman and her children 
stand and wait upon him while he occupied 
ir table in the solitary State due his birth and 
Qity. It does us all good to unbend some- 
es. This good woman was made happy all 
day long by the applauses which she got out 
lerself for her magnanimous condescension to 
amp; and the King was just as self-complacent 
r his gracious humility toward a humble peasant 
Dan. 

When breakfast was over, the housewife told 
King to wash up the dishes. This command 
5 a staggerer, for a moment, and the King 
ae near rebelling; but then he said to himself, 
Ifred the Great watched the cakes; doubtless 
would have washed the dishes, too — therefore 
l I essay it" 

He made a sufficiently poor job of it; and lo 
surprise too, for the cleaning of wooden 
ons and trenchers had seemed an easy thing 
do. It was a tedious and troublesome piece 
f^rork, but he finished it at last. He was be- 
ning impatient to get away on his jouraey 
7f; however, he was not to lose this thrifty 



gitiz^ 



b 



ZS THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

dame's society so easily. Shc fumished him 
some little odds and ends of employment, which 
he got through with after a fair fashion and with 
some credit. Then she set him and the little 
girls to paring some winter apples; but he was 
so awkward at this Service, that she retired him 
from it and gave him a butcher knife to grind. 
Afterwards she kept him carding wool untü he 
began to think he had laid the good King Alfred 
about far enough in the shade for the present, 
in the matter of showy menial heroisms that 
would read picturesquely in story-books and 
histories, and so he was half-minded to resign. 
And when, just after the noonday dinner, the 
goodwife gave him a basket of kittens to drown, 
he did resign. At least he was just going to 
resign — for he feit that he must draw the line 
somewhere, and it seemed to him that to draw it 
at kitten-drowning was about the right thing— 
when there was an interruption. The interrup- 
tion was John Canty — with a peddler's pack on 
his back — and Hugo! 

The King discovered these rascals approach- 
ing the front gate before they had had a chance 
to see him; so he said nothing about drawing 
the line, but took up his basket of kittens 



 



THE PRINCE WITH THE PEASANTS. 



29 



stepped quietly out the back way, with- 
a word. He left the creatures in an out- 
se, and hurried on, into a narrow lane at 
rear. 



V Google 



 



HE PRINCE AND THE HERMIT. 



It 



Google 



 



CHAPTER XX. 
THE PRINCE AND THE HERMTT. 

Phe high hedge hid him frbm the house, 
; and so, under the impulse of a deadly 
Lt, he let out all his forces and sped toward 
)od in the distance. He never looked back 

he had almost gained the shelter of the 
;t; then he tumed and descried two figures 
le distance. That was sufficient; he did not 

to Scan them critically, but hurried on, and 
r abated his pace tili he was far within the 
ght depths of the wood. Then he stopped; 
g persuaded that he was now tolerably safe. 
listened intently, but the stillness was pro- 
d and solemn — awful, even, and depressing 
he spirits. At wide intervals his straining 
did detect sounds, but they were so remote, 

hollow, and mysterious, that they seemed 
to be real sounds, but only the moaning and 
plaining ghosts of departed ones. So the 

Pri$ue and tke Pauper. II. 3 



t 



Google 



34 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

sounds were yet more dreary than the silence 
which they intemipted. 

It was his purpose, in the beginning, to stay 
where he was, the rest of the day; but a chül 
soon invaded his perspiring body, and he was 
at last obliged to resume movement in order to 
get warm. He Struck straight through the forest, 
hoping to pierce to a road presently, but he was 
disappointed in this. He travelled on and on; 
but the farther he went, the denser the wood 
became, apparently. The gloom began to thickcn, 
by and by, and the King realised that the night 
was Coming on. It made him shudder to think 
of spending it in such an uncanny place; so he 
tried to hurry faster, but he only made the less 
Speed, for he could not now see well enough to 
choose his Steps judiciously; consequently he kept 
tripping over roots and tangling himself in vines 
and briers. 

And how glad he was when at last he caught 
the glimmer of a light! He approached it warily, 
stopping often to look about him and listen. It 
came from an unglazed window-opening in a 
shabby little hut. He heard a voice, now, and 
feit a disposition to nin and hide; but he changed 
his mind at once, for this voice was praying, 



 



THE PRINCE AND THE HERMIT. 35 

mtly. He glided to the one window of the 
raised himself on tiptoe, and stole a glance 
in. The room was small; its floor was the 
:al earth, beaten hard by use; in a comer 
a bed of rushes and a ragged blaoket or 
near it was a pail, a cup, a basin, and two 
ree pots and pans; there was a short bench 
a three-legged stool; on the hearth the 
ins of a faggot fire were smouldering; before 
rine, which was lighted by a Single candle, 
an aged man, and on an old wooden box 
s side lay an open book and a human skull 
man was of large, bony frame; his hair and 
siers were very long and snowy white; he 
clothed in a robe of sheepskins which 
led from his neck to his heels. 

A holy hermit!" said the King to himself; 
am I indeed fortunate." 

he hermit rose from his knees; the King 
ted. A deep voice responded — 

Enter! — but leave sin behind, for the ground 
eon thou shalt stand is holy!" 

he King entered, and paused. The hermit 
d a pair of gleaming, unrestful eyes upon 
and said — 

3* 



DigitizedbvdOOQlC 

i 



36 OHE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

«Who art thou?" 

*'I am the King," came the ariswer, with 
placid simplicity. 

"Welcome, Kingl" cried tue hennit, with 
enthusiasm. Then, bustling about with . f everish 
activity, and constantly saying, **WeIcome, wel- 
come," he arranged his bench, seated the King 
on it, by the hearth, threw some faggots on the 
fire, and finally feil to pacing the floor, with a 
nervous stride.' 

"Welcome! Manyhave sought sanctuary here, 
but they were not worthy, and were turhed away. 
But a King who casts his crown away, and 
despises the vain splendours of his office, and 
clothes his body in rags, to devote his Hfe to 
holiness and the mortification of the flesh — he is 
worthy, he is welcome! — here shall he abide all 
his days tili death come." The King hastened 
to Interrupt and explain, but the hermit paid no 
attention to him — did not even hear him, ap- 
parentJy, but went right on with his talk, with a 
raised voice and a growing energy. ^*And thou 
shalt be at peace here. None shall find out thy 
refuge to disquiet thee with supplications to re- 
tum to that empty and foolish life which God 
hath moved thee to abandon. Thoii shalt präy 



 



THE PRINCE AND THE HERMIT. 37 

; thou shalt study the Book; thou shalt medi- 
upon the foUies and delusions of this world, 
upon the sublimities of the world to come; 

shalt feed upon crusts and herbs, and 
■ge thy body with whips, daily, to the 
ying of thy soul. Thou shalt wear a hair 
next thy skin; thou shalt drink water only; 
thou shalt be at peace; yes, whoUy at peace; 
/hoso comes to seek thee shall go his way 
1, baffled; he shall not find thee, he shall not 
st thee." 

?he old man, still pacing back and forth, 
;d to speak aloud, and began to mutter. 
King seized this opportunity to State his 
; and he did it with an eloquence inspired 
neasiness and apprehension. But the hermit 

on muttering, and gave no heed. And still 
ering, he approached the King and said, im- 
dvely — 

'Shl I will teil you a secret!" Hebent down 
apart it, but checked himself, and assumed a 
aing attitude. After a moment or two he 
; on tiptoe to the window-opening, put his 

I out and peered around in the gloaming, 
came tiptoeing back again, put his face close 

II to the King's, and whispered — 



Digitized^GoOgle 



1 



38 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

**J am an archangelP^ 

The King started violently, and said to him- 
self, " Would God I were with the outlaws again; 
for lo, now am I the prisoner of a madman!" 
His apprehensions were heightened, and they 
showed plainly in* his face. In a low, excited 
voice, the hermit continued — 

"I see you feel my atmosphere! There's awe 
in your face! None may be in this atmosphere 
and not be thus affected; for it is the very at- 
mosphere of heaven. I go thither and return, in 
the twinkling of an eye. I was made an archangel 
on this very spot, it is five years ago, by angels 
sent from heaven to confer that awful dignity. 
Their presence fiUed this place with an intoler- 
able brightness. And they knelt to me, King! 
yes, they knelt to me! for I was greater than 
they. I have walked in the courts of heaven, 
and held speech with the patriarchs. Touch my 
hand — be not afraid — ^touch it There — now thou 
hast touched a hand which has been clasped by 
Abraham and Isaac and Jacob ! For I walked in 
the golden courts, I have seen the Deity face to 
face!" He paused, to give this speech eflfect; 
then his face suddenly changed, and he started 
to his feet again, saying, with angry energy, 



 



THE PRINCE AND THE HERMIT. 39 

>, I am an archangel; a nure ar changell — I 
might have been pope! It is verily true. I 
told it from heaven in a dream, twenty years 
ah, yes, I was to be pope! — and I shoiäd 
been pope, for Heaven had said it — but the 
; dissolved my religious house, and I, poor 
Lire unfriended monk, was cast homeless upon 
RTorld, robbed of my mighty destiny!" Here 
)egan to mumble again, and beat bis fore- 
l in futile rage, with bis fist; now and then 
ulating a venomous curse, and now and then 
thetic "Wherefore I am nought but an arch- 
1 — I that should have been popel" 
50 he went on, for an hour, whilst the poor 
: King sat and suifered. Then all at once 
old man's frenzy departed, and he became 
jentleness. His voice softened, he came dowii 
of his clouds, and feil to prattling along so 
ily and so humanly, that he soon won the 
y's heart completely. The old devotee moved 
boy nearer to the fire and made him com- 
ible; doctored his small bruises and abrasions 
a deft and tender band; and then set about 
)aring and cooking a supper — chatting plea- 
ly all the time, and occasionally stroking the 
s cheek or patting his head, in such a gently 



'i 



Google 



1 



40 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

caressing way that in a little while all the fear 
and repulsion inspired by the archangel were 
changed to reverence and affection for the man. 

This happy State of things continued while 
the two ate the supper; then, after a prayer be- 
fore the shrine, the hermit put the boy to bed, in 
a small adjoining room, tucking him in as snugly 
and lovingly as a mother might; and so, with a 
parting caress, left him and sat down by the fire, 
and began to poke the brands about in an ab- 
sent and aimless way. Presently he paused; then 
tapped his forehead several times with his iingers, 
as if trying to recall some thought which had 
escaped from his mind. Apparently he was un- 
successful. Now he started quickly up, and 
entered his guest's room, and said — 

"Thou art King?" 

"Yes," was the response, drowsily uttered. 

"What King?" 

"Of England." 

"Of England? Then Henry is gone!" 

"Alack, it is so. I am his son." 

A black frown settled down upon the hermit's 
face, and he clenched his bony hands with a 
vindictive energy. He stood a few moments, 



 



THE PRINCE AND THE HERMir. 



4' 



lathing fast and swallowing repealedly, Üieu 
d in a husky voice — 

"Dost know it was he that tumed us out inlo 

World houseless and homeless?" 

There was no response. The old man bent 
vm and scanned the boy's reposeful face and 
ened to his placid breathing. "He sleepü— 
ips soundly;" and the frown vanished away 
1 gave place to an expression of evil sa Lis- 
tion. A smile flitted across the dreaming boy's 
tures. The hermit muttered, "So — his heart 

happy;" and he turned away. He went 
ilthily about the place, seeking here and there 

something; now and then halting to listen. 
V and then jerking his head around and 
ting a quick glance toward the bed; and 
^ays muttering, always mumbling to himself. 

last he found what he seemed to want— a 
ty old butcher knife and a whetstone. Then 

crept to his place by the fire, sat himself 
sm, and began to whet the knife softly oii the 
ne, still muttering, mumbling, ejaculating. The 
ids sighed around the lonely place, the 
^sterious voices of the night floated by out of 
i distances. The shining eyes of venturesome 
ce and rats peered out at the old man from 



dbv Google 



42 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

cracks and coverts, but he went on with his 
work, rapt, absorbed, and noted none of these 
things: 

At long intervals he drew his thumb alcmg 
the edge of his knife, and nodded his head with 
satisfaction. "It grows sharper," he said; "yes, 
it grows sharper." 

He took no note of the flight of time, but 
worked tranquilly on, entertaining himself with 
his thoughts, which broke out occasionally in 
articulate speech — 

"His father wrought us evil, he destroyed us 
— and is gone down into the eternal fires! Yes, 
down into the etemal fires! He escaped us — but 
it was God*s will, yes it was God's will, we must 
not repine. But he hath not escaped the fires! 
no, he hath not escaped the fires, the consuming, 
unpitying, remorseless fires — and they are ever- 
lasting!" 

And so he wrought; and still wrought; mum- 
bling — chuckling a low rasping chuckle, at times 
— and at times breaking again into words — 

"It was his father that did it all. I am but 
an archangel — but for him, I should be pope!" 

The King stirred. The hermit sprang noise- 



 



THE PRINCE AND THE HERMIT. 



43 



;sly to the bedside, and went down upon his 
ees, bending over the prostrate form with his 
ife uplifted. The boy stirred again; his eyes 
me open for an instant, but there was no spe- 
lation in them, they saw nothing; the next 
)ment his tranquil breathing showed that his 
ep was sound once more. 

The hermit watched and listened, for a time, 
eping his position and scarcely breathing; then 

slowly lowered his arm, and presently crept 
ay, saying,— 

"It is long past midnight — it is not best that 

should cry out, lest by accident someone be 
ssing." 

He glided about his hovel, gathering a rag 
re, a thong there, and another one yonder; then 
: retumed, and by careful and gentle handling, 
! managed to tie the King's ankles together 
thout waking him. Next he essayed to tie the 
ists; he made several attempts to cross them, 
it the boy always drew one hand or the other 
iray, just as the cord was ready to be applied; 
it at last, when the archangel was almost ready 

despair, the boy crossed his hands himself, 
id the next moment they were bound. Now a 
mdage was passed ander the sleeper's chin and 



d b 



44 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

brought up over his head and tied fast — and so 
softly, so gradually, and so deftly were the knots 
drawn together and compacted, that the boy slept 
peacefuUy through it all without stirring. 



 



lENDON TO THE RESCUE. 



DlgifeedA Google 



 



CHAPTER XXI. 
HENDON TO THE RESCUE. 

The old man glided away, stooping, stealthy, 
like, and brought the low bench. He seated 
iself upon it, half his body in the dim and 
sering light, and the other half in shadow^ 
[ so, with his craving eyes bent upon the 
nbering boy, he kept his patient vigil there, 
dless of the drift of time, and softly whetted 
knife, and mumbled and chuckled; and in 
ect and attitude he resembled nothing so 
ch as a grizzly, monstrous spider, gloating 
r some hapless insect that lay bound and 
pless in his web. 

After a long while, the old man, who was 
l gazing,' — yet not seeing, his mind having 
ied into a dre?imy abstraction,— observed, on 
;udden, that the bo3r's eyes were open! wide 
m and staringi — staring up in frozen horror at 
I knife. The smile of a gratified devil crept 



I Google 



48 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

over the old man's face, and he said, without 
changing his attitude or his occupation — 

"Son of Henry the Eighth, hast thou prayed?" 

The boy struggled helplessly in his bonds, 
and at the same time forced a smothered sound 
through his closed jaws, which the hermit chose 
to interpret as an affirmative answer to his 
question. 

"Then pray again. Pray the prayer for the 
dying!" 

A shudder shook the bo/s frame, and his 
face blenched. Then he struggled again to free 
himself — turning and twisting himself this way 
and that; tugging frantically, fiercely, desperately 
— but uselessly — ^to burst his fetters; and all the 
while the old ogre smiled down upon him, and 
nodded his head, and placidly whetted his knife; 
mumbling, from time to time, "The moments are 
precious, they are few and precious — pray the 
prayer for the dyingl" 

The boy uttered a despairing groan, and 
ceased from his struggles, panting. The tears 
came, then, and trickled, one after the other, 
down his face; but this piteous sight wrought no 
softening effect upon the savage old man. 

The dawn was coming, now; the hermit ob- 



 






HENDON TO TOE RESCUE.. 



45 



ed it, and spoke up sharply, with a touch of 
^ous apprehension in his voice — 
"I may not indulge this ecstasy longer! The 
it is already gone. It seems but a moment 
nly a moment j would it had endured a yearl 
d of the Church's spoiler, dose thy perishing 

5, an' thou fearest to look upon " 

The rest was lost in inarticulate mutterings. 
) old man sunk upon his knees, his knife in 
hand, and bent himself over themoaning boy — 
Hark! There was a sound of voices near the 
in — the knife dropped from the hermit's handj 
cast a sheepskin over the boy and started up^ 
nbling. The sounds increased, and presently 
voices became rough and angry; then came 
Bvs, and cries for help; then a clatter of swift 
Steps, retreating. Immediately came a succes- 
1 of thimdering knocks upon the cabin door, 
owed by — 

"Hullo-o-o! Open! And despatch, in the name 
lU the devilsl" 

Oh, this was the blessedest sound that had 
X made music in the King's ears; for it was 
ies Hendon's voice! 

The hermit, grinding his teeth in impotent 
;e, moved swiftly out of the bedchamber, closing 

he Prince and the Pauper^ II, 4 



Digitized bv VjOOQIC 



50 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

the door behind him; and straightway the King 
heard a talk, to this effect, proceeding from the 
^'chaper'— 

"»Homage and greeting, reverend sir! Where 
is Ike boy — my boy?" 

"What boy, friend?" 

"What boy! Lie me no lies, sir priest, play 
me no deceptions ! — I am not in the humour for 
it. Near to this place I caught the scoundrels 
who I judged did steal him from me, and I made 
them confess; they said he was at large again, 
and they had tracked him to your door. They 
showed me his very footprints. Now palter no 
more; for look you, holy sir, an' thou produce 
him not ^Where is the boy?" 

"Oh, good sir, peradventure you mean the 
ragged regal vagrant that tarried here the night 
If such as you take an interest in such as he, 
know, then, that I have sent him of an errand. 
He will be back anon." 

"How soon? How soon? Come, waste not 
ihe time — cannot I overtake him? How soon will 
he be back?" 

"Thou need'st not stir; he will retum quickly." 

"So be it, then. I will try to wait. But stop! 
^—you sent him of an errand? — you! Verily this 



 



HENDON TO THE RESCUE. 



51 



a lie — he would not go. He would pull thy 
l beard, an' thou didst oflfer him such an in- 
ence. Thou hast lied, friend; thou hast surely 
d! He would not go for thee, nor for any 
in." > 

"For any man — no; haply not. But I am not 
nan." 

" Whail Now o' God's name what art thou, 
in?" 

"It is a secret — mark thou reveal it not I 
i an archangel!" 

There was a tremendous ejaculation from 
les Hendon — not altogether unprofane — fol- 
red by — 

"This doth well and truly account for his 
nplaisance! Right well I knew he would 
dge nor hand nor foot in the menial Service 
any mortal; but, lord, even a king must obey 
en an archangel gives the word o' commandl 
t me — 'sh! What noise was that?" 

All this while the little King had been yonder, 
emately quaking with terror and trembling with 
pe; and all the while, too, he had thrown all 
i strength he could into his anguished moan- 
js, constantly expecting them to reach Hendon's 
r, but always realising, with bittemess, that 

4* 



Digitized h^kjOOQV^ 



52 THE FRINCE AND THE PAUPER, 

they failed, or at least made no Impression. So 
this last remark of bis servant came as comes a 
reyiving breath from fresb fields to the clying! 
and be exerted bimself once more, and with all 
bis energy, just as tbe bermit was saying — 

"Noise? I beard only tbe wind." 

"Maybap it was. Yes, doubtless tbat was it 
I bave been bearing it faintly all tbe — ^there it is 
again! It is not tbe wind! Wbat an odd sound! 
Come, we will bunt it out!" 

Now tbe King's joy was nearly insupportable. 
His tired lungs did tbeir utmost — and bopefully, 
too — but tbe sealed jaws and tbe muffling sbeepskin 
sadly crippled the effort. Then tbe poor fellow's 
beart sank, to bear tbe bermit say — 

"Ab, it came from witbout — I tbink from the 
copse yonder. Come, I will lead tbe way." 

The King beard the two pass out, talking; 
heard tbeir footsteeps die quickly away — then he 
was alone with a boding, brooding, awful silence. 

It seemed an age tili be beard tbe Steps and 
voices approaching again — and this time he heard 
an added sound, — tbe trampling of boofs, ap- 
parently. Then he beard Hendon say — 

"I will not wait longer. I cannot wait longer, 

Digitized by LjOOQ IC 



HENDON TO THE RESCUß. 



51 



has lost his way in this thick wood. Which 
ection took he? Quick — point it out to me." 

"He— but wait; I will go with thee." 

"Good — good! Why, truly thou art better 
m thy looks. Marry I de not think there's not 
)ther archangel with so right a heart as thine. 
It ride? Wilt take the wee donkey that's for 

boy, or wilt thou fork thy holy legs over this 
conditioned slave of a mule that I have provided 

myself? — and had been cheated in, too, had 
cost but the indifferent sum of a month's usury 
a brass farthing let to a tinker out of work/* 

"No — ride thy mule, and lead thine ass; I 
i surer on mine own feet, and will walk." 

"Then prithee mind the little beast for me 
ile I take my life in my hands and make what 
:cess I may toward mounting the big one." 

Then followed a confusion of kicks, cuffs, 
mplings and plungings, accompanied by a 
mderous intermingling of voUeyed curses, and 
ally a bitter apostrophe to the mule, whicli 
ist have broken its spirit, for hostilities seemed 
cease from that moment. 

With unutterablemisery the fettered little King 
ard the voices and footsteps fade away and die 
t. All hope forsook him, now, for the moment, 



^Google 



\ 

34 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

and a dull despair setüed down upon his heart. 
"My only friend is decelved and got rid of," he 

Said; "the hermit will retum and " He 

finished with a gasp; and at once feil to struggling 
so frantically wilh his bonds again, that he shook 
off the smothering sheepskin. 

And now he heard the door open! The sound 
chilled him to the marrow — already he seemed 
to feel the knife at his throat. Horror made him 
dose his eyes; horror made him open them again 
— and before him stood John Canty and Hugo! 

He would have said "Thank God!" if his 
jaws had been free. 

A moment or two later his limbs were at 
liberty, and his captors, each gripping him by an 
arm, were hurrying him with all speed through 
the forest. 



 



i VICTIM OF TREACHERY. 



Digitized^ 



Google 



 



CHAPTER XXII. 
A VICTIM OF TREACHERY, 

Once more "King Foo-Foo the First" was 
oving with the tramps and outlaws, a butt for 
iieir coarse jests and dull-witted raüleries, and 
ometimes the victim of small spitefulnesses at 
tie hands of Canty and Hugo when the Ruffler's 
ack was turaed. None but Canty and Hugo 
eally disliked him. Some of the others liked 
im, and all admired his pluck and spirit, 
)uring two or three days, Hugo, in whose ward 
nd Charge the King was, did what he covertly 
ould to make the boy uncomfortable; and at 
ight, during the customary orgies, he amused 
tie Company by putting small indignities upoii 
im — always as if by accident Twice he stepped 
pon the King's toes — accidentally — and the 
Ling, as became his royalty, was contemptuously 
inconscious of it and indifferent to it; but the 



db 



i 



58 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPEEl, 

third time Hugo entertained himself in that way, 
the King felled him to the ground with a cudgel, 
to the prodigious delight of the tribe. Hugo, 
consumed with anger and shame, sprang up, 
seized a cudgel, and came at his small adversary 
in a fury. Instantly a ring was formed aroond 
the gladiators, and the betting and cheering 
began. But poor Hugo stood no chance what- 
ever. His frantic and lubberly 'prentice-work 
found but a poor market for itself when pitted 
against an arm which had been trained by the 
first masters of Europe in single-stick, quarter- 
staflf, and every art and trick of swordsmanship. 
The little King stood, alert but at graceful ease, 
and caught and tumed aside the thick rain of 
blows with a facility and precision which set the 
motley on-lookers wild with admiration; and 
every now and then, when his practised eye de* 
tected an opening, and a lightning-swift rap upon 
Hugo's head foUowed as a result, the storm of 
cheers and laughter that swept the place was 
something wonderful to hear. At the end of 
fifteen minutes, Hugo, all battered, bruised, and 
the target for a pitiless bombardment of ridicule, 
slunk from the field j and the unscathed hero of 
the fight was seized and borne alofl upon the 

 IC 



A VICTIM OF •niEACHBRY. 



50 



loulders of the joyous rabble to the place of 
onour beside the Ruffler, where with vast cere- 
ony he was crowned. King of the Game-Cocks; 
s meaner title being at the same time solemnly 
mcelled and annulled, and a decree of banish- 
lent from the gang pronounced against any whp 
lould thenceforth utter it. 

All attempts to make the King serviceable lo 
le troop had failed. He had stubbomly refused 
• act; moreover, he was always trying to escape. 
le had been thrust into an unwatched kitchen, 
le first day of his return; he not only camc 
►rth empty-handed, but tried to rouse the house- 
lates. He was sent out with a tinker to help 
im at his work; he would not work; moreover, 
e threatened the tinker with his own soldering- 
on; and finally both Hugo and the tinker found 
leir hands füll with the mere matter of keep- 
ig him from getting away. He delivered tlve 
lunders of his royalty upon the heads of all 
ho hampered his liberties or tried to force hini 
) Service, He was sent out, in Hugo's Charge, 
1 Company with a slattemly woman and a 
liseasdd baby, to beg; but the result was not 
ncouraging — he declined to plead for the men- 
icants, or be a party to their cause in any way. 



'2 



Google 



6o TttE PRtNCfi AND TUE <>AÜl*feR. 

Thus several days went by; and the miseries 
of this tramping life, and the weariness and 
sordidness and meanness and vulgarity öf it, 
became gradually and steadily so intolerable 
to the captive that he began at last *to feel 
that his release from the hermit's knife must 
prove only a temporary respite from death, at 
best. 

But at night, in his dreams, these things 
were forgotten, and he was on his throne, and 
master again. This, of course, intensified the 
suflferings of the awakening — so the mortifications 
of each succeeding morning of the few that passed 
between his retum to bondage and the combat 
with Hugo, grew bitterer and bitterer, and harder 
and harder to bear. 

The morning after that combat, Hugo got up 
with a heart filled with vengeful purposes against 
the King. He had two plans, in particular. One 
was to inflict upon the lad what would be, to his 
proud spirit and "imagined" royalty, a peculiar 
humiliation; and if he failed to accomplish this, 
his other plan was to put a crime of some kind 
upon the King, and then betray him into thf 
implacable clutches of the law. 



 



A VICTM OF TREACHERY. 



tri 



In pursuance of the first plan, he purposed 
put a "clime" upon the King's leg; rightly 
dging that that would mortify him to the last 
id perfect degree; and as soon as the clime 
lOuld operate, he meant to get Canty's help, and 
rce the King to expose his leg in the highway 
id beg for alms. "Clime" was the cant term 
r a sore, artificially created. To make a clime, 
e Operator made a paste or poultice of unslaked 
ne, soap, and the rust of old iron, and spread 
upon a piece of leather, which was then bound 
jh^y upon the leg. This would presently fret 
r the skin, and make the flesh raw and angry- 
oking; blood was then rubbed upon the limb, 
tiich, being fully dried, took on a dark and 
pulsive colour. Then a bandage of soiled rags 
as put on in a cleverly careless way which 
ould allow the hideous ulcer to be seen, and 
ove the con^passion of the passer-by.* 

Hugo got the help of the tinker whom the 
ing had cowed with the soldering-iron; they 
ok the boy out on a tinkering tramp, and as 
)on as Üiey were out of sight of the camp they 
u:ew him down änd the tinker held him whilq 

• From "The English Rogue." London, 1665. 



 



62 THE PRINCE AND THE TAVPSR. 

Hugo bound the poultice tight and fast upon 
his leg. 

The King raged and stormed, and promised 
to hang the two the moment the sceptre was in 
his hand again; but they kept a firm grip upon 
him and enjoyed his impotent struggling and 
jeered at his threats. This continued until the 
poultice began to bite; and in no long time its 
work would have been perfected, if there had 
been no intemiption. But there was; for about 
this time Üie "slave" who had made the speech 
denouncing England's laws, appeared on the 
scene, and put an end to the enterprise, and 
stripped oflf the poultice and bandage. 

The King wanted to borrow his deliverer's 
cudgel and warm the jackets of the two rascals 
on the spot; but the man said no, it would bring 
trouble — leave Üie matter tili night; the whole 
tribe being together, then, the outside world 
would not ventiure to interfere or interrupt. He 
marched the party back to camp and reported 
the affair to the Rufiler, who listened, pondered, 
and then decided that the King should not be 
again detailed to beg, since it was piain he 
was worthy of something higher and better 

IC 



A VICTIM OF TREACHERY. 



6J 



-wherefore, on the spot he promoted him 
3in the mendicant rank and appointed him 
steal! 

Hugo was oveijoyed. He had already tried 
make the King steal, and failed; but there 
)uld be no more trouble of that sort, now, for 
course the King would not dream of defying a 
stinct command delivered directly from head- 
larters. So he planned a raid for that very 
"ternoon, purposing to get the King in the law's 
ip in the course of it; and to do it, too, wiih 
ich ingenious strategy, that it should seem to be 
:cidental and unintentional; for the King of the 
ame-Cocks was populär now, and the gang 
light not deal over-gently with an unpopulär 
lember who played so serious a treachery upon 
im as the delivering him over to the common 
aemy, the law. 

Very well. All in good time Hugo strolkd 
fF to a neighbouring village with his prey; and 
le two drifted slowly up and down one street 
fter another, the otie watching sharply for a sure 
hance to achieve his evil purpose, and the other 
ratching as sharply for a chance to dart away 
nd get free of his infamous captivity for ever. 



d ^Google 



64 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

Both threw away some tolerably fair-looking 
opportunities; for both, in their secret hearts, were 
resolved to make absolutely sure work this time, 
and neither meant to allow his fevered desires to 
seduce him into any venture that had much un- 
certainty about it. 

Hugo*s Chance came first For at last a 
woman approached who carried a fat package of 
some sort in a basket Hugo's eyes sparkled 
with sinful pleasure as he said to himself, "Breath 
o' my life, an' I can but put ihat upon him, His 
good-den and God keep thee, King of the Game- 
Cocks!" He waited and watched — outwardly 
patient, but inwardly consuming with excitement 
— tili the woman had passed by, and the time 
was ripe; then said, in a low voice — 

"Tarry here tili I come again," and darted 
stealthily after the prey. 

The King's heart was fiUed with joy — he could. 
make his escape, now, if Hugo's quest only carried 
him far enough away. 

But he was to have no such luck. Hugo crept 
behind the woman, snatched the package, and 
came running back, wrappingit in an old piece 
pf blanket which he carried on his arm. The 



 



A VICTIM OF TREACHERY. 



65' 



j and cry was räised in a moment, by the 
nan, who ^ew her loss by the Hghtening of 
bürden, although she had not seen the pilfer- 
done. Hugo thrust the bündle into the King's 
ids without haltmg, saying — 

"Now speed ye aftcr me with the rest, and 
*Stop thief!' but mind ye lead them 
•ay!" 

The next moment Hugo tumed a comer and 
ted down a crooked alley, — and in another mo- 
it or two he lounged into view again, looking 
Qcent and indifferent, and took up a position 
lind a post to watch results. 

The insulted King threw the bündle on the 
lind; and the blanket feil away from it just as 
woman arrived, with an augmenting crowd 
h^r heels; she seized the King's wrist with 
; hand, snatched up her bündle with the other, 
l begaii to pour out a tirade of abuse upon the 
' while he struggled, without success, to free 
iself from her grip. 

Hugo had seen enough — his enemy was cap- 
ed and the law would get him, now — so he 
)ped away, jubilant and chuckling, and wended 
npwafds, framing a judiciöus version öf the 

Me Pritice and the Pauper, JJ, 5 



Digitized by ILjOOQ IC 

i 



66 TttE PRIKCE AND THE PAUPER. 

matter to give to the RufBer's crew as he strode 
along. 

The King continued to struggle in the woman^s 
strong grasp, and now and then cried out in vexa- 
tion — 

**Unhand me, thou foolish creature; it was not 
I that bereaved thee of thy paltry goods." 

The crowd closed around, threatening the 
King and calling him names; a brawny black- 
smith in leather apron, and sleeves rolled to his 
elbows, made a reach for him, saying he would 
trounce him well, for a lesson; but just then a 
long sword flashed in the air and feil with con- 
vincing force upon the man's arm, flat side down, 
the fantastic owner of it remarking pleasantly, at 
the same time — 

"Marry, good souls, let us proceed gently, not 
with ill blood and uncharitable words. This is 
matter for the law's conISideration, not private and 
unofficial handling. Loose thy hold from the boy, 
good-wife." 

The blacksmith averaged the stalwart soldier 

with a glance, then went muttering away, rubbing 

his arm; the woman released the boy's wrist re- 

^ luctantly; the crowd eyed the stranger unlovingly, 

Digitized by LjOOQ IC 



A VICTIM OF TREACHERY. 67 

but prudently closed their mouths. The King 
sprang to his deliverer*s side, with flushed cheeks 
and sparkling eyes, exclaiming — 

"Thou hast lagged sorely, but thou comest in 
good season, now, Sir Miles; carve me this rabble 
to rags!" 



5* 

db 



4 



 IC 



THE PRINCE A PRISONER. 



Digitized by LjOOQ IC 



 



CHAPTER XXIII. 
THE PRINCE A PRISONER. 

Hendon forced back a smile, and bent down 
id whispered in the Kingfs ear — 

"Softly, softly, my prince, wag thy tongue 
arily — nay, suffer it not to wag at all. Trust 
me — all shall go well in the end." Then he 
ided, to himself: "Ar Miles! Bless me, I had 
tally forgot I was a knight! Lord, how mar- 
illous a thing it is, the grip his memory doth 
ke upon his quaint and crazy fancies! ... An 
npty and foolish title is mine, and yet it is 
)mething to have deserved it; for I think it is 
lore honour to be held worthy to be a spectre- 
aight in his Kingdom of Dreams and Shadows, 
lan to be held base enough to be an earl in 
)me of the real kingdoms of this world." 

The crowd feil apart to admit a constable, 
ho approached and was about to lay his band 
pon the King's Shoulder, when Hencjon said— 



db 



72 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

"Gently, good friend, withhold your hand— 
he shall go peaceably; I am responsible for that- 
Lead on, we will follow." 

The officer led, with the woman and her 
bündle; Miles and the King foUowed after, with 
the crowd at their heels. The King was inclined 
to rebel; but Hendon. said to him in a low 
voice — 

"Reflect, Sire — ypur laws are the wholesome 
breath of your own royalty; shall their sourcö 
resist them, yet require the branches to respect 
them? Apparently one of these laws has been 
broken; when the King is on his throne again, 
can it ever »grieve him to remember that wheil 
he was seemingly a private person he loyally 
sunk the king in the Citizen and submitted to its 
authoirity?" 

"Thou art right; say no more; thou shalt 
see that whatsoever the King of England requires 
a subject to suffer under the law, he will him- 
self suffer while he holdeth the Station of a 
subject." 

When the woman was called upon to testify 
before the justice of the peace, she swore that 
the small prisoner at the bar was the person who 



 



THE PRINCE A PRISONER. J3 

d committed the theft; there was none able to 
)w the contrary, so the King stood convicted. 
e bündle was now unrolled, and when the 
itents proved to be a plump little dressed pig, 
; judge looked troubled, whilst Hendon turaed 
le> and his body was thrilled with an electric 
iver of dismay; but the King remained un- 
)ved, protected by his ignorance. The judge 
iditated, during an ominous pause, then turne d 
the woman, with the question — 
"What dost thou hold this property to be 
rth?" 

The woman courtesied and replied — 
"Three Shillings and eightpence, your worship 
I could not abate a penny and set forth the 
lue honestly." 

The justice glanced around uncomfortably 
on the crowd, then nodded to the constable, 
d Said — 
"Clear the court and close the doors." 
It was done. None remained but the two 
icials, the accused, the accuser, and Miles 
^ndon. This latter was rigid and colourless, 
d on his forehead big drops of cold sweat 
thered , broke and blended together , and 



db 



^4 1™ PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

trickled down his face. The judge tumed to 
the woman again, and said, in a compassionate 
voice — 

"Tis a poor ignorant lad, and mayhap was 
driven hard by hunger, for these be grievous 
times for the unfortunate: mark you, he hath not 

an evil face — but when hunger driveth Good 

woman! dost know that when one steals a thing 
above the value of thirteenpence ha'penny the 
law saith he shall hang for it?" 

The little King started, wide-eyed with con- 
stemation, but controUed himself and held his 
peace; but not so the woman. She sprang to her 
feet, shaking with fright, and cried out — 

"Oh, good lack, what have I done! God-a- 
mercy, I would not hang the poor thing for the 
whole World! Ah, save me from this, your wor- 
ship — what shall I do, what can I do?" 

The justice maintained his judicial composure, 
and simply said — 

"Doubtless it is allowable to revise the value, 
since it is not yet writ upon the record." 

"Then in God's name call the pig eightpence, 
and heaven bless the day that freed my con- 
science of this awesome thing!" 



 



i 



THE PRINCE A PRISONER. 



75 



Miles Hendon forgot all decorum in his de- 
t; and surprised the King and wounded his 
lity, by throwing his arms around him and 
ging him. The woman made her grateful 
iux and started away with her pig; and when 
constable opened the door for her, he fol- 
ed her out into the narrow hall. The justice 
:eeded to write in his record book. Hendon, 
ays alert, thought he would like to know why 
officer foUowed the woman out; so he slipped 
ly into the dusky hall and listened. He heard 
Dnversation to this eflfect — 

"It is a fat pig, and promises good eating; I 
buy it of thee; here is the eightpence." 

"Eightpence, indeed! Thou'lt do no such 
lg. It cost me three Shillings and eightpence, 
d honest coin of the last reign, that old Harry 
t's just dead ne'er touched or tampered with. 
ig for thy eightpence!" 

"Stands the wind in that quarter? Thou wast 
[er oath, and so swore falsely when thou saidst 
value was but eightpence. Come straightway 
k with me before his worship, and answer 
the crime! — and then the lad will hang." 

"There, there, dear heart, say no more, I am 



Digitized^lGoOgle 



itized^ytvj' 



76 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER- 

content. Give me the eightpence, and hold thy 
peace about the matter." 

The woman went off crying: Hendon slipped 
back into the court room, and the constable pre- 
sently followed, after hiding his prize in some 
convenient place. The justice wrote a while 
longer, then read the King a wise and kindly 
lecture, and sentenced him to a short imprison- 
ment in the common jail, to be followed by a 
public flogging. The astounded King opened his 
mouth, and was probably going to order the good 
judge to be beheaded on the spot; but he caught 
a warning sign from Hendon, and succeeded in 
closing his mouth again before he lost anything 
out of it Hendon took him by the hand, now, 
made reverence to the justice, and the two departed 
in the wake of the constable toward the jail. The 
moment the street was reached, the inflamed 
monarch halted, snatched away his hand, and 
exclaimed — 

"Idiot, dost imagine I will enter a common 
jail alive?^' 

Hendon bent down and said, somewhat 
sharply — 

. " Will you trust in me? Peace! and forbear 



 



THE PRINCE A PRISONER. 77 

worsen our chances with dangerous speech. 
tiat Gkxi wills, will happen; thou canst not 
ny it, thou canst not alter it; therefore wait, 
d be patient — 'twill be time enow to rail or 
oice when what is to happen has happened."* 

See Notes to Chapter XXIII., at end of this volume. 



../ 



 



THE ESCAPE. 



dby V^^i 



ogle 



*' Digitizedb 



CHAPTER XXIV. 
THE ESCAPE. 

The Short winter day was nearly ended. The 
:ets were deserted, save for a few random 
^gglers, and these hurried straight along, with 
intent look of people who were only anxious 
accomplish their errands as quickly as pos- 
le, and then snugly house themselves from the 
ng wind and the gathering twilight. They 
ked neither to the right nor to the left; they 
d no attention to our party, they did not even 
m to see them. Edward the Sixth wondered 
he spectacle of a king on his way to jail. had 
T encountered such marvellous indifference be- 
s. By and by the constable arrived at a de- 
ted market-square, and proceeded to cross it 
len he had reached the middle of it, Hendon 
d his hand upon his arm, and said in a low 
ce — 

'he Prince and the Pauper. IL 6 

Digitized 



byGooQle 



82 THE PRENCE AND THE PAUPER. 

"Bide a moment, good sir, there is none in 
hearing, and I would say a word to thee." 

"My duty forbids it, sir; prithee hinder me 
not, the night comes on." 

"Stay, nevertheless, for the matter concems 
thee nearly. Tum thy back a moment and seem 
not to see : let this poor lad escapeP 

"This to me, sir! I arrest thee in " 

"Nay, be not too hasty. See thou be careful 
and commit no foolish error" — then he shut his 
voice down to a whisper, and said in the man's 
ear — "the pig thou hast purchased for eightpence 
may cost thee thy neck, man!" 

The poor constable, taken by surprise, was 
speechless, at first, then found his tongue and feil 
to blustering and threatening; but Hendon was 
tranquil, and waited with patience tili his breath 
was spent; then said — 

**I have a liking to thee, friend, and would 
not willingly see thee come to härm. Observe, I 
heard it all — every word. I will prove it to 
thee." Then he repeated the conversation which 
the officer and the woman had had together in 
the hall, word for word, and ended with — 

"There — have I set it forth correctly? Should 

 IC 



THE ESCAPE. 



83 



1 1 be able to set it forth correctly before the 
ige, if occasion required?" 

The man was dumb with fear and distress, 
• a moment; then he rallied, and said with 
ced lightness — 

"Tis making a mighty matter indeed, out of 
jest; I but plagued the woman for mine amuse- 
int" 

"Kept you the woman's pig for amusement?" 

The man answered sharply— 

"Nought eise, good sir — I teil thee 'twas bin 
est." 

"I do begin to believe thee," said Hendon, 
;h a perplexing mixture of mockery and half- 
iviction in his tone; "but tarry thou here a 
•ment whilst I run and ask his worship — for 
;hless, he being a man experienced in law, in 
ts, in " 

He was moving away, still talking; the con- 
ble hesitated, fidgetted, spat out an oath or 
), then cried out — 

"Hold, hold, good sir — prithee wait a little^ — 
) judge! Why, man, he hath no more sym- 
thy with a jest than hath a dead corpse! — 
ne, and we will speak further. Ods body! T 
im to be in evil case — and all for an innocent 

6» 



lt°'' 



84 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

and thoughtless pleasantry. I am a man of 

family; and my wife and little ones List to 

reason, good your worship: what wouldst thou 
of me?" 

"Only that thou be blind and dumb and 
paralytic whilst one may count a hundred thou- 
sand — counting slowly/' said Hendon, with the 
expression of a man who asks but a reasonable 
favour, and that a very little one. 

"It is my destructionl" said the constable 
despairingly. "Ah, be reasonable, good sir; only 
look at this matter, on all its sides, and see how 
mere a jest it is — how manifestly and how plainly 
it is so. And even if one granted it were not a 
jest, it is a fault so small that e'en the grimmest 
penalty it could call forth would be but a rebuke 
and warning from the judge's lips." 

Hendon replied with a solemnity which chilled 
the air about him — 

"This jest of thine hath a name, in law,— 
wot you what it is?" 

"I knew it not! Peradventure I have been 
unwise. I never dreamed it had a name— ah, 
sweet heaven, I thought it was original." 

"Yes, it hath a name. In the law this crime 

 IC 



THE ESCAPE. 



85 



called Non compos mentis lex talionis sie transii 
iria mundiP 

"Ah, my God!" 

"And the penalty is death!" 

"God be merciful to me, a sinner!" 

"By advantage taken of one in fault, in dire 
ril, and at thy mercy, thou hast seized goods 
)rth above thirteenpence ha'penny, paying but 
trifle for the same; and this, in the eye of the 
5V, is constructive barratry, misprision of treason, 
alfeasance in office, ad hominem expurgatis in 
itu quo — and the penalty is death by the 
ilter, without ransom, commutation, or benefit of 
ärgy." 

"Bear me up, bear me up, sweet sir, my legs 
) fail me! Be thou merciful — spare me this 
)om, and I will tum my back and see nought 
at shall happen." 

"Good! now thou'rt wise and reasonable. And 
lou'lt restore the pig?" 

"I will, I will indeed — nor ever touch an- 
her, though heaven send it and an archangel 
tch it. Go — I am blind for thy sake — I see 
)thing. I will say thou didst break in and 
rest the prisoner from my hands by force. It 
I but a crazy, ancient door — I will batter it 



C'v 



b 

A 



86 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

down myself betwixt midnight and the mom- 
ing." 

"Do it, good soul, no härm will come of it; 
the judge hath a loving charity for this poor lad, 
and will shed no tears and break no jailer's 
bones for bis escape." "^ 



 



HENDON HALL. 



zed by Mj' 



Soogle 



 



CHAPTER XXV. 
HENDON HALL. 

As soon as Hendon and the King were out 
f sight of the constable, his Majesty was in- 
tnicted to hurry to a certain place outside the 
own, and wait there, whilst Hendon should go 
the inn and settle his account. Half an hour 
ater the two friends were blithely jogging east- 
^ard on Hendon's sorry steeds. The King was 
i^arm and comfortable, now, for he had cast his 
ags and clothed himself in the second-hand suit 
irhich Hendon had bought on London Bridge. 

Hendon wished to guard against over-fatigu- 
ng the boy; he judged that hard joumeys, 
rregular meals, and illiberal measures of sleep 
voüld be bad for his crazed mind; whilst rest, 
egularity, and moderate exercise would be pretty 
ure to hasten its eure; he longed to see the 
tricken intellect made well again and its dis- 
iased visions driven out of the tormented little 



byG 



oogle 



90 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

head; therefore he resolved to move by easy 
stages toward the home whence he had so long 
been banished, instead of obeying the Impulse 
of his impatience and hunying along night and 
day. 

When he and the King had joumeyed about 
ten miles, they reached a considerable village, 
and halted there for the night, at a good inn. 
The former relations were resumed; Hendon stood 
behind the King's chair, while he dined, and 
waited upon him; undressed him when he was 
ready for bed; then took the floor for his own 
quarters, and slept athwart the door, roUed up in 
a blanket 

The next day, and the day after, they jogged 
lazily along talking over the adventures they had 
met since their Separation, and mightily enjoying 
each other's narratives. Hendon detailed all his 
wide wanderings in search of the King, and 
described how the archangel had led hiin a fcoFs 
joumey all over the forest, and taken him back 
to the hut, finally, when he found he could not 
get rid of him. Then — he said — the old man 
went into the bedchamber and came staggering 
back looking broken-hearted, and sa3dng he had 
expected to find that the bqy had retumed and 



 



HENDON HALL. 



91 



lin down in there to rest, but it was not so. 
[enden had waited at the hut all day; hope of 
le King's retum died out, then, and he departed 
pon the quest again, 

"And old Sanctum Sanctorum was truly sorry 
our highness came not back," said Hendon; "I 
iw it in his face." 

"Marry I will never doubt that/" said the 
Ling — and then told his own story; after which, 
[endon was sorry he had not destroyed the 
rchangeL 

During the last day of the trip, Hendon's 
pirits were soaring. His tongue ran constantly. 
[e talked about his old father, and his brother 
Jthur, and told of many things which illustrated 
leir high and generous characters; he went into 
)ving frenzies over his Edith, and was so glad- 
earted that he was even able lo say some gentle 
Qd brotherly things about Hugh. He dwelt a 
eal on the coming meeting at Hendon Hall; 
^hat a surprise it would be to everybody, and 
rhat an outburst of thanksgiving and delight 
lere would be. 

It was a fair region, dotted with cottages and 
rchards, and the road led through broad pasture 
sinds whose receding expanses, marked with 



^ogle 



92 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

gentie elevations and depressions, suggested the 
swelling and subsiding undulations of the sea. 
In the aftemoon the retuming prodigal made 
constant deflections from his course to see if by 
ascending some hillock he might not pierce the 
distance and catch a glimpse of his home. At 
last he was successful, and cried out excitedly— 

"There is the village, my Prince, and there is 
the Hall close by! You may see the towers from 
here; and that wood there — that is my father's 
park. Ah, now thou'lt know what State and 
grandeur be! A house with seventy rooms— 
think of that! — and seven and twenty servants! 
A brave lodging for such as we, is it not so? 
Come, let us speed — my impatience will not 
brook further delay." 

All possible hurry was made; still, it was 
after three o'clock before the village was reached. 
The travellers scampered through it, Hendon's 
tongue going all the time. "Here is the church 
— covered with the same ivy — none gone, none 
added." "Yonder is the inn, the old Red Lion,— 
and yonder is the market-place." "Here is the 
Maypole, and here the pump — nothing is altered; 
nothing but the people, at any rate; ten years 
make a change in people; some of these I seem 



 



HENDON HALL. 



95 



o know, but none know me." So his chat ran 
m. The end of the village was soon reached; 
hen the travellers Struck into a crooked, narrow 
oad, walled in with tall hedges, and hurried 
)riskly along it for half a mile, then passed into 
L vast flower garden through an imposing gate- 
vay, whose huge stone pillars bore sculptured 
Lrmorial devices. A noble mansion was before 
hem. 

"Welcome to Hendon Hall, my King!" ex- 
:laimed Miles. "Ah, 'tis a great day! My father 
tnd my brother, and the Lady Edith will be so 
nad with joy that they will have eyes and tongue 
br none but me in the first transports of the 
neeting, and so thou'lt seem but coldly welcome d 
—but mind it not; 'twill soon seem otherwisc; 
br when I say thou art my ward, and teil them 
low costly is my love for thee, thou'lt see them 
ake thee to their breasts for Miles Hendon 's 
;ake, and make their house and hearts thy homc 
br ever after!" 

The next moment Hendon sprang to the 
jround before the great door, helped the King 
iown, then took him by the band and rushed 
vithin. A few Steps brought him to a spacious 
ipartment; he entered, seated the King with 



Digfeedb 



94 THE PRINXE AND THE PAUPER. 

more hurry than ceremony, then ran toward a 
young man who sat at a writing table in front of 
a generous fire of logs. 

"Embrace me, Hugh," he cried, "and say 
thou'rt glad I am come again! and call our father, 
for home is not home tili I shall touch bis band, 
and see bis face, and bear bis voice once 
more!" 

But Hugb only drew back, after betraying a 
momentary surprise, and bent a grave stare upon 
tbe intnider — a stare wbicb indicated somewhat 
of ofTended dignity, at first, tben cbanged, in 
response to some inward tbougbt or purpose, to 
an expression of marvelling curiosity, mixed with 
a real or assumed compassion. Presently he 
said, in a mild voice — 

"Tby wits seem toucbed, poor stranger; doubt- 
less tbou bast suffered privations and rüde buffet- 
ings at tbe world's bands; tby looks and dress 
betoken it. Wbom dost tbou take me to be?" 

"Take tbee? Pritbee for wbom eise than 
wbom tbou art? I take tbee to be Hugb Hendon," 
Said Miles, sbarply. 

Tbe other continued, in tbe same soft tone— 

"And wbom dost tbou imagine tbyself to 
be?" 

IC 



UENDON HALL. 95 

"Imagination hath nought to do with itl 
)ost thou pretend thou knowest me not for thj 
irother Miles Hendon?" 

An expression of pleased surprise flitted across 
lugh's face, and he exclaimed — 

"What! thou art not jesting? can the dead 
ome to life? God be praised if it be so! Our 
iOOT lost boy restored to our arms after all these 
niel years! Ah, it seems too good to be true, 
t ü too good to be true — I Charge thee, have 
»ity, do not trifle with me! Quick — come to the 
ight — let me scan thee well!" 

He seized Miles by the arm, dragged him to 
he window, and began to devour him from head 
foot with his eyes, tuming him this way and 
hat, and stepping briskly around him and about 
lim to prove him from all points of view; whilst 
he returned prodigal, all aglow with gladness, 
miled, laughed, and kept nodding his head and 
.aying— 

"Go on, brother, go on, and fear not; thouUt 
ind nor limb nor feature that cannot bide the 
est. Scour and scan me to thy content, my 
jood old Hugh — I am indeed thy old Miles, thy 
jame old Miles, thy lost brother, is't not so? Ah, 
tis a great day — I satd 'twas a great day! Give 



Digitized by LjÖOQ IC 



gÖ THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

me thy band, give me thy cheek — lord, I am like 
to die of very joy!" 

He was about to throw himself upon his 
brother; but Hugh put up his hand in dissent, 
then dropped his chin mournfully upon his breast, 
saying with emotion — 

"Ah, God of his mercy give me strength to 
bear this grievous disappointment!" 

MileSy amazed, could not speak, for a moment; 
then he found his tongue, and cried out — 

^*W/ia/ disappointment? Am I not thy 
brother?" 

Hugh shook his head sadly, and said — 

"I pray heaven it may prove so, and that 
other eyes may find tbe resemblances that are 
hid from mine. Alack, I fear me the letter spoke 
but too truly." 

MWhat letter?" 

"One that came from over sea, some six or 
seven years ago. It said my brother died in 
battle.!' 

"It was a lie! Call thy father — he will know 
me." 

"One may not call the dead." 

"Dead?" Miles's voice was subdued, and his 
Ups trembled. "My father deadl — oh, this is 



 



HENDON HALL. 



97 



leavy news. Half my new joy is withered now. 
^rithee let me see my brother Arthur — he will 
now me; he will know me and console me." 

"He, also, is dead." 

"God be merciful to me, a stricken man! 
rone, — both gone — the worthy taken and the 
orthless spared, in me! Ah! I crave your 
iercy\ — do not say the Lady Edith " 

"Is dead? No, she lives." 

"Then, God be praised, my joy is whole 
gain! Speed thee, brother — let her come to 
le! An' ske say I am not myself, — but she will 
Dt; no, no, she will know me, I were a fool to 
oubt it Bring her — bring the old servants; they, 
►o, will know me." 

"All are gone but five — Peter, Halsey, David, 
emard, and Margaret." 

So saying, Hugh left the room. Miles stood 
lusing a while, then began to walk the floor, 
lUttering — 

"The five arch-villains have survived tne two- 
ad-twenty leal and honest — 'tis an odd thing." 

He continued Walking back and forth, mutter- 
ig to himself; he had forgotten the King entirely. 
y and by his Majesty said gravely, and with a 
luch of genuine compassion, though the words 

Tkf Prince and the Pauper. //. 7 



dbyGoOQle 



i 



98 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

themselves were capable of being interpreted 
ironically — 

"Mind not thy mischance, good man: there 
be others in the world whose identity is denied, 
and whose claims are derided. Thou hast Com- 
pany." 

"Ah, my King,** cried Hendon, colouring 
slightly, "do not thou condemn me — wait, and 
thou shalt see. I am no impostor — she will say 
it; you shall hear it from the sweetest lips in 
England. I an impostor? Why, I know this old 
hall, these pictures of my ancestors, and all these 
things that are about us, as a child knoweth its 
own nursery. Here was I bom and bred, my 
lord; I speak the truth; I would not deceive 
thee; and should none eise believe, I pray thee 
do not thou doubt me — I could not bear it." 

"I do not doubt thee," said the King, with a 
childlike simplicity and faith. 

"I thank thee out of myheart!" exclaimed 
Hendon, with a fervency which showed that he 
was touched. The King added with the same 
simplicity — 

"Dost thou doubt me?'' 

A guilty confusion seized upon Hendon, and 
he was grateful that the door opened to admit 



 



HENDON HALL. 



99 



[ugh, at that moment, and saved him the neces- 
ity of replying. 

A beautiful lady, richly clothed, followed 
[ugh, and after her came several liveried ser- 
mts. The lady walked slowly, with her head 
owed and her eyes fixed upon the floor. The 
Lce was unspeakably sacUftfiles Hendon sprang 
)rward, crying out — .* % 

"Oh, my Edith, my darling " 

But Hugh waved him back, gravely, and said 
) the lady — 

"Look upon him. Do you know him?" 

At the sound of Mites's voice the woman had 
arted slightly, and her cheeks had flushed; she 
as trembling now. She stood still, during an 
npressive pause of several moments; then slowly 
fted up her head and looked into Hendon's eyes 
ith a stony and frightened gaze; the blood sank 
iit of her face, drop by drop, tili nothing re- 
lained but the grey pallor of death; then she 
lid, in a voice as dead as the face, "I know him 
ot!" and turned, with a moan and a stifled sob, 
ad tottered out of the room. 

Miles Hendon sank into a chair and covered 
is face with his hands. After a pause, his 
rother said to the servants — 

7* 



db 



om 



lOO THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

"You have observed him. Do you know 
him?" 

They shook their heads; then the master 
Said — 

"The servants know you not, sir. I fear there 
is some mistake. Vnu have seen that my wife 
knew you nof ^ Hp 

"Thy wi/U*\ \ ' -jtant Hugh was pinned 
to the wall, with an , on grip about his throat 
"Oh, thou fox-hearted slave, I see it all! Thou'st 
writ the lying letter thyself, and my stolen bride 
and goods are its fruit There — now get thee 
gone, lest I shame mine honourable soldiership 
with the slaying of so pitiful a mannikin!" 

Hugh, red-faced, and almost suffocated, reeled 
to the nearest chair, and commanded the servants 
to seize and bind the murderous stranger. They 
hesitated, and one of them said — 

"He is armed, Sir Hugh, and we are weapon- 
less." 

"Armed 1 What of it, and ye so many? Upon 
him, I say!" 

But Miles wamed them to be careful what 
they did, and added — 

"Ye know me of old — I have not changed; 
come on, an' it like you.^' 



 



HENDON HALL. 



lOI 



This reminder did not hearten the servants 
mch; they still held back. 

"Then go, ye paltry cowards, and arm your- 
;lves and guard the doors, >^ilst I send one to 
Jtch the watdi;" said Hugh. He turaed at the 
ireshold, and said to Ifp '*You'll find it to 
)ur advantage to offe^/ irith useless en- 

savours at escape." 

"Escape? Spare thys^ discoAifort, an' that 
all that troubles thee. For Miles Hendon is 
aster of Hendon Hall and all its belongings. 
e will remain — doubt it not." 






ogle 



 IC 



D I S O W N E D. 



db,G|fc)gle 1 



 



CHAPTER XXVI. 
DISOWNED. 

The King sat musing a few moments, then 
looked up and said — 

"Tis Strange — most stränge. I cannot ac- 
count for it." 

"No, it is not stränge, my liege. I know him^ 
and this conduct is but natural. He was a rascal 
from his birth." 

"Oh, I spake not oi hirriy Sir Miles." 

"Not of him? Then of what? What is it 
that is Strange?" 

"That the King is not missed." 

"How? Which? I doubt I do not under- 
stand." 

"Indeed? Doth it not strike you as being 
passing stränge that the land is not filled with 
couriers and proclamations describing my person 
and making search for me? Is it no matter for 
commotion and distress that the Head of the 



Google 



i 



I06 THE PRINCE AND THE PAXXPER. 

State is gone? — that I am vanished away and 
lost?" 

"Most true, my King, I had forgot" Then 
Hendon sighed, and muttered to himself, "Poor 
ruined mind — still busy with its pathetic dream." 

"But I have a plan that shall right us both 
— I will write a paper, in three tongues — ^Latin, 
Greek, and English — and thou shalt haste away 
with it to London in the moming. Give it to 
none but my mide, the Lord Hertford; when he 
shall see it, he will know and say I wrote it 
Then he will send for me." 

"Might it not be best, my prince, that we 
wait, here, imtil I prove myself and make my 
rights secure to my domains? I should be so 
much the better able then to " 

The King intemipted him imperiously — 

"Peace! What are thy paltry domains, thy 
trivial interests, contrasted with matters which 
concern the weal of a nation and the integrity of 
a throne!" Then he added, in a gentle voice, 
as if he were sorry for his severity, ^'Obey, and 
have no fear; I will right thee, I will make thee 
whole — yes, more than whole. I shall remember, 
and requite." 

So saying, he took the pen, and set himself 



 



DISOWNED. 



107 



to worL Hendon contemplated him lavingly a 
while, then said to himself — 

"An' it were dark, I should think it was a 
king that spoke; there's no denying it, when the 
humour's upon him he doth thunder and lighten 
like your true King — now where got he that trick? 
See him scribble and Scratch away contentedly 
at his meaningless pot-hooks, fancying them to 
be Latin and Greek — and except my wit shall 
serve me with a lucky device for diverting him 
from his purpose, I shall be forced to pretend to 
post away to-morrow on this wild errand he hath 
invented for me." 

* The next moment Sir Miles's thoughts had 
gone back to the recent episode. So absorbed 
was he in his musings, that when the King pre- 
sently handed him the paper which he had been 
writing, he received it and pocketed it without 
being conscious of the act. "How marvellous 
Strange she acted," he muttered. "I think she 
knew me — and I think she did not know me. 
These opinions do conflict, I perceive it plainly. 
I cannot reconcile them, neither can I^ by argu- 
ment, dismiss either of the two, or even persuade 
one to outweigh the other. The matter standeth 
simply thus: she must have known my face, my 



dbyGoofile 



3^1. 



I08 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

figure, my voice, for how could it be otherwise? 
yet she said she knew me not, and that is proof 
perfect, for she cannot lie. But stop — I think I 
begin to see. Peradventure he had influenced 
her — commanded her — compelled her, to lie. 
That is the Solution 1 The riddle is unriddled 
She seemed dead with fear — yes, she was under 
his compulsion. I will seek her; I will find her; 
now that he is away, she will speak her true 
mind. She will remember the old times when 
we were little playfellows together, and this will 
soften her heart, and she will no more betray 
me, but will confess me. There is no treacherous 
blood in her — no, she was always honest and 
true. She has loved me, in those old days— 
this is my security; for whom one has loved, one 
cannot betray." 

He stepped eagerly toward the door; at that 
moment it opened, and the Lady Edith entered. 
She was very pale, but she walked with a firm 
Step, and her carriage was füll of grace and 
gentle dignity. Her face was as sad as be- 
fore. 

Miles sprang forward with a happy confidence, 
to meet her, but she checked him with a hardly 
perceptible gesture, and he stopped where he 

IC 



DISOWNED. 



109 



was. She seated herseif, and asked him to do 
likewise. Thus simply did she take the sense of 
old-conj^deship out of him, and transform him 
into a strafiiger and a guest. The surprise of it, 
the bewildering unexpectedness of it, made him 
begin to question, for a moment, if he was the 
person he was pretending to be, after all. The 
Lady Edith said — 

"Sir, I have come to warn you. The mad 
cannot be persuaded out of their delusions, per- 
chance; but doubtless they may be persuaded to 
avoid perils. I think this dream of yours hath 
the seeming of honest truth to you, and therefore 
is not criminal — but do not tarry here with it; 
for here it is dangerous." She looked steadily 
into Miles's face a moment, then added, impress- 
ively, "It is the more dangerous for that you are 
much like what our lost lad must have grown to 
be if he had lived.'' 

"Heavens, madam, but I am he!" 

"I truly think you think it, sir. I question not 
your honesty in that — I but warn you, that is all. 
My husband is master in this region; his power 
hath hardly any limit; the people prosper or starve, 
as he wills. If you resembled not the man whom 



dbyGc^gle 



^8 



1 lO IHE PRINCE AND TH£ PAUPER. 

you profess to be, my husband might bid you 
pleasure yourself with your dream in peace; but 
trust me, I know him well, I know wbat he will 
do; he will say to all that you are but a mad 
impostor, and straightway all will edio him." She 
bent upon Miles that same steady look once more, 
and added: "If you were Miles Hendon, and he 
knew it and all the region knew it — consider 
what I am saying, weigh it well — you would stand 
in the same peril, your punishment would be no 
less sure; he would deny you and denounce you, 
and none would be bold enough to give you 
countenance." 

"Most truly I believe it," said Miles, bitterly. 
"The power that can command one life-long 
friend to betray and disown another, and be 
obeyed, may well look to be obeyed in quarters 
where bread and life are on the stake and no 
cobweb ties of loyalty and honour are con- 
cerned." 

A faint tinge appeared for a moment in the 
lady's cheek, and she dropped her eyes to the 
floor; but her voice betray ed no emotion when 
she proceeded — 

"I have wamed you, I must still warn you, to 



 



DISOWNED. 



III 



50 hence. This man will destroy you, eise. He 
LS a tyrant who knows no pity. I, who am his 
fettered slave, know this. Poor Miles, and Arthur, 
ind my dear guardian, Sir Richard, are free of 
[lim, and at rest — better that you were with them 
:han that you bide here in the clutches of this 
niscreant. Your pretensions are a menace to 
iis title and possessions; you have assaulted him 
in his own house — you are ruined if you stay. 
L^o — do not hesitate. If you lack money, take 
Lhis purse, I beg of you, and bribe the servants 
Lo let you pass. Oh, be wamed, poor soul, and 
escape while you may." 

Miles declined the purse with a gesture, and 
rose up and stood before her. 

"Grant me one thing," he said. "Let your 
eyes rest upon mine, so that I may see if they 
be steady. There — now answer me. Am I Miles 
Hendon?" 

"No. I know you not.'' 

"Swear it!" 

The answer was low, but distinct — 

"I swear." 

"Oh, this passes belief!" 

"Fly! Why will you waste the precious time? 
Fly, and save yourself." 



f' 



byG^gle 



1 1 2 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

At that moment the officers burst into the 
room and a violent struggle began; but Hendon 
was soon overpowered and dragged away. The 
King was taken, also, and both were bound, and 
led to prison. 



 



IN PRI S ON. 



The Prince and ihe Pauper. II, 



byGooQle 

J 



 



CHAPTBR XXVII. 
IN PRISON. 

The cells were all crowded; so the two friends 
irere chaiAed in a large room where persons 
liarged with trifling offences were commonly 
:ept; They had Company, for there were some 
wenty manacled and fettered prisoners here, of 
)oth sexes and of varying ages, — an obscene and 
loisy gang. The King chafed bitterly over the 
itupendous indignity thus put upon his royalty, 
mt Hendon was moody and taciturn. He was 
)retty thoroughly bewildered. He had come 
lome, a jubilant prodigal, expecting to find every- 
x>dy wild with joy over his retum; and instead 
lad got the cold Shoulder and a jail. The pro- 
nise and the fulfilment differed so widely, that 
;he effect was stunning; he could not decide 
p^rhether it was most tragic or most grotesque. 
He feit much as a man might who had danced 

8» 



b 



1 



1 16 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

blithely out to enjoy a rainbow, and got Struck 
by lightning. 

But gradually bis confiised and tormenting 
thoughts settled down into some sort of order, 
and then bis mind centred itself upon Edith. He 
tumed ber conduct over, and examined it in all 
lights, but be could not make anytbing satis- 
factory out of it Did sbe know bim? — or didn't 
sbe know bim? It was a perplexing puzzle, and 
occupied bim a long time; but be ended, finally, 
witb tbe conviction tbat sbe did know bim, and 
bad repudiated bim for interested reasons. He 
wanted to load ber name witb curses now; but 
tbis name bad so long been sacred to bim that 
be found be could not bring bis tongue to pro- 
fane it. 

Wrapped in iprison blankets of a soiled and 
tattered condition, Hendon and tbe Eling passed 
a troubled nigbt. For a bribe tbe jailer had 
furnisbed liquof to some of tbe prisoners; singing 
of ribäld songs, figbting, sbouting, and cärousing, 
was tbe natural consequence. At last, a wbile 
after midnigbt, a man attacked a woman and 
nearly killed ber by beating ber over tbe bead 
.witb bis manacles before tbe jailer. could come 
Ix) tbe rescüe. Tbe jailer restored peace by giv- 



 



IN PRISON. 



ny 



ng the man a sound clubbing about the head 
md Shoulders — then the carousing ceased; and 
ifter that, all had an opportunity to sleep who 
iid not mind the annoyance of the moanings 
md groanings of the two wounded people. 

During the ensuing week, the days and nights 
vere of a monotonous sameness, as to events; 
nen whose faces Hendon remembered more or 
ess distinctly, came, by day, to gaze at the "im- 
)ostor" and repudiate and insult him; and by 
light the carousing and brawling went on, with 
jymmetrical regularity. However, there was a 
:hange of incident at last. The jailer brought in 
in old man, and said to him — 

"The villain is in this room — cast thy old 
äyes about and see if thou canst say which is 
he." 

Hendon glanced up, and experienced a 
pleasant Sensation for the first time since he had 
been in the jail. He said to himself, "This is 
Blake Andrews, a servant all his life in my 
father's family — a good honest soul, with a right 
heart in his breast That is, formerly. But none 
are true, now; all are liars. This man will know 
me — and will deny me, too, like the rest" 



b 



i 



•I l8 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER, 

The old lüan gäzed aröund the room, glanced 
at each face in turn, and finally said— ^ 

**I see nohe here but paltry küaves, scum o' 
the streets. Which is he?" 

The jailer laughed. 

"Here/' he said; "scan this big animal, and 
grant me an opinion." 

The old man approached, and looked Hendon 
over, long and eamestly, then shook his head and 
said-r- 

"Marry, this is no Hendon — nor ever was!" 

"Right! Thy old eyes are sound yet. An' I 
were Sir Hugh, I would take the. shabby carle 
and " 

The jailer finished by lifting himself a-tip-toe 
with an imaginary halter, at the same time mak- 
ing a gurgling noise in his throat suggestive of 
suffocation. The old man said, vindictively— ^ 

"Let him bless God an' he fare no worse. 
An' / had the handling o' the villain he should 
roast, or I am fto true man!" 

The jailer laughed a pleasant hyena laugh, 
and said — 

"Give him a piece of thy mind, cid man— 
they all do it. Thou'lt find it good diversion." 

Th^n he sauntered toward Ws ante-room ^nd 



 



IN PRISON. 



ri ig 



disappeared. The old man dropped upon his 
knees änd whispered — 

"Göd be thänked, thou'rt come again, my 
master! I believed thou wert dead these seven 
years, and lo, here thou art alive! I knew thee 
the moment I saw thee; and main hard work it 
was to keep a stony cöuntenance and seem to 
see none h«:e but tuppenny knaves and rubbish 
o' the streets. I am old and poor, Sir Miles; but 
say the word and I will go forth and proclaim 
the truth though I be strangled for it." 

"No," Said Hendon; "thou shalt not. It would 
min thee, aiid yet help but little in my cause. 
But I thank thee; for thou hast given me back 
somewhat of my lost faith in my kind." 

The old servant became very valuable to 
Hendon and the King; for he dropped in several 
times a day to "abuse" the former, and always 
smuggled in a few delicacies to help out the 
prison bin of fare; he also furnished the current 
news. Hendon reserved the dainties for the 
King; without them his Majesty might not have 
survived, for he was not able to eat the coarse 
and wretched food provided by the jaikr. 
Andrews was obliged to confine himself to brief 
Visits, in Order to avoid suspicion; but he man- 



 IC 



t2D THE PRINCE AND THE PAXJPEIL 

aged to impart a fair degree of information each 
time — information delivered in a low voice, for 
Hendon's.benefit, änd interlarded with insulting 
epithets delivered in a louder voice, for the 
benefit of other hearers. 

So, littie by little, the story of the family 
came out. Arthur had been dead six years. 
This loss, with the absence of news from Hendon, 
impaired the father's health; he believed he was 
going to die, and he wished to see Hugh and 
Edith settled in life before he passed away; but 
Edith begged hard for delay, hoping for Miles's 
retum; then the letter came which brought tiie 
news of Miles's death; the shock prostrated Sir 
Richard; he believed his end was very near, and 
he and Hugh insisted upon the marriage; Edith 
begged for and obtained a month's respite; then 
another, and finally a third; the marriage then 
took place, by the death-bed of Sir Richard. It 
had not proved a happy one. It was whispered 
about the country that shortly after the nuptials 
the bride found among her husband's papers 
several rough and incomplete drafts of the fatal 
letter, and had accused him of precipitating the 
marriage — and Sir Richard's death, too — by a 
wicked forgeiy. Tales of cnielty to the Lady 



 



m PRISON. 



12t 



Edith and the servants were to be heard on all 
hands; and since the father^s death Sir Hugh 
had thrown off all soft disguises and become a 
pitiless master toward all who in any way de- 
pended upon him and his domains for bread. 

There was a bit of Andrews's gossip which 
the King listened to with a lively interest — 

"There is rumour that the King is mad. But 
in charity forbear to say / mentioned it, for 'tis 
death to speak of it, they say." 

His Majesty glared at the old man and 
Said — 

"The King is nof mad, good n\an — and thouUt 
find it to thy advantage to busy thyself with 
matters that nearer concem thee than this sedi- 
tious prattle." 

"What doth the lad mean?" said Andrews, 
surprised at this brisk assault from such an un- 
expected quarter. Hendon gave him a sign, and 
he did not pursue his question, but went on with 
his budget — 

"The late King is to be buried at Windsor 
in a day or two — the i6th of the month, — and 
the new King will be crowned at Westminster 
the 20th." 



 



122 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER- 

"Methinks they must needs.find him first," 
muttered his Majesty; then added, confidentiy, 
f*but they will look to that — and so also shall L" 

"In the name of " 

But the old man got no further — a wafning 
sign from Hendon checked his remarL He re- 
sumed the thread of his gossip — 

"Sir Hugh goeth to the coronation — and with 
grand hopes. He confidently looketh to come 
back a peer, for he is high in favour with the 
Lord Protector." 

«What Lord Protector?" asked his Majesty, 

"His grace the Duke of Somerset." 

"What Duke of Somerset?" 

"Marry, there is but one — Seymour, Earl of 
Hertford." 

The King asked, sharply — 

"Since when is he a duke, and Lord Pro- 
tector?" 

"Since the last day of January." 

"And prithee who made him so?" 

"Himself and the Great Council — with help 
of the King." 

His Majesty started violently. "The K£ngP* 
he cried. " What king, good six?" 

"What king, indeed! (God-a-mercy, what 



 



IN PRISON. 



I2i 



aileth th« boy?) Sith we have but one, 'tis not 
difficult to answer — his most sacred Majesty King 
Edward the Sixth— whom God preservel Yea, 
and a dear and gracious little urchin is he, too; 
and whether he be mad or no— and they say he 
mendeth daily — his praises are on all men's lips; 
and all bless hira, likewise, and offer prayers that 
he may be spared to reign long in England; for 
he began humanely, with saving the old Duke of 
Norfolk's life, and now is he bent on destroying 
the cruellest of the laws that harry and oppress 
the people." 

This news Struck his Majesty dumb with 
amazement, and plunged him into so deep and 
dismal ,a reverie that he heard no more of the 
old man's gossip. He wondered if the "little 
urchin" was the beggar-boy whom he left dressed 
in his own garments in the palace. It did not 
seera possible that this could be, for surely his 
manners and speech would betray him if he pre- 
tended to be the Prince of Wales— then he would 
be driven outj and search made for the true 
prince. Could it be that the Court had set up 
some sprig of the nobility in his place? No, for 
his uncle would not allow that -^ he was all- 
powerful and could and would crush such a 



b 



t 



124 THE PRINCE AND THE PAXJPER. 

movement, of course. The bo/s musings profited 
him nothing; the more he tried to unriddle the 
mystery the more perplexed he became, the more 
his head ached, and the worse he slept His 
impatience to get to London grew hourly, and 
his captivity became almost unendurable. 

Hendon's arts all failed with the King— he 
could not be comforted; but a couple of women 
who were« chained near him succeeded better. 
Under their gentle ministrations he found peace 
and leamed a degree of patience. He was very 
grateful, and came to love them dearly and to 
delight in the sweet and soothing influence of 
their presence. He asked them why they were 
in prison, and when they said they were Baptists, 
he smiled, and inquired — 

"Is that a crime to be shut up for, in a 
prison? Now I grieve, for I shall lose ye — they 
will not keep ye long for such a little thing." 

They did not answer; and something in their 
faces made him uneasy. He said, eagerly — 

"You do not speak — be good to me, and teil 
me — there will be no other punishment? Prithee 
teil me there is no fear of that." 

They tried to change the topic, but his fears 
were aroused, and he pursued it — 

 IC 



IN PRISON. 



125 



**Will they scourge thee? No, no, they would 
not be so crael! Say they would not Come, 
they will not, will they?" 

The women betrayed confusion and distress, 
but there was no avoiding an answer, so one of 
them Said, in a voice choked with emotion — 

"Oh, thou'lt break our hearts, thou gentle 
spirit! — God will help us to bear our " 

"It is a confession!" the King broke in. 
"Then they will scourge thee, the stony-heartcd 
wretches! But oh, thou must not weep, I can- 
not bear it* Keep up thy courage — I shall come 
to my own in time to save thee from this bitter 
thing, and I will do it!" 

When the King awoke in the moming, the 
women were gone. 

"They are saved!" he said, joyfuUy; then 
added, despondently, "but woe is me! — for they 
were my comforters." 

Each of them had left a shred of ribbou 
pinned to his clothing, in token of remembrance. 
He said he would keep these things always; and 
that soon he would seek out these dear good 
friends of his and take them under his pro- 
tection. 



J 



ogle 



126 THE PRINOE AND TfiE PAUPER. 

* Just then the jailer came in with some Sub- 
ordinätes and commanded ihat the prisoneis be 
conducted to the jail-yard. The King was öyer- 
joyed — it woiild be a blessed thing to see the 
blue sky and breathe the firesh air once more. 
He fretted and chafed at the slowne^ of the of- 
ficers, but his turn came at last, and he was 
released from his staple and ordered to follow 
the other priswiers, with Hendon. 

The court or quadrangle was stone-paved, and 
open to the sky. The prisoners entered it 
through a massive archway of masonry, and were 
placed in file, Standing, with their backs against 
the wall. A rope was stretched in front of them, 
and they were also guarded by their officers. It 
was a chill and lowering morning, and a light 
snow which had fallen during the night whitened 
the great empty Space and added to the gerieral 
dismalness of its aspect. Now and then a wintry 
wind shivered through the place and sent the 
snow eddying hither and thither. 

In the centre of the court stood two women, 
chained to posts. A glance showed the King 
that these were his good friends. He shuddered, 
and Said to himself, "Alack, they are not goöe 
free, as I had thought. To think that such as 

 IC 



m PRISON. 



127 



these should know the lash! — in England! /^^ 
there's the shame of it — not in Heathenesse, but 
Christian England! They will be scourged; and 
I, whom they have comforted and kindly entreated, 
must look on and see the great wrong done; it is 
Strange, so stränge! that I, the very source of 
power in this broad realm, am helpless to protect 
them. But let these miscreants look well to 
themselves, for there is a day Coming when I 
will require of them a heavy reckoning for this 
work. For every blow they strike now, they 
shall feel a himdred then." 

A great gate swung open, and a crowd of 
Citizens poured in. They flocked around the two 
women, and hid them from the King's view. A 
dergyman entered and passed through the crowd, 
and he also was hidden. The King now heard 
talkingy back and forth, as if questions were 
being asked and answered, but he could not 
make out what was said. Next there was a deal 
of bustle and preparation, and much passing and 
repassing of officials through that part of the 
crowd that stood on the further side of the 
women; and whilst this proceeded a deep hush 
gradually feil upön the peq)le. 

Now, by commänd, the masses parted and 



 



\ 128 THE PRINCE AND THE PAXJPER. 

feil aside, and the • King saw a spectacle that 
froze the marrow in bis bones. Faggots had been 
piled about the two women, and a kneeling man 
was lighting theml 

The women bowed their heads, and covered 
their faces with their hands; the yellow flames 
began to climb upward among the snapping and 
crackling faggots, and wreaths of blue smoke to 
stream away on the wind; the clergyman lifted 
bis hands and began a prayer — ^just then two 
young girls came flying through the great gate, 
uttering piercing screams, and threw themselves 
lipon the women at the stake. Instantly they 
were torn away by the officers, and one of them 
was kept in a tight grip, but the other broke 
loose, saying she would die with her mother; and 
before she could be stopped she had flung her 
arms about her mother's neck again. She was 
torn away once more, and with her gown on fire. 
Two or tree men held her, and the buming 
portion of her gown was snatched ofF and thrown 
flaming aside, she struggling all the while to 
free herseif, and saying she would be alone in 
the World, now; and begging to be allowed to 
die with her mother. Both the girls screamed 
continually, and fought for ffeedom; but suddenly 



 



IN PRISON. 



12g 



this tumult was drowned under a volley of heart- 
Piercing shrieks of mortal agony, — the King 
glanced from the frantic girls to the stake, then 
tumed away and leaned his ashen face against 
Lhe wall, and looked no more. He said, "That 
ivhich I have seen, in that one little moment, 
^ill never go out from my memory, but will 
ibide there; and I shall see it all the days, and 
iream of it all the nights, tili I die. Would God 
[ had been blind!" 

Hendon was watching the King. He said to 
limself, with satisfaction, "His disorder mendeth; 
le hath changed, and groweth gentler. If he 
lad foUowed his wont, he would have stormed at 
hese varlets, and said he was King, and com- 
nanded that the women be turned loose un- 
)Cathed. Soon his delusion will pass away and 
be forgotten, and his poor mind will be whole 
igain. God speed the day!" 

That same day several prisoners were brought 
in to remain over night, who were being con- 
ireyed, under guard, to various places in the 
kingdom, to undergo punishment for crimes com- 
mitted. The liing conversed with these, — he had 
made it a point, from* the beginning, to instnict 

The Priffce and the Pauker. Ih 9 



db 



130 THE PRINCfi AND T(IE PAUPER. 

himself for the kingly office by questioning 
prisoners whenever the opportunity offered— and 
the tale of their woes wrung his heart One of 
them was a poor half-witted woman who had 
Stolen a yard or two of doth from a weaver — she 
was to be hanged for it Another was a man 
who had been accused of stealing a horse; he 
Said the proof had failed, and he had imagined 
that he was safe from the halter; but no — ^he 
was hardly free before he was arraigned for 
killing a deer in the King's park; this was proved 
agaiilst him, and now he was on his way to the 
gallows. There was a tradesman's apprentice 
whose case particularly distressed the King; this 
youth Said he found a hawk, one evening, that 
had escaped from its owner, and he took ithome 
with him, imagining himself entitled to it; but 
the court convicted him of stealing it, and 
sentenced him to death. 

The King was furious over these inhumanities, 
and wanted Hendon to break jail and fly with 
him to Westminster, so that he could mount his 
throne and hold out his sceptre in mercy over 
these unfortunate people and sa^re their lives. 
**Poor child," sighed Hendon, "these woful tales 
have brought his malady upon him again — alack, 



 



IN PRISON. 



X3r 



)ut for this evil hap, he would have been well in 
i little time." 

Among these prisoners was an old lawyer — a 
nan with a streng face and a dauntless mien, 
rhree years past, he had written a pamphlet 
Lgainst the Lord Chancellor, accusing him of in- 
ustice, and had been punished for it by the 
oss of his ears in the pillory, and degradation 
rom the bar, and in addition had been fined 
j,ooo/. and sentenced to imprisonment for life, 
L,ately he had repeated his offence; and in con- 
lequence was now under sentence to lose what 
^ematned of his ears, pay a fine of 5,000/., be 
Dranded on both cheeks, and remain in prison 
for life. 

"These be honourable scars," he said, and 
turned back his grey hair and showed the 
[nutilated stubs of what had once been his ears* 

The King's eye burned with passion. He 
Said — 

"None believe in me — neither wilt thou. But 
HO matter — ^within the compass of a month thou 
shalt be free; and more, the laws that have dis- 
honbured thee, and shamed the English name, 
shall be swept from the Statute books. The 

9» 



dbyGaogle 



132 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

World is made wrong; kings should go to school 
to their own laws, at times, and so kam 
mercy/'* 

♦ See Notes to Chapter XXVII., at end of this volume. 



 



THE SACRIFICE. 



dbyG^gle 



 



CIIAPTER XXVIII. 
THE SACRIFICE. 

Meantime Miles was growing sufficiently tired 
of confinement and inaction. But now his trial 
came on, to his great gratification, and he thought 
he could welcome any sentence provided a further 
imprisonment should not be a part of it. But he 
was mistaken about that. He was in a fine fury 
when he found himself described as a "sturdy 
vagabond" and sentenced to sit two hours in the 
pillory for bearing that character and for assauh- 
ing the master of Hendon Hall. His pretensions 
as to brothership with his prosecutor, and rightful 
heirship to the Hendon honours and estates, were 
left contemptuously unnoticed, as being not even 
worth examination. 

He raged and threatened, on his way to 
punishment, but it did no good; he was snatched 
roughly along by the officers, and got an occa- 
sional cuff, besides, for bis irreverent conduct. 



db 



136 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

The King could not pierce through the rabble 
that swarmed behind; so he was obliged to foUow 
in the rear, remote from his good friend and 
servant The King had been nearly condemned 
to the Stocks himself for being in such bad Com- 
pany, but had been let ofF with a lecture and a 
waming, in consideration of his youth. When 
the crowd at last halted, he flitted feverishly 
from point to point around its outer rim, hunting 
a place to get through; and at last, after a deal 
of difficulty and delay, succeeded. There sat 
his poor henchman in the degrading Stocks, the 
Sport and butt of a dirty mob — he, the body 
servant of the King of England! Edward had 
heard the sentence pronounced, but he had not 
realised the half that it meant. His anger began 
to rise as the sense of this new indignity which 
had been put upon him sank home; it jumped to 
summer heat, the next moment, when he saw an 
egg sail through the air and cnish itself against 
Hendon's cheek, and heard the crowd roar its 
enjoyment of the episode. He sprang across the 
open circle and confronted the officer in Charge, 
crying — 

"For shame! This is my servant — set him 
freel I am the " 



 



THE SACRIFICE. 



^37 



"Oh, peace!" exclaimed Hendon, in a panic, 
"thou'lt destroy thyself. Mind him not, officer, 
he is mad." 

"Give thyself no trouble as to the matter of 
minding him, good man, I have small mind to 
mind him; but as to teaching him somewhat, to 
that I am well inclined." He turaed to a sub- 
ordinate and said, "Give the little fool a taste or 
two of the lash, to mend his manners." 

"Half a dozen will better serve his tum," sug- 
gested Sir Hugh, who had ridden up, a moment 
before, to take a passing glance at the pro- 
ceedings. 

The King was seized. He did not even 
struggle, so paralysed was he with the mere 
thought of the monstrous outrage that was pro- 
posed to be inflicted upon his sacred person. 
History was already defiled with the record of 
the scourging of an English King with whips — 
it was an intolerable reflection that he must 
furnish a duplicate of that shameful page. He 
was in the toils, there was no help for him: he 
must either take this punishment or beg for its 
remission. Hard conditions; he would take the 
stripes — a king might do that, but a king could 
not beg. 



db 



I 



IjS THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

But meantimey Miles Hendon was resolving 
the difficulty. "Let the child go," said he; "ye 
heartless dogs, do ye not see how young and frail 
he is? Let him go — I will take his lashes." 

"Marry, a good thought, — and thanks for it," 
said Sir Hugh, his face lighting with a sardonic 
satisfaction. **Let the little beggar go, and give 
this fellow a dozen in his place — an honest dozen, 
well laid on." The King was in the act of enter- 
ing a fierce protest, but Sir Hugh silenced him with 
the potent remark, "Yes, speak up, do, and free 
thy mind — only, mark ye, that for each word you 
utter he shall get six strokes the more." 

Hendon was removed from the Stocks, and his 
back laid bare; and whilst the lash was applied 
the poor little King tumed away his face and 
allowed unroyal tears to Channel his cheeks un- 
checked. "Ah, brave good heart," he said to 
himself, "this loyal deed shall never perish out 
of my memory. I will not forget it — and neither 
shall theyl** he added, with passion. Whilst he 
mused, his appreciation of Hendon's magnanimous 
conduct grew to greater and still greater dimen- 
sicms in his mind, and so also did his gratefiil- 
ness for it Presently he said to himself, "Who 
saves his prince from wounds and possiblq death 



 



THE SACRIFICE. 139 

— and this he did for me — perfonns high Service; 
but it is little — it is nothing! — oh, less than 
nothing! — when 'tis weighed against the act of 
him who saves his prince from shame!" 

Hendon made no outcry under the scourge, 
but bore the heavy blows with soldierly fortitude. 
This, together with his redeeming the boy by 
taking his stripes for him, compelled the respect 
of even that forlom and degraded mob that was 
gathered there; and its gibes and hootings died 
away, and no sound remained but the sound of 
the falling blows. The stillness that pervaded 
the place, when Hendon found himself once more 
in the Stocks, was in strong contrast with the _j| 

insulting clamour which had prevailed there 
so little a while before. The King came softly f 

to Hendon's side, and whispered in his ear — 

** Kings cannot ennoble thee, thou good, great 
soul, for One who is higher than kings hath done 
that for thee; but a king can confirm thy nobility 
to men." He picked up the scourge from the 
ground, touched Hendon's bleeding Shoulders 
lightly with it, and whispered, "Edward of Eng- 
land dubs thee Earl!" 

Hendon was touched. The water welled to 
tis eyes, yet at the same time the grisly bumour 



m 



yGoOgI 



I 



;40 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

of the Situation and circumstances so undermmed 
his gravity that it was all he could do to keep 
some sign of his inward mirth from showing out- 
side. To be suddenly hoisted, naked and gory, 
from the common Stocks to the Alpine altitude 
and splendour of an Earldom, seemed to him the 
last possibility in the line of the grotesque. He 
Said to himself, "Now am I finely tinselled, in- 
deed! The spectre-knight of the Kingdom of 
Dreams and Shadows is become a spectre-earll 
— a dizzy flight for a callow wing! An' this go 
on, I shall presently be hung like a very may- 
pole with fantastic gauds and make-believe 
honours. But I shall value them, all valueless 
as they are, for the love that doth bestow them. 
Better these poor mock dignities of mine, that 
come unasked, from a clean hand and a right 
spirit, than real ones bought by servility from 
gnidging and interested power." 

The dreaded Sir Hugh wheeled his horse 
about, and as he spurred away, the living wall 
divided silently to let him pass, and as silently 
closed together again. And so remained; nobody 
went so far as to venture a remark in favour of 
the prisoner, or in compliment to him; but no 
matter, the absence of abuse was a sufficient 



 



THE SACRIFICE. T4I 

homage in itself. A late comer who was not 
posted as to the present circumstances, and who 
delivered a sneer at the "impostor," and was in 
the act of following it with a dead cat, was 
promptly knocked down and kicked out, without 
any words, and then the deep quiet resumed 
sway once more. 



db 



 



TO LONDON. 



db 



^S 



 



CHAPTER XXIX. 
TO LONDON. 

Wh£n Hendon's terra of Service in the Stocks 
was finished, he was released and ordered to quit 
the region and come back no more. His sword 
was restored to him, and also his mule and his 
donkey. He mounted and rode off, followed by 
the King, the crowd opening with quiet respectful- 
ness to let them pass, and then dispersing wheu 
they were gone. 

Hendon was soon absorbed in thought. There 
were questions of high import to be answered. 
What shonld he do? Whither should he go? 
Powerful help must be found, somewhere, or he 
must relinquish his inheritance and remain undcr 
the imputation of being an impostor besides. 
Where could he hope to find this powerful help? 
Where, indeed! It was a knotty question. By and 
by a thought occurred to him which pointed to a 
possibility — the slenderest of slender possibilities, 

The Prince and the Pauker. II. lO 



 



146 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

certainly, but still worth considering, for lack of 
any other that promised anything at all. He re- 
membered what old Andrews had said about the 
young King's goodness and bis generous champion- 
ship of the wronged and unfortunate. Why not 
go and try to get speech of him and beg for 
justice? Ah, yes, but could so fantastic a pauper 
get admission to the august presence of a 
monarch? Never mind — let that matter take care 
of itself; it was a bridge that would not need to 
be crossed tili he should come to it He was an 
old campaigner, and used to inventing shifts and 
expedients: no doubt he would be able to find a 
way. Yes, he would strike for the capital. Maybe 
his father's old friend Sir Humphrey Marlow 
would help him — "good old Sir Humphrey, Head 
Lieutenant of the late King's kitchen, or stables, 
or something" — Miles could not remember just 
what or which. Now that he had something to 
turn his energies to, a distinctly defined object to 
accomplish, the fog of humiliation and depression 
which had settled down upon his spirits lifted 
and blew away, and he raised his head and 
looked about him. He was surprised to see how 
far he had come; the village was away behind 
him. The King was jogging along in his wake, 



 



TO LONDON. 



147^ 



with his head bowed; for he, too, was deep in 
plans and thinkings. A sorrowful misgiving clouded 
Hendon's new-bom cheerfulness: would the boy be 
willing to go again to a city where, during all his 
brief life, he had never known anything but ill- 
usage and pinching "want? But the question must 
be asked; it could not be avoided; so Hendon 
reined up, and called out — 

"I had forgotten to inquire whither we arc 
bound. Thy commands, my liege!" 

«To London!" 

Hendon moved on again, mightily contented 
with the answer — but astounded at it, too. 

The whole joumey was made without an ad- 
venture of importance. But it ended with one, 
About ten o'clock on the night of the igth of 
February, they stepped upon London Bridge, in 
the midst of a writhing, struggling jam of howling 
and hurrahing people, whose beer-joUy faces stood 
out strongly in the glare from manifold torches^ 
and at that instant the decaying head of some 
former duke or other grandee tumbled down 
between them, striking Hendon on the elbow and 
then bounding off among the hurrying confusion of 
feet So evanescent and unstable are men's works, in 
this world! — the late good King is but three weeks 



db 



Ä 



148 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

dead and three days in his grave, and already 
the adornments which he took such pains to select 
from prominent people for his noble bridge are 
falling. A Citizen stumbled over that head, and 
drove his own head into the back of somebody in 
front of him, who turaed and knocked down the 
first person that came handy, and was promptly 
laid out himself by that person's friend. It was 
the right ripe time for a free fight, for the festi- 
vities of the morrow — Coronation Day — were 
already beginning; everybody was füll of strong 
drink and patriotism; within five minutes the free 
fight was occupying a good deal of ground; within 
ten or twelve it covered an acre or so, and was 
become a riot. By this time Hendon and the 
King were hopelessly separated from each other 
and lost in the rush and turmoil of the roaring 
masses of humanity. And so we leave them. 



 



TOM'S PROGRESS. 



 



 



CHAPTER XXX. 
tom's PROGRESS. 

Whelst the tnie King wandered about the 
land poorly clad, poorly fed, cuffed and derided 
by tramps one while, herding with thieves and 
murderers in a jail another, and called idiot and 
impostor by all impartially, the mock King Tom 
Canty enjoyed quite a diflferent experience, 

When we saw him last, royalty was just be- 
ginning to have a bright side for him. This bright 
side went on brightening more and more every 
day: in a very little while it was become almost 
all sunshine and delightfulness. He lost his fears; 
his misgivings faded out and died; his embarrass- 
ments departed, and gave place to an easy and 
confident bearing. He worked the whipping-boy 
mine to ever-increasing profit. 

He ordered my Lady Elizabeth and my Lady 
Jane Grey into his presence when he wanted to 
play or talk, and dismissed them when he was 



 



152 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

done with them, with the air of one familiarly 
accustomed to such Performances. It no longer 
confused him to have these lofty personages kiss 
his hand at parting. 

He came to enjoy being conducted to bed in 
State at night, and dressed with intricate and so- 
lemn ceremony in the moming. It came to be a 
proud pleasure to march to dinner attended by a 
glittering procession of officers of State and gen- 
tlemen-at-arms; insomuch, indeed, that he doubled 
his guard of gentlemen-at-arms, and made them 
a hundred. He liked to hear the bugles sound- 
ing down the long corridors, and the distant 
voices responding, "Way for the KLing!" 

He even leamed to enjoy sitting in throned 
State in Council, and seeming to be something 
more than the Lord Protector's mouthpiece. He 
liked to receive great ambassadors and their 
gorgeous trains, and listen to the affectionate 
messages they brought from illustrious monarchs 
who called him "brother." O happy Tom Canty, 
late of Offal Court! 

He enjoyed his splendid clothes, and ordered 
more: he found his four hundred servants too 
few for his proper grandeur, and trebled them, 
The adulation of salaaming courtiers came to be 



 



tom's progress. 153 . 

sweet music to his ears. He remained kind and 
gentle, and a sturdy and determined Champion 
of all that were oppressed, and he made tireless 
war upon unjust laws; yet upon occasion, being 
offended, he could turn upon an earl, or even a 
duke, and give him a look that would make him 
tremble. Once, when his royal "sister," the 
grimly holy Lady Mary, set herseif to reason with 
him against the wisdom of his course in pardon- 
ing so many people who would otherwise be 
jailed, or hanged, or bumed, and reminded him 
that their august late father's prisons had some- 
times contained as high as sixty thousand con- 
victs at one time, and that during his admirable 
reign he had delivered seventy-two thousand 
thieves and robbers over to death by the execu- 
tioner * the boy was fiUed with generous indigna- 
tion, and commanded her to go to her doset, and 
beseech God to take away the stone that was in 
her breast, and give her a human heart. 

Did Tom Canty never feel troubled about the 
poor little rightful prince who had treated him so 
kindly, and flown out with such hot zeal to avenge 
him üpon the insolent sentinel at the palace-gate? 

♦ Hume's England. 

 IC 



154 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

Yes; his first royal days and nights were pretty 
well sprinkled with painful thoughts about the 
lost prince, and with sincere longings for his re- 
turn, and happy restoration to his native rights 
and splendours. But as time wore on, and the 
prince did not come, Tom's mind became more 
and more occupied with his new and enchanting 
experiences, and by little and little the vanished 
monarch faded almost out of his thoughts; and 
finally, when he did intnide upon them at inter- 
vals, he was become an unwelcome spectre, for 
he made Tom feel guilty and ashamed. 

Tom's poor mother and sisters travelled the 
same road out of his mind. At first he pined for 
them, sorrowed for them, longed to see them, but 
later, the thought of their Coming some day in 
their rags and dirt, and betraying him with their 
kisses, and pulling him down from his lofty place, 
and dragging him back to penury and degrada- 
tion and the slums, made him shudder, At last 
they ceased to trouble his thoughts almost whoUy. 
And he was content, even glad: for, whenever 
their moumful and accusing faces did rise before 
him now, they made him feel more despicable 
than the worms that crawl. 

At midnight of the igth of February, Tom 



 



tom's progress. 155 

Canty was sinking to sleep in his rieh bed' in the 
palace, guarded by his loyal vassals, and sur- 
rounded by the pomps of royalty, a happy boy; 
for to-morrow was the day appointed for his so- 
lemn crowning asKing of England. At that same 
hour, Edward, the tnie king, hungry and thirsty, 
soiled and draggled, wom with travel, and clothed 
in rags and shreds, — his share of the results of 
the not, — was wedged in among a crowd of 
people who were watching with deep interest 
certain hunying gangs of workmen who streamed 
in and out of Westminster Abbey, busy as ants: 
they were making the last preparation for the 
royal coronation. 



 



 



THE RECOGNITION PROCESSION. 



 



 



CHAPTER XXXI. 
THE RECOGNITION PROCESSION. 

When Tom Canty awoke the next morning, 
the air was heavy with a thunderous murmur: 
all the distances were charged with it It was 
music to him; for it meant that the English 
World was out in its strength to give loyal wel- 
come to the great day. 

Presently Tom found himself once more the 
Chief figure in a wonderful floating pageant on 
the Thames; for by ancient custom the "recogni- 
tion procession" through London must Start from 
the Tower, and he was bound thither. 

When he arrived there, the sides of the 
venerable fortress seemed suddenly rent in a 
thousand places, and from every rent leaped a red 
tongue of flame and a white gush of smoke; a 
deafening explosion foUowed, which drowned the 
shoutings of the multitude, and made the ground 
tremble; the flame-jets, the smoke, and the ex- 



 



l6o THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

plosions, were repeated over and over again with 
marvellous celerity, so that in a few moments the 
old Tower disappeared in the vast fog of its own 
smoke, all but the very top of the tall pile called 
the White Tower; this, with its banners, stood 
out above the dense bank of vapour as a moun- 
tain-peak projects above a doud-rack. 

Tom Canty, splendidly arrayed, mounted a 
prancing war-steed, whose rieh trappings almost 
reached to the ground; his "uncle," the Lord 
Protector Somerset, similarly mounted, took place 
in his rear; the King's Guard formed in single 
ranks on either side, clad in burnished armour; 
after the Protector followed a seemingly in- 
terminable procession of resplendent nobles at- 
tended by their vassals; after these came the 
lord mayor and the aldermanic body, in crimson 
velvet robes, and with their gold chains across 
their breasts; and after these the officers and 
members of all the guilds of London, in rieh 
raiment, and bearing the showy banners of the 
several corporations. Also in the procession, as 
a special guard of honour through the city, was 
the Ancient and Hpnourable Artillery Company 
— an Organisation already three hundred years 
old at that time, and the only military body in 



 



THE RECOGNITION PROCESSION. l6l 

England possessing the privilege (which it stili 
possesses in cur day) of holding itself independent 
of the commands of Parliament. It was a bril- 
liant spectacle, and was hailed with acclamations 
all along the line, as it took its stately way 
through the packed multitudes of Citizens. The 
chronicler says, "The King, as he entered the 
city, was received by the people with prayers, 
welcomings, cries, and tender words, and all 
signs which argue an earnest love of subjects to- 
ward their sovereign; and the King, by holding 
up his glad countenance to such as stood afar 
off, and most tender language to those that stood 
nigh his Grace, showed himself no less thankful 
to receive the people's goodwill than they to 
offer it. To all that wished him well, he gave 
thanks. To such as bade *God save his Grace,' 
he Said in return, 'God save you all!' and added 
that *he thanked them with all his heart/ 
WonderfuUy transported were the people with 
the loving answers and gestures of their King." 

In Fenchurch Street a "fair child, in costly 
apparel," stood on a stage to welcome his Majesty 
to the city. The last verse of his greeting was 
in these words: — 

The Prmce and ihe Pauper. IL II 



 



102 THE PRINCE AND IHE PAUPER. 

<< Welcome, O King! as much as hearts can think; 

Welcome, again, as much as tongue can teil, — 
Welcome to joyous tongues, and hearts that will not shrink: 

God thee preserve, we pray, and wish thee ever well." 

The people burst forth in a glad shout, le- 
peating with one voice what the child had said. 
Tom Canty gazed abroad over the surging sea 
of eager faces, and his heart swelled with exulta- 
tion; and he feit that the one thing worth living 
for in this world was to be a king, and a nation's 
idol. Presently he caught sight, at a distance, 
of a couple of his ragged Offal Court comrades, 
— one of them the lord high admiral in his late 
mimic court, the other the first lord of the bed- 
chamber in the same pretentious fiction; and his 
pride swelled higher than ever. Oh, if they 
could only recognise him now! What unspeak- 
able glory it would be, if they could recognise 
him, and realise that the derided mock king of 
the slums and back alleys was become a real 
King, with illustrious dukes and princes for his 
humble menials, and the English world at his 
feet! But he had to deny himself, and choke 
down his desire, for such a recognition might 
cost more than it would come to: so he tumed 
away his head, and left the two soiled lads to 



Digitized by 



Google 



THE RECOGNiriON PROCESSION. 163 

go on with their shoutings and glad adulations, 
unsuspicious of whom it was they were lavishing 
them upon. 

Every now and then rose the cry, **A largess! 
a largess!" and Tom responded by scattering a 
handful of bright, new coins abroad for the 
naultitude to scramble for. 

The chronicler says, "At the upper end of 
Gracechurch Street, before the sign of the Eagle, 
the city had erected a gorgeous arch, beneath 
which was a stage, which stretched from one side 
of the Street to the other. This was an historical 
pageant, representing the King's immediate pro- 
genitors. There sat Elizabeth of York in the 
midst of an immense white rose, whose petals 
formed elaborate furbelows around her; by her 
side was Henry VII., issuing out of a vast red 
rose, disposed in the same manner: the hands of 
the royal pair were locked together, and the 
wedding-ring ostentatiously displayed. From the 
red and white roses proceeded a stem, which 
reached up to a second stage, occupied by 
Henry VIII., issuing from a red-and-white rose, 
with the effigy of the new King's mother, Jane 
Seymour, represented by his side. One branch 
sprang from this pair, which mounted to a third 



 



164 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

stage, where sat the effigy of Edward VI. him- 
self, enthroned in royal majesty; and the whole 
pageant was framed with wreaths of roses, red 
and white." 

This quaint and gaudy spectacle so wrought 
upon the rejoicing people, that their acdamations 
utterly smothered the small voice of the child 
whose business it was to explain the thing in 
eulogistic rhymes. But Tom Canty was not sorry; 
for this loyal uproar was sweeter music to him 
than any poetry, no matter what its quality might 
be. Whithersoever Tom turned his happy young 
face, the people recognised the exactness of his 
effigy's likeness to himself, the flesh and blood 
counterpart; and new whirlwinds of applause 
burst forth. 

The great pageant moved on, and still on, 
under one triumphal arch after another, and past 
a bewildering succession of spectacular and sym- 
bolical tableaux, each of which typified and ex- 
alted some virtue, or talent, or merit, of the little 
King's. "Throughout the whole of Cheapside, 
from every penthouse and window, hung banners 
and streamers; and the riebest carpets, stuffs, and 
cloth-of-gold tapestried the streets, — specimens 
of the great wealth of the Stores within; and the 

 IC 



THE RECOGNITION PROCESSION. 165 

splendour of this thoroughfare was equalled in 
the other streets, and in some even surpassed" 

"And all these wonders and these marvels 
are to welcome me — me ! " murmured Tom Canty. 

The mock King's cheeks were flushed with 
exdtement, his eyes were flashing, bis senses 
swam in a -delirium of pleasure. At this point, 
just as he was raising his hand to fling another 
rieh largess, he caught sight of a pale, astounded 
face, which was strained forward out of the 
second rank of the crowd, its intense eyes riveted 
upon him. A sickening consteraation Struck 
through him; he recognised his mother! and up 
fiew his hand, palm outward before his eyes, — 
that old involimtary gesture, bom of a forgotten 
episode, and perpetuated by habit. In an in- 
stant more she had torn her way out of the press, 
and past the guards, and was at his side. She 
embraced his leg, she covered it with kisses, she 
cried, "O my child, my darlingl" lifting toward 
him a face that was transfigured with joy and 
love. The same instant an officer of the King's 
Guard snatched her away with a cursie, and sent 
her reeling back whence she came with a 
vigorous impulse from his strong arm, The words 
**I do not know yoif, woman!" were falling from 



 



l66 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

Tom Canty's lips when this piteous thing oc- 
curred; but it smote him to the heaxt to see her 
trcated so; and as she tumed for a last glimpse 
of him, whilst the crowd was swallowing her from 
his sight, she seemed so wounded, so broken- 
hearted, that a shame feil upon him which con- 
sumed his pride to ashes, and withered his stolen 
royalty. His grandeurs were stricken valueless: 
they seemed to fall away from him like rotten 
rags. 

The procession moved on, and still on, through 
ever augmenting splendours and ever augmenting 
tempests of welcome; but to Tom Canty they 
were as if they had not been. He neither saw 
nor heard. Royalty had lost its grace and sweet- 
ness; its pomps were become a reproach. Re- 
morse was eating his heart out He said, "Would 
God I were free of my captivity!" 

He had unconsciously dropped back into the 
phraseology of the first days of his compulsory 
greatness. 

The shining pageant still went winding like a 
radiant and interminable serpent down the crooked 
lanes of the quaint old city, and through the huzza- 
ing hosts; but still the Kin§ rode with bowed 



 



THE RECOGNTnON PROCESSIQN. 167 

head and vacant eyes, seeing only his mother's 
face and that wounded look in it 

"Largess, largess!" The cry feil upon an iin- 
heeding ear. 

"Long live Edward of England!'' It seemed 
as if the earth shook with the explosion; but there 
was no response from the King. He heard it 
only as one hears the thunder of the surf when 
it is blown to the ear out of a great distance, fof 
it was smothered under another sound which was 
still nearer, in his own breast, in his accusing 
conscience, — a voice which kept repeating those 
shameful words, "I do not know you, woman!" 

The words smote upon the King's soul as the 
strokes of a funeral bell smite upon the soul of a 
surviving friend when they remind him of secret 
treacheries suffered at his hands by him that 
is gone. 

New glories were unfolded at eveiy tuming; 
new wonders, new marvels, sprung into view; the 
pent clamours of waiting batteries were released; 
new raptures poured from the throats of the 
waiting multitudes: but the King gave no sign, 
and the accusing voice that went moaning through 
his comfortless breast was all the sound he 
heard. 



 



l68 THE FRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

By and by the gladness in the faces of the 
populace changed a little, and became touched 
with a something like solicitude or anxiety: an 
abatement in the yolume of the applause was ob- 
servable too. The Lord Protector was quick to 
notice these things: he was as quick to detect 
the cause. He spurred to the King's side, bent 
low in his saddle, uncovered, and said — 

"My liege, it is an ill time for dreaming. The 
people observe thy downcast head, thy douded 
mien, and they take it for an omen. Be advised: 
unveil the sun of royalty, and let it shine upon 
these boding vapours, and disperse them. Lift 
up thy face, and smile upon the people." 

So saying, the Duke scattered a handful of 
coins to right and left, then retired to his place. 
The mock King did mechanically as he had been 
bidden. His smile had no heart in it, but few 
eyes were near enough or sharp enough to detect 
that The noddings of his plumed head as he 
saluted his subjects were füll of grace and gracious- 
ness; the largess which he delivered from his 
band was royally liberal; so the people's anxiety 
vanished, and the acclamations burst forth again 
in as mighty a volume as before. 

Still once more, a little before the prpgress 



 



THE RECOGNITION PROCESSION. 169 

was ended, the Duke was obliged to ride forward, 
and make remonstrance. He whispered — 

"O dread sovereign! shake off these fatal 
humours; the eyes of the world are upon thee." 
Then he added with sharp annoyance, "Perdition 
catch that crazy pauper! 'twas she that hath 
disturbed your Highness." 

The gorgeous figure tumed a lustreless eye 
upon the Duke, and said in a dead voice — 

"She was my mother!" 

"My God!" groaned the Protector as he reined 
his horse backward to his post, "the omen was 
pregnant with prophecy. He is gone mad againl" 



 



 



CORONATION D AY. 



 



 



CHAPTER XXXII. 
CORONATION DAY. 

Let US go backward a few hours, and place 
ourselves in Westminster Abbey, at four o'clock 
in the morning of this memorable Coronation 
Day. We are not without Company; for although 
it is still night, we find the torch-lighted galleries 
already filling up with people who are well con- 
tent to sit still and wait seven or eight hours tili 
the time shall come for them to see what they 
may not hope to see twice in their lives — the 
coronation of a King. Yes, London and West- 
minster have been astir ever since the warning 
guns boomed at three o'clock, and already crowds 
of untitled rieh folk who have bought the privi- 
lege of trying to find sitting-room in the galleries 
are flocking in at the entrances reserved for their 
sort. 

The hours drag along tediously enough. All 
stir has ceased for some time, for every gallery 
has long ago been packed. We may sit, now, 

 IC 



174 '™^ PRINCE ANO THE PAUPER. 

and look and think at our leisure. We have 
glimpses, here and there and yonder, through the 
dim cathedral twilight, of portions of many gal- 
leries and balconies, wedged fuU with people, 
the other portions of these galleries and balconies 
being cut ofF fix)m sight by intervening pillars 
and architectural projections. We have in view 
the whole of the great north transept — empty, 
and waiting for England's privileged ones. We 
See also the ample area or platform, carpeted 
with rieh stuffs, whereon the throne Stands. The 
throne occupies the centre of the platform, and 
is raised above it upon an elevation of foilr Steps. 
Within the seat of the throne is enclosed a rough 
flat rock — the stone of Scone — which many gene- 
rations of Scottish kings sat on to be crowned, 
and so it in time became holy enough to answer 
a like purpose for English monarchs. Both the 
throne and its footstool are covered with cloth of 
gold. 

Stillness reigns, the torches blink diüly, the 
time drags heavily. But at last the lagging day- 
light asserts itself, the torches are extinguished, 
and a mellow radiance suffuses the great spaces. 
All features of the noble building are distinct 
now, but soft and dreamy, for the sim is lightly 
veiled with clouds. 

 IC 



CORONATION DAY. 1 7 5 

At seven o'clock the first break in the drowsy 
monotony occurs; for on the stroke of this hour 
the first peeress enters the transept, clothed like 
Solomon for splendour, and is conducted to her 
appointed place by an official clad in satins and 
velvets, whilst a duplicate of him gathers up the 
lady's long train, follows after, and, when the lady 
is seated, arranges the train across her lap for 
her. He then places her footstool according to 
her desire, after which he puts her Coronet where 
it will be convenient to her hand when the time 
for the simultaneous coroneting of the nobles 
shall arrive. 

By this time the peeresses are flowing in in a 
glittering stream, and the satin-clad officials are 
flitting and glinting everywhere, seating them and 
making them comfortable. The scene is animated 
enough now. There is stir and life, and shifting 
colour everywhere. After a time, quiet reigns 
again; for the peeresses are all come, and axe all 
in their places, a solid acre, or such a matter, of 
human flowers, resplendent in variegated colours, 
and frosted like a Milky Way with diamonds. 
There are all ages here: brown, wrinkled, white- 
haired dowagers who are able to go back, and 
still back, down the stream of time, and recall 
the crowning of Richard III. and the troublous 

Digifized by VjOOQ IC 



l 76 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

days of that old forgotten age; and there are 
handsome middle-aged dames; and lovely and 
gracious young matrons; and gentle and beautiful 
young girls, with beaming eyes and fresh com- 
plexionSy who may possibly put on their jewelled 
coronets awkwardly when the great time comes; 
for the matter will be new to them, and their ex- 
citement will be a sore hindrance. Still, this 
may not happen, for the hair of all these ladies 
has been arranged with a special view to the 
Swift and successful lodging of the crown in its 
place when the signal comes. 

We have seen that this massed array of 
peeresses is sown thick with diamonds, and we 
also see that it is a marvellous spectade — but 
now we are about to be astonished in earaest. 
About nine, the clouds suddenly break away and 
a shaft of sunshine cleaves the mellow at- 
mosphere, and drifts slowly along the ranks of 
ladies; and every rank it touches flames into a 
dazzling splendour of many-coloured fires, and 
we tingle to our finger-tips with the electric thrill 
that is shot through us by the surprise and the 
beauty of the spectaclel Presently a special envoy 
from some distant corner of the Orient, mardimg 
with the general body of foreign ambassadors, 
crosses this bar of sunshine, and we catch our 

 IC 



CORONATION DAY. 1-77 

breath, the glory that streams and flashes and 
palpitates about him is so overpowering; for he 
is cnisted from head to heel with gems, and his 
slightest movement showers a dancing radiance 
all around him. 

Let US change the tense for convenience. The 
time drifted along, — one hour — two hours — two 
hours and a half; then the deep booming of 
artillery told that the King and his grand pro- 
cession had arrived at last; so the waiting multi- 
tude rejoiced. All knew that a further delay 
must follow, for the King must be prepared and 
robed for the solemn ceremony; but this delay 
would be pleasantly occupied by the assembling 
of the peers of the realm in their stately robes. 
These were conducted ceremoniously tö their 
seats and their coronets placed conveniently at 
hand; and meanwhile the multitude in the gal- 
leries were alive with interest, for most of them 
were beholding for the first time, dukes, earls, 
and barons, whose names had been historical for 
five hundred years. When all were finally seated, 
the spectacle from the galleries and all coigns of 
vantage was complete; a gorgeous one to look 
upon and to remember. 

Now the robed^ and mitred great heads of the 

Thi Princi and the Pauper. If. 12 

 IC 



178 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

church, and their attendants, filed in upon the 
platform and took their appointed places; these 
were followed by the Lord Protector and otlier 
great officials, and these again by a steel-clad 
detachment of the Guard. 

There was a waiting pause; then, at a Signal, 
a triumphant peal of music burst forth, and Tom 
Canty, dothed in a long robe of cloth of gold, 
appeared at a door, and stepped upon the plat- 
form. The entire multitude rose, and the cere- 
mony of the Recognition ensued. 

Then a noble anthem swept the Abbey with 
its rieh waves of sound; and thus heralded and 
welcomed, Tom Canty was conducted to the 
throne. The ancient ceremonies went on, with 
impressive solemnity, whilst the audience gazed; 
and as they drew nearer and nearer to com- 
pletion, Tom Canty grew pale, and still paler, 
and a deep and steadily deepening woe and 
despondency settled down upon his spirits and 
upon his remorseful heart, 

At last the final act was at hand. The 
Archbishop of Canterbury lifted up the crown of 
England from its cushion and held it out over 
the trembling mock-king's head. In the same 
instant a rainbow-radiance flashed along the 
spacious transept; for with one impulse eveiy in- 

 IC 



CORONATlON DAY. • I79 

dividual in the great concourse of nobles lifted 
a Coronet and poised it over his or her head, — 
and paused in that attitude. 

A deep hush pervaded the'Abbey. At this 
impressive moment, a startling apparition in- 
truded upon the scene — an apparition pbserved 
by none in the absorbed multitude, until it 
suddenly appeared, moving up the great central 
aisle. It was a boy, bare-headed, ill shod, and 
clothed in coarse plebeian garments that were 
falKng to rags. He raised his hand with a 
solemnity whidi ill comported with his soiled 
and sorry aspect, and delivered this note of 
waming — 

"I forbid you to set the crown of England 
upon that forfeited head. / am the King!" 

In an instant several indignant hands were 
laid upon the boy; but in the same instant Tom 
Canty, in his regal vestments, mad? a swift step 
forward, and cried out in a ringing voice — ► 

"Loose him and forbear! He ü the King!" 

A sort of panic of astonishment swept the 
assemblage, and they partly rose in their pläces 
änd stared in a bewil4ered way at one another 
and at the chief figures in this scene,. like persons 
who wondered whether they were awake and in 
t)ieir sensesi pr asleep and dreaming. The Lord 

12 ♦ 

 IC 



t8ö OHE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

Protector was as amazed as the rest, but quickly 
recovered himself, and exclaimed in a voice of 
authority — 

''Mind not bis Majesty, bis malady is upon 
bim again — seize the vagabond!" 

He would bave been obeyed, but the mock- 
King stamped bis foot and cried out — 

•'On your peril! Touch bim not, he is the 
King!" 

The hands were withheld; a paralysis feil 
upon the house; no one moved, no one spoke; 
indeed, no one knew bow to act or what to say, 
in so Strange and surprising an emergency. 
While all minds were struggling to right them- 
selves, the boy still moved steadily forward, with 
high port and coniident mien; he bad never 
halted from the beginning; and while the tangled 
minds still floundered helplessly, he stepped 
upon the platform, and the mock-King ran with 
a glad face to meet him; and feil on bis knees 
before bim and said — 

"Ob, my lord the King, let poor Tom Canty 
be first to swear fealty to thee, and say, 'Put on 
thy crown and enter into thine own again!'" 

The Lord Protector's eye feil stemly upon the 
iiew-comer*s face; but straightway the stemness 
vanished away, and gave place to an expression 

 IC 



CORONATION DAY. l8l 

of wondering surprise. This thing happened 
also to the other great officers. They glanced 
at each other, and retreated a step by a common 
and unconscious Impulse. The thought in each 
mind was the same; "What a stränge resem- 
blancel" 

The Lord Protector reflected a moment or 
two in perplexity, then he said, with grave re- 
spectfulness — 

"By your favour, sir, I desire to ask certain 
questions which " 

"I will answer them, my lord." 

The Duke asked him many questions about 
the Court, the late King, the prince, thp princesses, 
— the boy answered them correctly and without 
hesitating. He described the rooms of State in 
the palace, the late King's apartments, and those 
of the Prince of Wales. 

It was Strange; it was wonderful; yes, it was 
unaccountable — so all said that heard it The 
tide was beginning to tum, and Tom Cant/s 
hopes to run high, when the Lord Protector 
shook his head and said — 

"It is true it is most wonderful — but it is no 
more than our lord the King likewise can do." 
This remark, and this reference to himself as 
still the King, saddened Tom Canty, and he feit 

 IC 



i82 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER, 

his hopes crumbling from under him. "These 
are not proofs" added the Protector. 

The tide was turning very fast now, very fast 
indeed — but in the wrong direction; it was leav- 
ing poor Tom Canty stranded on the throne, and 
sweeping the other out to sea. The Lord Pro- 
tector communed with himself — shook his head 
— the thought forced itself upon him, "It is 
perilous to the State and to us all, to entertain 
so fateful a riddle as this; it could divide the 
nation and nndermine the throne." He tumed 
and said — 

«Sir Thomas, arrest this— No, hold!" His 
face lighted, and he confronted the ragged can- 
didate with this question — 

"Where lieth the Great Seal? Answer me 
this truly, and the riddle is unriddled; for only 
he that was Prince of Wales can so answer! On 
so trivial a thing hang a throne and a dynasty!" 

It was a lucky thought, a happy thought 
That it was so considered by the great officials 
was manifested by the silent applause that shot 
from eye to eye around their circle in the form 
of bright approving glances. Yes, none but the 
true prince could dissolve the stubbom mystery 
of the vanished Great Seal — this forlom little 
impostor had been taught his lesson well, but 

 IC 



CORONATION DAY. jS^ 

here his teachings must fall, for his teacher him- 
self could not answer /Äa/ question — ah, very 
goody very good indeed; now we shall be rid of 
this troublesome and perilous business in short 
Order 1 And so they nodded invisibly and smiled 
inwardly with satisfaction, and looked to see this 
foolish lad stricken with a palsy of guilty con- 
fusion. How surprised they were, then, to see 
nothing of the sort happen — how they marvelled 
to hear him answer up promptly, in a confident 
and untroubled voice, and say — 

"There is nought in this riddle that is 
difficult." Then, without so much as a by-your- 
leave to anybody, he turned and gave this com- 
mand, with the easy manner of one accustomed 
to doing such things: "My Lord St. John, go you 
to my private cabinet in the palace — for none 
knoweth the place better than you — and, close 
down to the floor, in the left corner remotest 
from the door that opens from the ante-chamber, 
you shall find in the wall a brazen nail-head; 
press upon it and a little jewel-closet will fly 
open which not even you do know of — no, nor 
any soul eise, in all the world but me and the 
trusty artisan that did contrive it for me. The 
first thing that falleth under your eye will be the 
Great Seal— fetch it bither." 

 IC 



184 THE PRlNCE ANÖ THE PAUPER. 

All the Company wondered at this speech, 
and wondered still more to see the little mendi- 
cant pick out this peer without hesitancy er ap- 
parent fear of mistake, and call him by name 
with such a placidly convincing air of having 
known him all his life. The peer was almost 
surprised into obeying. He even made a move- 
ment as if to go, but quickly recovered his 
tranquil attitude and confessed his blunder with 
a blush. Tom Canty turned upon him and said, 
sharply — 

"Why dost thou hesitate? Hast not heard the 
King's command? Go!" 

The Lord St. John made a deep obeisance— 
and it was observed that it was a significantly 
cautious and non-committal one, it not being 
delivered at either of the kings, but at the 
neutral ground about half way between the two 
— and took his leave. 

Now began a movement of the gorgeous 
particles of that official group which was slow, 
scarcely perceptible, and yet steady and persistent 
— a movement such as is observed in a kaleido- 
scope that is turned slowly, whereby the com- 
ponents of one splendid Cluster fall away and 
join themselves to another — a movement which, 
little by little, in the present case, dissolved the 

 IC 



CORONATION DAY. 185 

glittering crowd that stood about Tom Canty and 
clustered it together again in.the neighbourhood 
of the new-comer. Tom Canty stood almost alone. 
Now ensued a brief season of deep suspense and 
waiting— during which even the few faint-hearts 
still remaining near Tom Canty gradually scraped 
together courage enough to glide, one by one, 
over to the majority. So at last Tom Canty, in 
his royal robes and jewels, stood whoUy alone 
and isolated from the world, a conspicuous figure, 
occupying an eloquent vacancy. 

Now the Lord St. John was seen returning. 
As he advanced up the mid-aisle the interest was 
so intense that the low murmur of conversation 
in the great assemblage died out and was suc- 
ceeded by a profound hush, a breathless stilhiess, 
through which his footfalls pulsed with a' duU 
and distant sound. Every eye was fastened upon 
him as he moved along. He reached the plat- 
form, paused a moment, then moved toward Tom 
Canty with a deep obeisance, and said — 

"Sire, the Seal is not there!" 

A mob does not meh away from the presence 
of a plague-patient with more haste than the 
band of pallid and terrified courtiers melted away 
from the presence of the shabby little claimant 
.of the Crown. In a moment he stood all alone,, 

 IC 



l86 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

without friend or supporter, a target upon wliich 
was concentrated a bitter fire of scomful and 
angry looks. The Lord Protector called out 
fiercely — 

♦*Cast the beggar into the street, and scourge 
him through the town — the paltry knave is worth 
no more consideration!" 

Officers of the guard sprang forward to obey, 
but Tom Canty waved them off and said — 

"Back! Whoso touches him perils his life!" 

The Lord Protector was perplexed in the last 
degree. He said to the Lord St. John — 

"Searched you well? — but it boots not to ask 
that It doth seem passing stränge. Little thiügs, 
trifles, slip out of one's ken, and one does not 
think it matter for surprise; but how so bulky a 
thing as the Seal of England can vanish away 
and no man be able to get track of it again-^a 
massy golden disk " 

Tom Canty, with beaming eyes, sprang forward 
and shouted — 

"Hold, that is enoughl Was it round? — and 
thick? — and had it lejters and devices giraved 
upon it? — Yes? Oh, n&w I know what this Great 
Seal is that there's been such worry and pother 
about. An' ye had described it to me, ye could 
Jiave had it tbree weeks ago. Right well I Jcnow 

 IC 



CORONATION DAY. 1 87 

where it lies; but it was not 1 that put it there — 
first." 

"Who, then, my liege?" asked the Lord Pro- 
tector. 

"He that Stands there — the rightful King of 
England. And he shall teil you himself where 
it lies — then you will believe he knew it of his 
own knowledge. Bethink thee, my King — spur 
thy memory — it was the last, the very last thing 
thou didst that day before thou didst rush forth 
from the palace, clothed in my rags, to punish 
the soldier that insulted me." 

A silence ensued, undisturbed by a movement 
er a whisper, and all eyes were fixed upon the 
new-comer, who stood, with bent head and cor- 
rugated brow, groping in his memory among a 
thronging multitude of valueless recollections for 
one Single little elusive fact, which, found, would 
seat him upon a throne — unfound, would leave 
him as he was, for good and all — a pauper and 
an outcast Moment after moment passed — the 
moments built themselves ilito minutes — still the 
boy struggled silently pn, and gave no sign. But 
at last he heaved a sigh, shook his head slowly, 
and said, with a trembling lip and in a despon- 
dent voice — 

*'I call the scene back — all of it — but the 

 IC 



l88 TH£ PRINC£ AND TttE PAÜP£R« 

Seal hath no place in it" He paused, then looked 
up, and Said with gentle dignity, "My lords and 
gentlemen, if ye will rob your rightful sovereign 
of his own for lack of this evidence which he is 
not able to fiimish, I may not stay ye, being 
powerless. But " 

"Oh, foUy, oh, madness, my King!" aied 
Tom Canty, in a panic, "wait! — think! Do not 
give up! — the cause is not lostl Nor shall be, 
neitherl List to what I say — foUow every word— 
I am going to bring that moming back again, 
every hap just as it happened. We talked— I 
told you of my sisters, Nan and Bet — ah, yes, 
you remember that; and about mine old grandam 
— and the rough games of the lads of Offal Court 
— yes, you remember these things also; very well, 
foUow me still, you' shall recall everything. You 
gave me food and drink, and did with princely 
courtesy send away the servants, so that my low 
breeding might not shame me before them — ah, 
yes, this also you remember." 

As Tom checked off his details, and the other 
boy nodded his head in recognition of them, the 
great audience and the officials stared in puzzled 
wonderment; the tale sounded like true history, 
yet how could this impossible conjunction between 
a prince and a beggar-boy have come about? 

 IC 



CORONATION DAY. tSg 

Never was a Company of people so perplexed, so 
interested, and so stupefied, before. 

**For a jest, my prince, we-did exchange 
garments, Then we stood before a mirror; and 
so alike were we that both said it seemed as if 
there had been no change made — yes, you re- 
member that. Then you noticed that the soldier 
had hurt my hand — look! here it is, I cannot yet 
even write with it, the fingers are so stifF. At 
this your Highness sprang up, vowing vengeance 
upon that soldier, and ran towards the door — 
you passed a table — that thing you call the Seal 
lay on that table — you snatched it up and looked 
eagerly about, as if for a place to hide it — your 
eye caught sight of " 

"There, 'tis sufficient! — and the good God 
be thanked!" exclaimed the ragged claimant, in 
a mighty excitement. "Go, my good St. John, — 
in an arm-piece of the Milanese armour that 
hangs on the wall, thou'lt find the Seal!" 

"Right, my King! right!" cried Tom Canty; 
**now the sceptre of England is thine own; and 
it were better for him that would dispute it that 
he had been bom dumb! Go, my Lord St. John, 
give thy feet wings!" 

The whole assemblage was on its feet now, 
and well-nigh out of its mind with uneasiness, 

 IC 



19Q THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

apprehenslon, and consuming excitement On 
the floor and on the platform a deafening buzz of 
frantic conversation burst forth, and.for some 
time nobody knew anything or heard anything 
or was interested in anything but what his neigh- 
bour was shouting into his ear, or he was shout- 
ing into his neighhour's ear. Time — ^nobody 
knew how much of it — swept by unheeded and 
unnoted. At last a sudden hush feil upon the 
house, and in the same moment St John ap- 
peared upon the platfonn, and held the Great 
Seal alofl in his hand. Then such a shout went 
up — 

"Long live the true King!" 

For five minutes the air quaked with shouts 
and the crash of musical instruments, and was 
white with a storm of waving handkerchiefs; and 
through it all a ragged lad, the most conspicuous 
figure in England, stood, flushed and happy and 
proud, in the centre of the spacious platform, 
with the great vassals of the kingdom kneeling 
around him. 

Then all rose, and Tom Canty cried out— 

"Now, O my King, ta.ke these regal garments 
back, and give poor Tom, thy.servant, his shreds 
and remnants again." 

The Lord Protector spöke up— ... 

 IC 



CORONATION DAY. igt 

"Let the small varlet be stripped and flung 
into the Tower." 

But the new King, the true King, said — 

"I will not have it so. But for him I had 
not got my crown again — none shall lay a hand 
upon him to härm him. And as for thee, my 
good unde, my Lord Protector, this conduct of 
thine is not grateful toward this poor lad, for I 
hear he hath made thee a duke" — the Protector 
blushed — "yet he was not a King; wherefore, 
what is thy fine title worth now? To-morrow you 
shall sue to me, ihrough him, for its confurma- 
tion, eise no duke, but a simple earl, shalt thou 
remain." 

Under this rebuke, his grace the Duke of 
Somerset retired a little from the front for the 
moment. The King turned to Tom, and said 
kindly — "My poor boy, how was it that you 
could remember where I hid the Seal when I 
could not remember it myself?" 

**Ah, my King, that was easy, since I used it 
divers days." 

"Used it, — yet could not explain where it 
was?". 

"I dld not know it was that they wanted. 
They did not describe it, your Majesty." 

"Then how used you it?" 

 IC 



igZ THE PRINCE AND THE PAXJPER. 

The red blood began to steal up into Tom's 
cheeks, and he dropped his eyes and was silent. 

"Speak up, good lad, and fear nothing," said 
the King. "How used you the Great Seal of 
England?" 

Tom stammered a moment, in a pathetic 
confusion, then got it out— 

**To crack nuts withl" 

Poor child, the avalanche of laughter that 
greeted this nearly swept him off his feeL But 
if a doubt remained in any mind that Tom Canty 
was not the King of England and familiär with 
the august appurtenances of royalty, this reply 
disposed of it utterly. 

Meantime the sumptuous robe of State had 
been removed from Tom's Shoulders to the King's, 
whose rags were effectually hidden from sight 
under it. Then the coronation ceremonies were 
resumed; the true King was anointed and the 
crown set upon his head, whilst cannon thundered 
the news to the city, and all London secmed to 
rock with applause. 



 



EDWARD AS KING. 



Vit PHffee a»^ (he Pauker. IJf, 13 

 IC 



 



CHAPTER XXXIII. 
EDWARD AS KING. 

MiLES Hendon was picturesque enough before 
he got into the riot on London Bridge — he was 
more so when he got out of it. He had but 
little money when he got in, none at all when he 
got out., The pick-pockets had stripped him of 
his l^st farthing. 

But no matter, so he found his boy. Being 
a soldier, he did not go at his task in a random 
way, but set to work, first of all, to arrange his 
campaign. 

What would the boy naturally do? Where 
would he naturally go? Well — argued Miles — 
he would naturally go to his former haunts, for 
that is the instinct of unsound minds, when home- 
less and forsaken, as well as of sound ones. 
Whereabouts were his former haunts? His rags, 
taken together with the low villain who seemed 
to know him and who even claimed to be his 

13* 



 



196 THE PRINC£ AND THE PAUPER. 

father, indicated that his home was in one or 
another of the poorest and meanest districts of 
London. Would the search for him be difficult, 
or long? No, it was likely to be easy and briet 
He would not hunt for the boy, he would hunt 
for a crowd; in the centre of a big crowd or a 
little one, sooner or latei; he should find his poor 
little friend, sure; and the mangy mob would be 
cntertaining itself with pestering and aggravating 
the boy, who would be proclaiming himself King, 
as usual. Then Miles Hendon would cripple 
some of those people, and carry off his little 
ward, and comfort and cheer him with loving 
words, and the two would never be sepafated 
any more. 

So Miles Started on his quest. Hour after 
hour he tramped through back alleys and squalid 
streets, seeking groups and crowds, and finding 
ho end of them, but never any sign of the boy. 
This greatly surprised him, but did not dis- 
courage him. To his notion, there was nothing 
the matter with his plan of campaign; the only 
miscalculation about it was that the campaign 
was becoming a lengthy one, whereas he had 
expected it to be short. 

When daylight arrived, at last, he had made 

 IC 



EDWARD AS KING. I97 

many a mile, and canvassed many a crowd, but 
the only result was that he was tolerably tired> 
rather hungry, and very sleepy. He wanted 
some breakfast, but there was no way to get it* 
To beg for it did not occur to him; as to pawning 
bis sword, he would as soon have thought of 
parting with his honour; he coüld spare some of 
his clothes — yes, but one could as easily find a 
customer for a disease as for such clothes. 

At noon he was still tramping — among the 
rabble which followed after the royal procession, 
now; for he argued that this regal display would 
attract his little lunatic powerfully. He followed 
the pageant through all its devious windings 
about London, and all the way to Westminster 
and the Abbey. He drifted here and there 
amongst the multitudes that were massed in the 
vicinity for a weary long time, baffled and per- 
plexed, and finally wandered off, thinking, and 
tiying to contrive some way to better his plan of 
campaign. By and by, when he came to himself 
out of his musings, he discovered that the töwn 
was far behind him and that the day was growing 
old. He was near the river, and in the coüntry; 
it was a region of fine rural seats — not the sort 
of district to welcome clothes like his. 



 



igS THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

It was not at all cold; so he stretched him- 
self on the ground in the lee of a hedge to rest 
and think. Drowsiness presently began to settle 
upon his senses; the faint and far-off boom of 
cannon was wafted to his ear, and he said to 
himself, "The new King is crowned," and straight- 
way feil asleep. He had not slept or rested, be- 
fore, for more than thirty hours. He did not 
wake again until near the middle of the next 
taorning. 

He got up, lame, stiff, and half famished, 
washed himself in the river, stayed his stomadi 
with a pint or two of water, and trudged ofT to- 
ward Westminster grumbling at himself for having 
wasted so much time. Hunger helped him to a 
new plan, now; he would try to get speech with 
old Sir Humphrey Marlow and borrow a few 
inarks, and — but that was enough of a plan for 
the present; it would be time enough to enlarge 
it when this first stage should be accomplished 

Toward eleven o'clock he approached the 
palace; and although a host of showy people were 
about him, moving in the same direction, he was 
not inconspicuous — his costume took care of that 
He watched these people's faces narrowly, hoping 
to find a charitable one whose possessor might 



 



EDWARD AS RING. IQQ 

be willing to carry his name to the old lieutenant 
— as to trying to get into the palace himself, that 
was simply out of the question. 

Presently our whipping-boy passed him, theü 
wheeled about and scanned his figure well, saying 
to himself, "An* that is not the very vagabond 
his Majesty is in such a worry about, then am I 
an ass — though belike I was that before. He 
answereth the description to a rag — that God 
should make two such, would be to cheapen 
miracles by wasteful repetition. I would I could 
contrive an excuse to speak with him." 

Miles Hendon saved him the trouble; for he 
tumed about, then, as a man generally will when 
somebody mesmerises him by gazing hard at 
him from behind; and observing a strong interest 
in the boy's eyes, he stepped toward him and 
Said — 

"You have just come out from the palace; do 
you belong there?" 

"Yes, your worship." 

"Know you Sir Humphrey Marlow?" 

The boy started, and said to himself, "Lord! 
mine old departed father!" Then he answered, 
aloud, "Right well, your worship." 

*'Good— i5 b^ within?" 



 



:2pO THE PRINCE AND IHE HAUPER. 

**Yes /' siaid the boy; arid added, to Üimselt 
"within bis grave." 

"Might I crave your favoür to carry my name 
to him, arid say I beg to say a word in bis ear?" 

**I will despatcb the business right willingly, 
fair sir." 

"Tben say Miles Hendon, son of Sir Richard, 
IS here without — I shall be greatly bounden to 
you, my good lad." 

The boy looked disappointed — "the King did 
not name him so," he said to himself— "but it 
mattereth not, this is bis twin brother, and can 
give bis Majesty news of 'tother Sir-Odds-and- 
Ends, I Warrant." So he said to Miles, "Step ia 
there a moirient, good isir, and wait tili I bring 
you word." 

Heridon retired to the place indicated — it was 
a recess sunk in the palace wall, with a stone 
bendi in it — a shelter for seritinels in bad 
weather. He bad bardly seated himself when 
some halberdiers, in Charge of an officer, passed 
by. The officer saw him, halted bis men, and 
commarided Hendon to come forth. He pbeyed, 
and was promptly arrested as a suspiciöus 
character prowling within the precincts of the 
palace. Things began to look ugly. Poor Miles 



 



EDWARD AS KING, .201 

was going to explain, but the officer roughly 
silenced him, and ordered bis men to disarm bim 
and searcb bim. 

"God of bis mercy grant tbat tbey find some- 
wbat," Said poor Miles; '^I bave searcbed enow, 
and failed, yet is my need greater tban tbeirs." 

**Notbing was found but a document. Tbe 
officer tore it open, and Hendon smüed wben be 
recognised tbe "pot-books" made by bis lost little 
firiend tbat black day at Hendon HalL Tbe 
officer's face grew dark as be read tbe Englisb 
paragrapb, and Miles blencbed to tbe opposite 
colour as be listened. 

"Anotber new claimant of tbe crown!" cried 
tbe officer. "Verily tbey breed like rabbits, to- 
day. Seize tbe rascal, men, and see ye keep 
bim fast wbilst I convey tbis precious paper 
witbin and send it to tbe King." 

He burried away, leaving tbe prisoner in tbe 
grip of tbe balberdiers. 

"Now is my evil luck ended at last," muttered 
Hendon, "for I sball dangle at a rope's end for 
a certainty, by reason of tbat bit of writing. And 
wbaf will become of my poor ladt — ab, only tbe 
good God knowetb." 

By and by be saw tbe officer cpming again, 



 



'2Ö2 THE PIÜNCE AND THE PAUPER, 

in a great hurry; so he plücked bis coürage to- 
gether, purposing to meet his troubles as became 
a man. The officer ordered the men to loose the 
prisoner and return his sword to him; then bowed 
respectfully, and said— 

"Please you, sir, to follow me." 

Hendon followed, saying to himself, "An' I 
were not travelling to death and judgment, and 
so must needs economise in sin, I would throttle 
this knave for his mock courtesy." 

The two traversed a populous court, and 
arrived at the grand entrance of the palace, where 
the officer, with another bow, delivered Hendon 
into the hands of a gorgeous official, who received 
him with profound respect and led him forward 
through a great hall, lined on both sides with 
rows of splendid flunkeys (who made reverential 
obeisance as the two passed along, but feil into 
death-throes of silent laughter at our stately scare- 
crow the moment his back was tumed), and up a 
broad staircase, among flocks of fine folk, and 
finally conducted him into a vast room, clove a 
passage for him through the assembled nobility 
of England, then made a bow, reminded him to 
take his hat off, and left him Standing in the 
middle of the room, a mark for all eyes, for 



 



EDWARD AS KING. 203 

-plenty of indignant frowns, and for a sufficiency 
of amused and derisive smiles. 

Miles Hendon was entirely bewildered. There 
sat the young King, under a canopy of State, five 
Steps away, with his head bent down and aside, 
speaking with a sort of human bird of paradise — 
a duke, maybe; Hendon observed to himself that 
it was hard enough to be sentenced to death in 
the füll vigour of life, without having this pecu- 
liarly public humiliation added. He wished the 
King would hurry about it — some of the gaudy 
people near by were becoming pretty offensive. 
At this moment the King raised his head slightly, 
and Hendon caught a good view of his face. • 
The sight nearly took his breath away! — He 
stood gazing at the fair young face like one trans- 
fixed; then presently ejaculated — 

"Lo, the Lord of the Kingdom of Dreams and 
Shadows on his throne!" 

He muttered some broken sentences, still 
gazing and marvelling; then turned his eyes 
around and about, scanning the gorgeous throng 
and the splendid saloon, murmuring, "But these 
are real — verily these are real — surely it is not a 
dream." 

He stared at the King again — and thought, 

 IC 



204 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

"/r it a dream? . . . or ü he the veritable Sover- 
eign of England, and not the friendless poor Tom 
o' Bedlam I took him for — who shall solve me 
this riddle?" 

A sudden idea flashed in his eye, and he 
strode to the wall, gathered up a chair, brought 
it back, planted it on the floor, and sat down 
in it! 

A buzz of indignation broke out, a rough 
band was laid upon him, and a voice ex- 
claimed, — 

"Up, thou mannerless clown! — wouldst sit in 
the presence of the King?" 

The disturbance attracted bis Majesty's at- 
tention, who stretched forth his band and cried 
out — 

"Touch him not, it is his right!" 

The throng feil back, stupefied. The King 
went on — 

"Learn ye all, ladies, lords, and gentlemen, 
that this is my tnisty and well beloved servant, 
Miles Hendon, who interposed his good sword and 
saved his prince from bodily barm and possible 
death — and for this he is a knight, by the King's 
voice. Also learn, that for^a higher Service, in 
that he saved his sovereign stripes and shame, 



 



EDWARD AS KING. i05 

taking these upon himself, he is a peer of Eng- 
land, Earl of Kent, and shall have gold and lands 
meet for the dignity. More — the privilege which 
he hath just exercised is his by royal grant; for 
we have ordained that the chiefs of his line shall 
have and hold the right to sit in the presence of 
the Majesty of England henceforth, age after age, 
so long as the crown shall endure. Molest him 
not." 

Two persons, who, through delay, had only ar- 
rived from the country during this moming, and 
had now been in this room only five minutes, 
stood listening to these words and looking at the 
King, then at the scarecrow, then at the King 
again, in a sort of torpid bewildermdnt. These 
were Sir Hugh and the Lady Edith. But the 
new Earl did not see them. He was still staring 
at the monarch, in a dazed way, and muttering — 

"Oh, body o' me! This my pauper! This my 
lünatic! This is he whom / would show what 
grandeur was, in my house of seventy rooms 
and seven and twenty servantsl This is he who 
had never known aught but rags for raiment, 
kicks for comfort, and ofFal for diet! This is he 
whom / adopted and would make respectable! 
Would God I had a bag to hide my head in!" 

IC 



206 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

Then his manners suddenly came back to 
him, and he dropped upon his knees, with his 
hands between the King's, and swore allegiance 
and did homage for his lands and tiües. Then 
he rose and stood respectfuUy aside, a mark still. 
for all eyes — and much envy, too. 

Now the King discovered Sir Hugh, and spoke 
out, with wrathful voice and kindling eye — 

"Strip this robber of his false show and stolen 
estates, and put him under lock and key tili I 
have need of him." 

The late Sir Hugh was led away. 

There was a stir at the other end of the 
room, now; the assemblage feil, apart, and Tom 
Canty, quaintly but richly clothed, marched down, 
between these living walls, preceded by an usher. 
He knelt before King, who said — 

"I have leamed the story of these past few 
weeks, and am well pleased with thee. Thou 
hast govemed the realm with right royal gentle- 
ness and mercy. Thou hast found thy mother 
and thy sisters again? Good; they shall be cared 
for — and thy father shall hang, if thou desire it and 
the law consent. Know, all ye that hear my voice, 
that from this day, they that abide in the shelter 
of Christ's Hospital and share the King's bounty 



 



EDWARD AS KING. 20^ 

shall have their minds and hearts fed, as well as 
their baser parts; and this boy shall dwell there, 
and hold the chief place in its honoürable body 
of goveraors, during life. And for that he hath 
been a king, it is meet that other than common 
observance shall be his due; wherefore note this 
his dress of State, for by it he shall be known, 
and none shall copy it; and wheresoever he shall 
come, it shall remind the people that he hath 
been royal, in his time, and none shall deny him 
his due of reverence or fail to give him saluta- 
tion. He hath the throne's protection, he hath 
the crown's support, he shall be known and 
called by the honoürable title of the King's 
Ward." 

The proud and happy Tom Canty rose and 
kissed the King's hand, and was conducted from 
the presence. He did not waste any time, but 
flew to his mother, to teil her and Nan and Bet 
all about it and get them to help him enjoy the 
great news.* 

♦ See Notes to Chapter XXXIII., at end of this volume. 



 



 



JUSTICE AND RETRIBUTION. 



The Prince and the Pauper, II, 14 

 IC 



 



CONCLUSION 
Justice and retribution. 

When the mysteries were all cleared up, it 
came out, by confession of Hmgh Hendon, that his 
wife had repudiated Miles by his command, that 
day at Hendon Hall — a command assisted and 
supported by the perfectly trustworthy promise 
that if she did not deny that he was Miles Hendon, 
and stand firmly to it, he would have her life; 
whereupon she said take it, she did not value it 
— anJ she would not repudiate Miles; then the 
husband said he would spare her life but have 
Miles assassinated ! This was a different matter; 
so she gave her word and kept it. 

Hugh was not prosecuted for his threats or 
for stealing his brother's estates and title, because 
the wife and brother would not testify against 
him — and the former would not have been allowed 
to do it, even if she had wanted to. Hugh de- 
serted his wife and went over to the continent, 

14* 

 IC 



212 THK PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

where he presently died; and by and by the Earl 
of Kent married his relict. There were grand 
times and rejoicings at Hendon village when the 
couple paid their first visit to the Hall. 

Tom Canty's father was never heard of 
again. 

The King sought out the fanner who had 
been branded and sold as a slave, and reclaimed 
him from his evil life with the Ruffler's gang, 
and put him in the« way of a comfortable liveli- 
hood. 

He also took that old lawyer out of prison and 
remitted his fine. He provided good homes for 
the daughters of the two Baptist women whom he 
saw buraed at the stake, and roundly punished 
the official who laid the undeserved stripes upon 
Miles Hendon's back. 

He saved from the gallows the boy who had 
captured the stray falcon, and also the woman 
who had stolen a renmant of cloth from a 
weaver; but he was too late to save the man 
who had been convicted of killing a deer in the 
royal forest. 

He showed favour to the justice who had 
pitied him when he was supposed to have stolen 
a pig, and he had the gratification of seeing him 



 



JUSTICE AND RETRIBUTION, 213 

grow in the public esteem and become a great 
and honoured man. 

As long as the King lived he was fond of 
telling the story of his adventures, all through, 
from the hour that the sentinel cuffed him away 
from the palace gate tili the final midnight when 
he deftly mixed himself into a gang of hurrying 
workmen and so slipped into the Abbey and 
climbed up and hid himself in the Confessor's 
tomb, and then slept so long, next day, that he 
came within one of missing the Coronation alto- 
gether. He said that the frequent rehearsing of 
the precious lesson kept him strong in his purpose 
to make its teachings yield benefits to his people; 
and so, whilst his life was spared he should con- 
tinue to teil the story, and thus keep its sorrowful 
spectacles fresh in his memory and the Springs of 
pity replenished in his heart. 

Miles Hendon and Tom Canty were favourites 
of the King, all through his brief reign, and his 
sincere moumers when he died. The good Earl 
of Kent had too much sense to abuse his peculiar 
privilege; but he exercised it twice after the in- 
stance we have seen of it before he was called 
from the world — once at the accession of Queen 
Mary, and once at the accession of Queen 



 



214 THE PRINCE AND THE PAUPER. 

Elizabeth. A descendant of his exercised it at 
the accession of James L Before this one's son 
chose to use the privilege, near a quarter of a 
Century had elapsed, and the "privilege of the 
Kents" had faded out of most people's memories; 
so, when the Kent of that day appeared before 
Charles L and his court and sat down in the 
sovereign's presence to assert and perpetüate the 
right of his house, there was a fine stir indeed! 
But the matter was soon explained, and the right 
confirmed. The last Earl of the line feil in the 
wars of the Commonwealth fighting for the King, 
and the odd privilege ended with him. 

Tom Canty lived to be a very old man, a 
handsome, white-haired old fellow, of grave and 
benignant aspect As long as he lasted he was 
honoured; and he was also reverenced, for his 
striking and peculiar costume kept the people re- 
minded that "in his time he had been royal;" 
so, wherever he appeared the crowd feil apart, 
making way for him, and whispering, one to an- 
other, "Doff thy hat, it is the King's Wardl"— 
and so they saluted, and got his kindly smile in 
return — and they valued it, too, for his was an 
honourable history. 

Yes, King Edward VI. lived only a few years, 



 



JUSTICE AND REmrounoN. 215 

poor boy, but he lived them worthily. More than 
once, when some great dignitary, some gilded 
vassal of the crown, made argument against bis 
leniency, and urged that some law which he was 
bent upon amending was gentle enough for its 
purpose, and wrought no suffering or oppression 
which any one need mightily mind, the young 
King turaed the mournful eloquence of his great 
compassionate eyes upon him and answered — 

" What dost thou know of suffering and oppres- 
sion? I and my people know, but not thou." 

The reign of Edward VI. was a singularly 
merciful one for those harsh times. Now that we 
are taking leave of him, let us try to keep this in 
our minds, to his credit. 



 



sdb 



NOTES. 



 



 



NOTES. 

Note i, Vol. I. p. 32. 
Chrisfs Hospital Costume, 

It is most reasonable to regard the dress as copied from 
the costume of the Citizens of London of that period, when 
long blue coats were the common habit of apprentices and 
serving-men , and yellow stockings were generally wom ; the 
coat fits closely to the body, but has loose sleeves, and 
beneath is wom a sleeveless yellow under-coat ; around the 
waist is a red leathern girdle; a clerical band around the 
neck, and a small flat black cap, about the size of a saucer, 
completes the costume. — Timbs* Curiosities of London, 

Note 2, Vol. I. p. 35. 

It appears that Christas Hospital was not originally 
founded as a school; its object was to rescue children from 
the streets, to shelter, feed, clothe them, &c. — Timbs* 
Curiosities of London. 

Note 3, Vol. I. p. 51. 
The Lhike of Norfolk* s CondemnaHon commanded. 

The King was now approaching fast towards his end; 
and fearing lest Norfolk should escape him, he sent a mes- 



 



220 NOTES. 

sage to the Commons, by which he desired them to hasten 
the bin, on pretence that Norfolk enjoyed the dignity of 
Earl- Marshai, and it was necessary to appoint another, who 
might officiate at the ensuing cercmony of installing his son 
Prince of Wales. — Hume's History of England ^ vol. in. 
P- 307. 

Note 4, VoL I. p. 75. 

It was not tili the end of this reign [Henry VIII.] that 
any salads, carrots, tumips, or other edible roots were pro- 
duced in England. The little of these vegetables that was 
used was formerly imported from Holland and Flanders. 
Queen Catherine, when she wanted a saJad, was obliged to 
despatch a messenger thither on purpose.— ^Mm€% History 
of England^ vol. III. p. 314. 

Note 5, Vol. I. p. 87. 
Attainder of Norfolk» 

The House of Peers, without examining the prisoner, 
without trial or evidence, passed a bill of attainder against 
him and sent it down to the Commons. . . . The obsequious 
Commons obeyed his [the King's] directions; and the King, 
having affixed the Royal assent to the bill by commissioners, 
issued Orders for the execution of Norfolk on the moraing of 
January 29 [the next day]. — Hume's History of England^ 
vol. III, p. 306. 

Note 6, Vol. I. p. 112. 
Tlie Loruing-cup. 

The loving-cup, and the peculiar ceremonies observed in 
drinking from it, are older than English history. It is 
thought that both are Danish importations. As far back as 
knowledge goes, the loving-cup has always been dnink at 
English banquets. Tradition explains the ceremonies in this 
way. In the rüde ancient times it was deemed a wise pre- 



 



NOTES. 221 

caution to have both hands of both drinkers employed, lest 
while the pledger pledged bis love and fidelity to the pledgee, 
the pledgee take that opportunity to slip a dirk into him ! 

Note 7, Vol. I. p. 125. 
The Duke 0/ Norfolk* s narrow Escape. 

Had Henry VIII. survived a few hours longer, bis order 
for the duke's execution would have been carried into effect. 
**But news being carried to the Tower that the King himself 
had expired that night, the lieutenant deferred obeying the 
Warrant ; and it was not thought advisable by the Council to 
begin a new reign by the death of the greatest nobleman in 
the kingdom, who had been condemned by a sentence so 
unjust and tyrannical." — Hume's History of England^ vol. iii. 
P- 307- 

Note 8, Vol. I. p. 175. 

The Whipping-boy, 

James I. and Charles II. had whipping-boys, when they 
were little fellows, to take their punishment for them when 
they feil short in their lessons; so I have ventured to fumish 
my small prince with one, for my own purposes. 

Notes to Chapter XV., Vol. I. p. 183. 
Characier of Hertford. 

The young King discovered an extreme attachment to 
bis uncle, who was, in the main, a man of moderat ion and 
probity. — Hume's History of England^ vol. iii. p. 324. 

But if he [the ■ Protector] gave offence by assuming too 
much State, he deserves great praise on account of the laws 
passed this Session, by which the rigour of former Statutes was 
much mitigated, and some security given to the freedom of 
the Constitution. All laws were repealed which extended the 
crime of treason beyond the Statute of the twenty-fifth of 
Edward III. ; all laws enacted during the late reign extend- 



 



221 Notes. 

in^r the crime of felony; all the former laws against LoUardy 
or heresy, together with the Statute of the Six Articles. None 
were to be accused for words, but within a month after they 
were spoken. By these repeals several of the most rigorous 
laws that ever had passed in England were annuUed; and 
some dawn, both of civil and religious liberty, began to 
appear to the people. A repeal also passed of that law, the 
destruction of all laws, by which the King's proclamation 
was made of equal force with a Statute. — Ibid.^ vöL iii. 
P- 339. 

Boiling to Death, 

In the reign of Henry VIII. poisoners were, by Act of 
Parliament , conderaned to be boiled to death, This Act was ' 
repealed in the foUowing reign. 

In Germany, even in the seventeenth Century, this hor- 
rible punishment was inflicted on coiners and counterfeiters. 
Taylor, the Water Poet, describes an execution hewitnessed 
in Hamburg in 161 6. The judgment pronounced against a 
coiner of false money was that he should **be boiled to death 
in oil\ not thrown into the vessel at once, but with a puUey 
rope to be hanged under the armpits, and then let down into 
the oil by degrees; first the feet, and next the legs, and so to 
boil his flesh from his bones alive." — Dr. J. Hammond 
Trumbull's ^//^ Zawj-, True and False, p. 13. 

The Famous Stocking Case. 

A woman and her daughter, nine years old, were hanged 
in Huntingdon for selling their souls to the devil, and raising 
a storm by puUing off their stockings! — Dr. J. Hammond 
TrumbuU's Blue Laws, True and False^ p. 20. 

Note 10, Vol. I. p. 228. 
Enslaving. 

So young a King and so Ignorant a peasant were likely to 
make mistaJces; and this is an instance in point. This 



 



NOXES. 22^ 

peasant was suffering from this law fy anticipation; the King 
was venting- his Indignation against a law which was not yet 
in existence; for this hideous Statute was to have birth in this 
little King*s own reign. However, we know, from the 
humanity of his character, that it could never have been 
suggested by him. 

Notes to Chapter XXIII. Vol. II. p. 69. 
Deaihfor Trifling Larcenies. 

When Connecticut and New Haven were framing their 
first Codes , larceny above the value of twelve pence was a 
capital crime in England — as it had been since the time of 
Henry I. — Dr. J. Hammond Trumbull's Blue Latus ^ True 
and False, p. 17. 

The curious old book called The English Rogue makes 
the limit thirteen pence ha*penny; death being the portion of 
any who steai a thing "above the value of thirteen pence 
ha'p6nny." 

Notes to Chapter XXVIL, VoL II. p. 113. 

From many descriptions of larceny the law expressly 
took away the benefit of clergy; to steäl a horse, or a hawk, 
or woollen cloth from the weaver, was a hanging matter. So 
it was to kill a deer from the King's forest, or to export 
sheep from the kingdom. — Dr. J. Hammond Trumbull *s Bitte 
Latus, True and False^ p. 13. 

William Prynne, a leamed barrister, was sentenced [long 
after Edward VI. 's time] to lose both his ears in the pillory, 
to degradation from the bar, a fine of 3,000/., and imprison- 
ment for life. Three years afterwards he gave new offence 
to Laud by publishing a pamphlet against the hierarchy. 
He was again prosecuted, and was sentenced to lose what 
rentained of his ears^ to pay a fine of 5,000/., to be branded 
on both his cheeks with the letters S. L. (for Seditious Libeller), 
and to remain in prison for life. The severity of this sen- 
tence was equalled by the savage rigour of its execution. — 
Ibid.^ p. 12. 



Notes to Chapter XXX III., Vol. II. p. 193. 

Christ *s Hospital, or Bluecoat School, "the noblest In- 
stitution in the world. " 

The ground on which the Priory of the Gray Friars stood 
was conferred by Henry VIII. on the Corporation of London, 
[who caused the institution there of a home for poor boys 
and girlsj. Subsequently, Edward VI. caused the oid Priory" 
to be properly repaired, and founded within it that noble 
establishment called the Bluecoat School, or Christ's Hospi- 
tal, for the edttccUion and maintenance of orphans and the 
children of indigent persons. . . . Edward would not let 
him (Bishop Ridley) depart tili the letter was written (to the 
Lord Mayor), and then charged him to deliver it himself, and 
signify his special request and commandment that no time 
might be lost in proposing what was convenient, and appris- 
ing him of the proceedings. The work was zealously under- 
taken, Ridley himself engaging in it ; and the result was the 
founding of Christ's Hospital for the education of poor chil- 
dren. [The King endowed several other charities at the 
sametime.] **Lord God," said he, "I yield Thee most 
hearty thanks that Thou hast given me life thus long to finish 
this work to the glory of Thy name I " That innocent and 
most exemplary life was drawing rapidly to its close, and in 
a few days he rendered up his spirit to his Creator, praying 
God to defend the realm from Papistry. — J. Heneage Jesse's 
London : its Celebrated Characters and Places. 

In the Great Hall hangs a large picture of King Ed- 
ward VI. seated on his throne, in a scarlet and ennined robe, 
holding the sceptre in his left band, and presenting with the 
other the Charter to the kneeling Lord Mayor. By his side 
Stands the Chancellor, holding the seals, and next to him are 
other officers of State. Bishop Ridley kneels before him with 
uplifted hands, as if supplicating a blessing on the event; 
whilst the Aldermen, etc., with the Lord Mayor, kneel on 
both sides, occupying the middle ground of the picture ; and 
lastly, in front, are a double row of boys on one side and 
girls on the other, from the master and matron down to the 
boy and girl who.have stepped forward from their respective 



